,job_title,company,location,salary,description,counts,city
0,IT Infrastructure Project Manager,Precision Solutions,"Reston, VA",None,"Overview:

IT Infrastructure Project Manager
TS/SCI with CI Polygraph
Reston, VA
The IT Infrastructure Project Manager (ITI-PM) will provide our client with program and project management advisory and assistance in support of their DOMEX Information Technology Infrastructure sustainment and modernization. The ITI-PM will leverage their technical and functional expertise and experience to help ensure the rapid and timely delivery of new capabilities and systems (including the decommissioning of old capabilities and systems). May be required to identify and evaluate new technologies/tools utilized within DoD or the IC, assist the government with developing and maintaining quality assurance procedures. Working closely with our client, their Division leadership, key stakeholders, product owners, and community partners, the ITI-PM shall (i) coordinate needs-identification and requirements gathering efforts, (ii) Effectively monitor and document workflow and adjustment when required, (iii) plan, coordinate and conduct project activities in accordance with the approved WBS & schedule, (iv) manage project activities and schedules and coordinate any changes for client approval.
QUALIFICATIONS:
EXPERIENCE & SKILLS:
Minimum years of experience must include (yes, they can overlap):
Six (6) years IT project management (must include managing a team or teams).
Five (5) Project Management experience applying PMI core principles.
Three (3) years hand-on experience in applying Lean-Agile principles.
Three (3) years hand-on experience in applying Scaled Agile Framework (SAFe) Project Management principles.
Three (3) years hand-on experience applying Lean-IT principles.
Must have:
The ability to efficiently oversee multiple projects across several phases of development.
The ability to work as part of an interdisciplinary team to achieve project milestones.
Ability to support implementation and maintain industry best practices.
Ability to effectively communicate leveraging technical and business acumen to communicate effectively with executive leadership, all stakeholders, and their team.
Successful experience with: Schedule Management; Integration Management; Quality Management; Communication Management; Risk Management; Procurement Management; Stakeholder Management and effective Total Cost of Ownership Management.
EDUCATION:
Bachelors, - OR – Associates PLUS an additional two (2) years IT project management - OR – HS/GED PLUS an additional four (4) years IT project management.
CERTIFICATION:
Project Management Institute (PMI) Project Management Professional (PMP) certification.",463,Washington
1,Purchasing Agent,"City of Alexandria, VA","Alexandria, VA 22304 (Seminary Hill area)","$101,757 - $184,411 a year","Purchasing Agent

The City of Alexandria is located in northern Virginia and is bordered by the District of Columbia (Potomac River), Arlington and Fairfax counties. With a population of approximately 150,000 and a land area of 15.75 square miles, Alexandria is the seventh largest city in the Commonwealth of Virginia. Alexandria has a charming waterfront and is a unique and historic place to live and work. About one-quarter of the City’s square miles have been designated as a national or local historic district. We proudly embrace our rich history and seize the endless opportunities that lie ahead.

An Overview
Alexandria is experiencing significant redevelopment in key areas throughout the City. As the urban environment evolves, the service delivery model of the City of Alexandria will necessarily change. This means the City will be engaged in many new and exciting procurement activities for both major capital projects as well as operational services. The next few years will bring complex challenges and opportunities for innovation in procurement. The purchasing agent will play a key role in helping City agencies answer these new challenges, and will guide the City through major capital projects. The City seeks a talented business manager that displays excellent judgment in high-pressure, complex situations. The purchasing agent should have a history of creative and innovative problem solving as well as the ability to lead a team of professional procurement specialists.

The purchasing agent supervises and administers the operation of the Purchasing Division of the Department of Finance. The employee in this class is responsible for the legal and proper execution of central purchasing activities, including the procurement of supplies, materials, equipment, and services of desired grade and quality at prices most favorable to the City and their issuance as in accordance with the City Code Sec. 3-3-13. Work is performed under the general supervision of the finance director, but the employee has considerable latitude for independent judgment, innovation, and initiative in carrying out the work of the division.

What You Should Bring
The ideal candidate will bring sound management and decision-making experience to a complex division. The City seeks a candidate that can infuse innovation into all business processes, and has experience dealing with multifaceted purchasing projects. It is also important that the purchasing agent be well versed in buying, inspection, as well as the laws, ordinances and other requirements governing the purchase of commodities and services for the City, or have the ability to readily acquire such knowledge. The candidate should understand sources of supply, markets and price trends, and have a working knowledge of the various grades and qualities of a variety of materials, supplies, equipment and services. He or she should have a good knowledge of accounting practices as applied to procurement procedures, and be comfortable making difficult decisions and award contracts and review any appeals impartially and objectively. The candidate should be able to effectively manage an office and have the ability to plan, organize, review and evaluate the work of a staff performing varied procurement functions, as well as establish and maintain effective working relationships with other City officials, employees, vendors and the general public. The ability to communicate clearly and effectively, both orally and in writing, is highly important. Lastly, the ability to synthesize purchasing data and use it to prioritize projects and refine business processes is essential to the continued improvement of the Purchasing Division and its role in executing the City’s strategic plan. The incumbent is also expected to report out on performance metrics for the procurement function, which ultimately help inform resource priorities for the City.

The Opportunity – Examples of Work
Directs work of professional staff and ensures that Division/program objectives and outcomes are achieved in compliance with local, state and federal requirements;
Develops, executes, and revises the Division’s strategic plan and performance plan in conjunction with the Finance Director;
Reviews and supervises bid proposals and awards contracts to vendors for purchases; determines contract awards, administers contracts, and disposes of surplus goods and equipment;
Conducts reviews, responds to, and resolves/issues decisions on protests and appeals from vendors;
Prepares docket items and makes presentations before City Council; Prepares reports of procurement activities;
Resolves problems with vendors which contract specialists are unable to resolve, and takes action when vendors default on contracts;
Recommends and approves appropriate procurement methods, and discusses formal bid awards with department heads;
Analyzes purchasing and supply policies and procedures, controls their implementation and application, and incorporates new techniques, policies, and procedures;
Plans, coordinates and controls the purchasing activities of the City, establishes priorities, and evaluates functions; Prepares budget requests for the Division's operations and administers the Division budget;
Performs other duties, as assigned.

About The Department
The City of Alexandria's Finance Department is a fast-paced, diverse, and customer service focused operation that serves both members of the public and the other departments of the City itself. The Finance Department has seven divisions and in fiscal year 2021 is operating with a total budget of $13.2 million and 107.25 FTE positions. The main responsibilities of the Finance divisions are as follows:
The Revenue Division assesses personal property (car tax), meal sales, transient lodging and other taxes, and also issues business and professional licenses;
The Treasury Division bills, collects, invests, and manages all City monies;
The Real Estate Division appraises each parcel of real estate in the City, the value of which is used to bill for the real estate tax;
The Purchasing Division is responsible for centralized City procurement;
The Accounting Division maintains records on the financial operations of the City and prepares the City's monthly and annual financial reports;
The Pension Division manages pension plans for City employees; and
The Administration Division provides executive-level strategy and direction and also administers the department's budget, human resources, and performance management. This division also provides risk management services for the City and manages the City's enterprise resource planning (ERP) system, Munis.

Minimum and Additional Requirements
At least five years of government purchasing and contract management experience including some supervisory experience in local, State or Federal government; or at least three years of experience at a level equivalent to Contract Specialist III; and a Bachelor's degree with some college-level courses in procurement, marketing, business law, or business administration, and retailing; or any equivalent combination of experience and training which provides the required knowledge, skills and abilities.

Preferred Qualifications
Master’s degree or Juris Doctor degree. Experience working in local, state or Federal Government environment.

To Apply
For consideration, please submit a cover letter detailing your qualifications, and your resume to Alexandria_Purchasing@polihire.com. Resumes will be screened in relation to the criteria outlined in this announcement. Candidates with relevant qualifications will be given preliminary interviews by POLIHIRE. Those candidates deemed qualified will be referred to the City of Alexandria for further consideration. Please include only your name (Last, First) in the subject line when submitting these materials.

Notes
This position requires satisfactory pre-employment background checks, including but not limited, to drug tests and criminal background checks.",463,Washington
2,Supervisory Procurement Analyst,US National Nuclear Security Administration,"Washington, DC","$122,530 - $183,300 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is located at the Department of Energy (DOE), National Security Nuclear Administration (NNSA), in the Associate Administrator for Acquisition & Project Management (APM), in Washington, D.C.


The incumbent will direct and implement changes to meet evolving and changing goals and expectations for the policy and oversight for NNSA M&O contracting.

Responsibilities
Serve as the first level Supervisor with substantial independence and authority who exercises both technical and administrative direction of federal employees on a substantially full-time basis.
Serve as lead expert providing guidance and support to senior Agency officials regarding assigned acquisition policy areas.
Representing the NNSA Senior Procurement Executive (SPE) interacting with high level officials within the Department of Energy, NNSA, the Office of Inspector General, General Accountability Office, Office of Management and Budget.
Develop and promulgates acquisition related directives that bring about significant acquisition reform impacting the entire Agency, Department, or Federal Government.
Leading significant acquisition initiatives exercising independent discretion in devising creative solutions to satisfying mission needs through contractual means while ensuring program compliance with applicable rules and regulations.
Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
4
Job family (Series)
1102 Contracting
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen or National.
Successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit https://www.e-verify.gov/
Males born after 12/31/1959 must be Selective Service registered or exempt.
Suitable for Federal employment, as determined by a background investigation.
Direct Deposit: Per Public Law 104-134 all Federal employees are required to have federal payments made by direct deposit to their financial institution.
Compliance with Homeland Security Presidential Directive (HSPD-12) governing personal identity which will require that you provide two forms of identification.
May require successful completion of a one year probationary period.
Must pass a pre-employment drug test. Subject to random drug testing.
Qualifications
Applicants must meet all qualifications and eligibility requirements by the closing date of the announcement including specialized experience and/or education, as defined below.

Must meet level III DOE, DOD, or FAC-C requirements or must be at least level II certified in contracting and be able to obtain level III DOE contracting certification within 18 months of placement in the Pay Band 04.

In addition to the basic requirements, applicants must meet the specialized experience below.

A qualified candidate's online application and resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience equivalent to the next lower NNSA Demonstration Project pay band or GS grade level in the Federal service i.e. (NN-03/NQ-03 or GS-14). Specialized experience is defined as:
Experience in providing oversight to contracting officers and contract specialists in contract award, contract administration, and contract closeout of large ($100 million plus), complex contracts in accordance with the Federal Acquisition Regulation; OR
Experience in rulemaking, creating, revising or promulgating regulations that have an impact on acquisition reform at the Federal or Agency level.

For more information on the qualifications for this position: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/1100/contracting-series-1102/

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.
Education
Basic Requirements
Completion of all mandatory training prescribed by the head of the agency for progression to GS-13 or higher level contracting positions, including at least 4-years experience in contracting or related positions. At least 1 year of that experience must have been specialized experience at or equivalent to work at the next lower level of the position, and must have provided the knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform successfully the work of the position.
and
A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree, that included or was supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods, or organization and management.
Exceptions: Employees in GS-1102 positions will be considered to have met the standard for positions they occupy on January 1, 2000. This also applies to positions at the same grade in the same agency or other agencies if the specialized experience requirements are met. However, they will have to meet the basic requirements and specialized experience requirements in order to qualify for promotion to a higher grade, unless granted a waiver under Paragraph D.
Waiver: When filling a specific vacant position, the senior procurement executive of the selecting agency, at his or her discretion, may waive any or all of the requirements of Paragraphs A and B above if the senior procurement executive certifies that the applicant possesses significant potential for advancement to levels of greater responsibility and authority, based on demonstrated analytical and decision making capabilities, job performance, and qualifying experience. With respect to each waiver granted under this Paragraph D, the senior procurement executive must document for the record the basis of the waiver. If an individual is placed in a position in an agency on the basis of a waiver, the agency may later reassign that individual to another position at the same grade within that agency without additional waiver action.
Additional information
The U.S. Department of Energy fosters a diverse and inclusive workplace and is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
This job opportunity announcement may be used to fill additional similar vacancies across DOE.
For general information on government-wide Telework polices visit: www.telework.gov
Career Transition Assistance Plan (CTAP), Reemployment Priority List (RPL), or Interagency Career Transition Assistance Plan (ICTAP): Visit the OPM website for information on how to apply as a CTAP, RPL, or ICTAP eligible. To exercise selection priority for this vacancy, CTAP/RPL/ICTAP candidates must meet the basic eligibility requirements and all selective factors. CTAP/ICTAP candidates must be rated and determined to be well qualified (or above) based on an evaluation of the competencies listed in the How You Will Be Evaluated section. When assessed through a score-based category rating method, CTAP/ICTAP applicants must receive a rating of at least 85 out of a possible 100.
Veterans who are preference eligible or who have been separated from the armed forces under honorable conditions after three years or more of continuous active service are eligible for consideration under the Veteran's Employment Opportunity Act (VEOA).
For more information on applying under special hiring authorities such as 30 percent disabled veterans, certain military spouses, Schedule A Disabled, etc., explore the different Hiring Paths on the USAJOBS website.
Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act (LMWFA) provides current or former temporary or term employees of federal land management agencies opportunity to compete for permanent competitive service positions. Individuals must have more than 24 months of service without a break between appointments of two or more years. Service must be in the competitive service and have been at a successful level of performance or better. Refer to PUBLIC LAW 114-47-AUG. 7, 2015 for more information.
If hired for this position, you may be required to submit a financial disclosure report within 30 days of the effective date of your appointment and annually thereafter.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated based on your qualifications for this position as evidenced by the experience, education, and training you described in your application package, as well as the responses to the Assessment Questionnaire to determine the degree to which you possess the knowledge, skills, abilities and competencies listed below:

Contracting/Procurement, Customer Service, Decision Making, Interpersonal Skills, Leadership, Oral Communication, Writing

Your application, including the online Assessment Questionnaire, will be reviewed to determine if you meet (a) minimum qualification requirements and (b) the resume supports the answers provided to the job-specific questions. Your resume must clearly support your responses to all the questions addressing experience and education relevant to this position. Applicants who meet the minimum qualification requirements and are determined to be among the best qualified candidates will be referred to the hiring manager for consideration. Noncompetitive candidates and applicants under some special hiring authorities need only meet minimum qualifications to be referred. Note: If after reviewing your resume and/or supporting documentation, a determination is made that you have inflated your qualifications and or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities, or you may be found ineligible. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating. Providing inaccurate information on Federal documents could be grounds for non-selection or disciplinary action up to including removal from the Federal service.

Clicking the link below will present a preview of the application form; i.e. the online questionnaire. The application form link below will only provide a preview and does not initiate the application process. To initiate the online application process, click the ""Apply"" button to the right.
To preview the Assessment Questionnaire, click https://apply.usastaffing.gov/ViewQuestionnaire/11127898

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Q Access Authorization
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
High Risk (HR)
Trust determination process
Credentialing
Required Documents

Required Documents
The following documents are required for your applicant package to be complete. Our office cannot be responsible for incompatible software, your system failure, etc. Encrypted documents will not be accepted. Failure to submit required, legible documents may result in loss of consideration.
Resume that includes:1) personal information such as name, address, contact information; 2) education; 3) detailed work experience related to this position as described in the major duties including work schedule, hours worked per week, dates of employment; title, series, grade (if applicable); 4) other qualifications.
If education is required or being used to qualify, you must submit a copy of your college transcripts. An unofficial copy is sufficient with the application if it includes your name and the necessary course information; however, if you are selected, official transcripts will be required prior to entering on duty. Education must have been successfully obtained from an accredited school, college or university. If any education was completed at a foreign institute, you must submit with your application evidence that the institute was appropriately accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the U.S. Department of Education as equivalent to U.S. education standards. There are private organizations that specialize in this evaluation and a fee is normally associated with this service. For a list of private organizations that evaluate education, visit the NACES website. All transcripts must be in English or include an English translation.
Veteran Hiring Authorities: VEOA and 30% Disabled Veterans: DD214, Certificate of Release from Active Duty, that shows dates of service and discharge under honorable conditions. If currently on active duty you must submit a certification of expected discharge or release from active duty service under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after the date the certification is submitted. Veteran's preference must be verified prior to appointment.
If claiming 10-point veteran's preference you must provide the DD214 or certification requirements (see above bullet), plus the proof of entitlement of this preference as listed on the SF-15 Application for 10-point Veterans' Preference. The SF-15 should be included but is not required. Failure to submit these documents could result in the determination that there is insufficient documentation to support your claim for 10-point preference.
Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act: Copies of Notification of Personnel Action(s) (SF-50) showing the employee served in eligible appointment(s) for a period(s) of more than 24 mos w/o a break between appointments of 2+ years. Include initial hire actions, extensions, conversions and separation SF-50s for each period. Submit performance rating(s) showing acceptable performance for each period counted towards eligibility signed by supervisor(s). If documentation does not exist for one or more periods, submit a statement from supervisor(s) indicating acceptable performance. Applicants who do not have performance documentation for any period shall provide a reason why the documentation is not available and statement that performance for all periods was at an acceptable level.
Schedule A, Persons with Disabilities Appointment: Letter from a physician, local, state or federal rehabilitation office citing eligibility under 5CFR213.3102(u).
Surplus or displaced employees eligible for CTAP, RPL, or ICTAP priority must provide: proof of eligibility (RIF separation notice, notice of proposed removal for declining a transfer of function or directed reassignment to another commuting area, notice of disability annuity termination), SF-50 documenting separation (as applicable), and your most recent SF-50 noting position, grade level, and duty location with your application per 5CFR330.
If claiming eligibility under a special hiring authority or an interchange agreement with another merit system not listed above, see the requirements for that authority and submit the required supporting documentation. Go to: USAJOBS Hiring Path for Special Authorities or Special Hiring Authority for more information.
Failure to submit any of the above mentioned required documents may result in loss of consideration due to an incomplete application package. It is your responsibility to ensure all required documents have been submitted.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Individuals with disabilities
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Veterans
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Clarification from the agency
Current permanent Federal employees with competitive status, Land Management Workforce Flexibility Act, CTAP/RPL/ICTAP and VEOA eligibles; reinstatement eligibles; Individuals with Disabilities; certain military spouses; 30% or more disabled veterans; former Peace Corps or VISTA volunteers; and those eligible for other Special Hiring Authorities.",463,Washington
3,Program Assistant III,"GAP Solutions, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22204 (Douglas Park area)",None,"The Program Assistant will contribute to Crisis Management Training’s (CMT) responsibility to analyze, design, develop, implement, and evaluate the crisis management training program which includes domestic courses, both distance learning and in-person, and travel overseas to implement the training program at U.S. Missions. Provide a wide range of administrative support. Use greater judgment and initiative to determine the approach or action to take in non-routine situations, interprets and adapts guidelines, including unwritten policies, precedents, and practices, which are not always completely applicable to changing situations.Duties and Responsibilities:Under the direction of the COR, provide daily administrative support on LMS/CMT projects, including compiling data, formatting documents, maintaining filing systems, and taking notes at meetings and finalizing them for submission to the LMS/CMT Director.Complete data entry for OIG, GAO, and other official reports.Update LMS/CMT core handouts and reports as needed.Complete administrative requests and processing with FSI/EX/ AV regarding video captioning and the filing of video/audio files within the shared drive or other file-sharing system.Provide administrative support as needed for the 100+ overseas classes where LMS/CMT Trainers serve as instructors.Perform general editing, formatting, and maintenance of handouts, PowerPoints, spreadsheets, and other materials for these classes.Track and upload Post Lessons Learned responses to LMS/CMT's Trip Reports database.Update LMS/CMT's Trip Reports database information from Registrar attendance reports.Prepare materials to send to Post as· needed for training, such as DVDs, crisis action cards, and other resources.Provide administrative support as needed for the 60+ domestic classes where LMS/CMT Trainers serve as the instructors/SMEs in other FSI classes.Perform general editing, formatting, and maintenance of handouts, PowerPoints, spreadsheets, and other materials for these classes.Provide administrative support as needed for FSI courses where LMS/CMT coordinates State Department participation, including PD535 (Advanced Crisis Management Military Exercise).Track and maintain list of applicants/applications for PD535.Manage enrollment reports for PD535 (Advanced Crisis Management Military Exercise) participants.Manage distribution of Letters of Appreciation (LOAs) for PD535 participants.Review class rosters and quarterly Registrar reports for accuracy and provide corrections to the FSI Registrar.Manages formatting and distribution of letters/emails of appreciation for all LMS/CMT courses.Track daily response rates in SurveyMonkey. Send survey reminder emails to students.Generate evaluation data documentation and provide it to Director, Course Chairs, and LMS/CMT trainer for the timely completion of course evaluation reports according to the LMS Evaluation SOP.Check LMS/CMT web content and hyperlinks on a quarterly basis, coordinating with CEI to make simple updates and fixing broken links or outdated handouts.Help research and consolidate content for LMS/CMT website, SharePoint, biogs, and other related outgoing messaging and online presence.Conduct basic research and maintain files to assist LMS/CMT staff, including helping document timelines of crisis events based on cables and open-source materials to serve as guide and tools for courses and scenario-development and pulling relevant cables to help support Trainer visits.Administratively process visa/passport documentation and memos, as well as track submissions to the Special Issuance Agency (SIA) in support of Trainer travel to deliver overseas courses.Arrange visitors' access and assist with escorting visitors on campus.Initiate requests for OpenNet access and ID badges.Assist with the badging and on-boarding of interns.Write SOPs for LMS/CMT administrative tasks and help maintains SOP library.Attend LMS/CMT, FSI and Department meetings and activities which are directly related to supporting CMT, a benefit for the government and approved by COR, to include notetaking and preparation of summaries of discussions.Perform general editing and formatting of slides and correspondence.Assist in control of physical inventory items (books, articles, other supplies) in support of LMS/CMT courses.Assist in ordering course supplies from FSI catalog.Reserve rooms and equipment for official use. Resolves conflicts with room reservations on a peer-to-peer level; elevates as appropriate.Assist in re-ordering event supplies.Can serve as Timekeeper for LMS government staff.Basic Qualifications:High School Diploma.Secret Clearance.Minimum Qualifications:3 years of experience in related field, preferred.Bachelor’s Degree, preferred.Must be tactful, discrete, and articulate.Superior organizational, oral, written, communication skills.Requires a strong customer service orientation, good judgment, discretion, and flexibility.Must possess sound judgment and acquire a clear understanding of the organization’s mission and its programs.Projects/assignments may require basic research and editing of briefing materials (i.e. charts, graphics, or other presentation materials).Ability to prioritize his/her level of effort according to the degree of importance, urgency of tasks, and the specific issues.Ability to determine which LMS senior staff member should be included on what issues and when to engage those managers.Ability to multi-task and meet stringent deadlines.Proficient user of Microsoft Excel, SharePoint, PowerPoint, Word, Outlook as well as the ability to manipulate information in existing databases using software such as Access.To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.GAP Solutions provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job us at recruiting@gapsi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you. Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.Job Type: Full-time",463,Washington
4,Penetration Testing Manager,"Amazon Dev Center U.S., Inc.","Arlington, VA",None,"
BS in Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering or related field, or equivalent work experience
Minimum of 5 years of experience directly managing a team of at least five engineers
5+ years of working knowledge and understanding of security engineering, system and network security, authentication and security protocols, cryptography, and application security

Help us protect not only the Amazon Web Services (AWS) cloud computing environment but all of our customers as well! Since 2006, our great team at AWS has been enabling our customers to bring great ideas to life in ways that aren’t possible in traditional IT environments. With AWS you can flexibly harness compute, storage, security, and other services from across the globe as your business demands them.

AWS Security is on the cutting edge of many security issues for a wide variety of platforms and technologies including cloud services, Internet of things (IoT), identity and access management, mobile devices, virtualization and custom hardware, all operating at massive scale. Similarly, our highly collaborative team is committed to each team member’s growth as our business grows.

We are looking for a Penetration Testing Manager to lead our penetration testing team and help validate that our services, applications, and websites are secured against the latest threats. You will be responsible for managing a team of security engineers and third party vendors conducting penetration tests, evolving the security assurance process, manage third party vendors, and creating metrics to demonstrate your team’s performance. You will help set the direction for a team of security professionals that is responsible for all AWS products and services. This role combines long term strategic planning to raise the bar on security across the enterprise with the excitement and challenge of quickly reacting to new threat scenarios.

As a security engineering manager at Amazon, you will be expected to speak authoritatively on behalf of your team and your technical knowledge should demonstrate both depth and breadth. You will be responsible for your team’s organizational structure and how that team works within the context of the larger AWS Security team. Leveraging the strengths of individual team members, delegating tasks appropriately and managing delivery of long term projects will all be critical tasks for this role. A Technical Manager III has deep knowledge in their domain and is a sought after thought leader across the organization. They have both management and technical expertise and actively participate in the organization’s planning processes.

Managers in this role must define metrics to quickly and accurately present the team’s performance and variance against its goals. They must also participate in and/or coordinate segments of cross-AWS initiatives, communicating status and results effectively across the division. A Technical Manager III is expected to seek out stretch assignments for your current team and foster their professional career development.

Responsibilities:

Team management, growth, and organization
Professional development of team members
Project management
Metrics and projections
Driving security initiatives
Recruiting
Process Improvement

Our team also puts a high value on work-life balance. Striking a healthy balance between your personal and professional life is crucial to your happiness and success here, which is why we aren’t focused on how many hours you spend at work or online. Instead, we’re happy to offer a flexible schedule so you can have a more productive and well-balanced life—both in and outside of work.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.
Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.


Experience driving large, cross-organization initiatives
Experience managing communication with geographically distributed teams
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, especially experience with executive-level communications
Skilled at explaining complex technical issues in terms understandable by the business
Strong sense of ownership, urgency, and drive
Ability to make concrete progress in the face of ambiguity and imperfect knowledge (avoid “analysis paralysis”)
Experience with multiple programming languages (such as, Java, C++, Ruby, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience with vulnerability risk and impact assessment
Sharp analytical abilities and proven design skills
Experience providing training and mentorship
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role

Please reach out to AWS Recruiter, Courtney Schumm (@schummc) for more information.

Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.

#Appsec",463,Washington
5,"Program Officer, III",FHI 360,"Washington, DC 20009 (Adams Morgan area)",None,"FHI 360 is a nonprofit human development organization dedicated to improving lives in lasting ways by advancing integrated, locally driven solutions. Our staff includes experts in Health, Education, Nutrition, Environment, Economic Development, Civil Society, Gender, Youth, Research and Technology; creating a unique mix of capabilities to address today's interrelated development challenges. FHI 360 serves more than 60 countries, all 50 U.S. states and all U.S. territories.
The Civil Society and Peacebuilding (CSPB) department supports citizens to mobilize effectively to influence policy, improve lives and build peace. CSPB’s civil society programs enable citizens to solve their own problems and influence policy through programs that strengthen the leadership capacity of national and community organizations and increase the transparency of government agencies. CSPB’s peacebuilding programs use locally owned and sustainable tools to bridge differences and bring peace to divided communities. We also work to prevent and counter violent extremism with a focus on youth-led approaches.
 Our programs are in:
Civil society
Peacebuilding and conflict mitigation
Capacity development
Leadership development
Governance
Media
Job Summary:
CSPB seeks a Program Officer, III (PO-III) with at least 8 years’ professional experience to provide technical assistance and support to programs in the areas of civil society strengthening, governance, peacebuilding, preventing violent extremism, and youth engagement. Collects, compiles, and analyzes information relevant to programs. Provides administrative and project support, in addition to communication efforts related to program management and execution. Ensures compliance with internal and external regulations. Monitors budget for programs and develops monitoring system for reviewing project status. Ensures completion of program while adhering to budget, scope, and schedule requirements. Develops/Reviews work plans, prepares presentations, and supports other related program objectives and deliverables.
Foreign language proficiency is required (French, Spanish, Russian preferred)
Primary Responsibilities for the Program Officer III include, but are not limited to the following:
Responsibilities:
Oversees and represents the organization in all aspects of the program in coordination with project leaders.
Ensures integrity of design and implementation of program, achievement of project performance objective, and deliverables.
Provides technical, administrative, and operational support to program management teams, such as: troubleshooting, updates to work plans, travel coordination and program activities monitoring.
Tracks performance against Financial Cost Objective (FCO) ID, project timelines, budget, objectives, and deliverables.
Works with Project Manager on developing budgets, proposals, managing grants, project materials, and information.
Supports program/project to provide timely and high-quality deliverables to clients, including: work plans; programmatic, financial, technical reports;
Develops, reviews, and/or translates reports, briefing papers, press releases, and presentations.
Monitors budgets, ensuring accountability of all project activities.
Facilitates communication by answering partner inquires and monitoring project websites.
Designs, implements, and coordinates specific program activities and may conduct research to achieve program goals.
Documents and shares project accomplishments, challenges, and lessons learned among internal and external partners.
Develops and maintains relationships serving as the liaison for internal units, (finance, contracts, HR), as well as government officials, local communities, and other organizations.
Supports program design and business development efforts (e.g., identifying resource development opportunities; writing assigned sections; supporting budget preparation and general development of proposals).
Applied Knowledge & Skills:
Strong knowledge of concepts, practices and procedures with program design.
Excellent English language oral and written communication skills.
Proficiency in a foreign language, ideally French, Spanish, or Russian, is strongly preferred.
Excellent and demonstrated program/project management skills.
Ability to influence and collaborate with others.
Ability to analyze and interpret data, identify errors and prepare reports.
Education**
Bachelor's Degree or its International Equivalent required in one of the following subjects:
International Development/Affairs, Communications, Political Science, History, Education, Environment, Health, Knowledge/Information Services, Life/Social Sciences, or Related Field
Master’s degree or its International Equivalent strongly preferred in one of the following subjects:
International Development/Affairs, Communications, Political Science, History, Education, Environment, Health, Knowledge/Information Services, Life/Social Sciences, or Related Field
** Or an equivalent combination of relevant education and/or experience sufficient to successfully perform the key responsibilities of the job.
Experience:
At least 8 years’ professional experience in a non-governmental organization (NGO), government agency, or private organization
Articulate and professional, able to communicate in a clear, positive fashion with clients and staff;
Overseas/international experience is highly desired;
Must be able to read, write, and speak fluent English;
Proficiency in a foreign language (i.e., French, Spanish, Russian, others) is required;
Prior team lead/leadership experience preferred.
Demonstrated experience working in international development in the sectors of civil society strengthening and/or capacity building; youth mobilization and engagement; governance; peacebuilding; preventing/countering violent extremism or related topics.
Substantial experience using computerized information systems; and
Strong research and analytical skills.
This job posting summarizes the main duties of the job. It neither prescribes nor restricts the exact tasks that may be assigned to carry out these duties. This document should not be construed in any way to represent a contract of employment. Management reserves the right to review and revise this document at any time.
FHI 360 is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer whereby we do not engage in practices that discriminate against any person employed or seeking employment based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national or ethnic origin, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, protected Veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",463,Washington
6,Secretary III,ITSC Secure Solutions,"Bethesda, MD 20889",None,"Description: Division: Defense Health Agency (DHA) Administration and Management SupportPosition: Secretary IIIFLSA Status: ExemptEmployment Status: Regular, Full-TimeLocation: Bethesda, MarylandClearance Required: TBDGeneral Summary: The contractor shall provide technical review support of all Institutional Review Board (IRB) documents, data, protocols, reports, methods, specifications, presentations, abstracts, manuscripts, posters and other communication products for internal and external audiences for the Office of Command Communications/Public Affairs at Walter Reed National Military Medical Center (WRNMMC), Bethesda, Maryland.Requirements: a) Proficient skills with the use of Microsoft applications. Good communication skills both oral and in writing, and must have a good command of the English Language. Ability to speak clear legible English.b) Knowledge of the office procedures, filing system and various references and handbooks commonly used by the staff in order to classify, search for, and dispose of materials.c) Knowledge of substantive programs.d) Ability to resolve complex problems autonomously through research of the service as they relate to the administrative functions of the office sufficient to screen requests for information, personally provide authorized information from files and records or advise on established procedures, assemble information for use in reports, follow up on commitments made in meetings, and refer non-routine requests to the appropriate staff member.e) Ability to resolve complex problems autonomously through research analyze a process and suggest process improvement options, work independently and with minimal supervision and to maintain confidential information.f) High-end skills in word processing with standard office automation software, and/or related equipment (e.g., printers, fax machines, etc.,), using a standard keyboard. Must have research editing experience.g) High-end knowledge of processing procedures and functions for several varieties of software to produce a wide range of documents to enhance productivity or meet the needs of complex formats. (Power Point, Excel, other Spread sheets, graphs, Publisher, etc.)h) Knowledge of basic design graphics and fonts and ability to design simple flyers and graphs for Command-wide distribution using Word Office Suite, (Adobe InDesign, Power Point, Excel, other Spread sheets, graphs, Publisher, Safari, Chrome, Firefox etc.).i) Ability to analyze, integrate and act upon a large amount of information or customer service data quickly.j) Ability to manage multiple projects at one time, meet deadlines and complete projects in a stressful but challenging environment. Ability to influence senior leadership, and guide subordinates. Understanding of the chain of command and how to utilize it effectively.k) Excellent interpersonal/written communication skills enabling the incumbent to establish and maintain effective relationships with, and gain the cooperation of, supervisors, managers, co-workers, and personnel in other departments.l) Ability to understand, synthesize and utilize this information. He or she must be adept and experienced at communicating, motivating and leading colleagues and subordinates to meet the goals of the organization.m) The incumbent will need to function in a work environment which may frequently shift priorities and critical/focal issues in response to changing needs and a developing organizational structure, both within and beyond WRNMMC and the NCA. Adaptability and flexibility will be requisite, in order to maximize resources and achieve efficient, effective communication operations. Performance requires the ability to understand multiple means/types of health care service delivery/providers and to effectively convey the parameters, availability and desirability of these resources to the Office of Command CommunicationsSummary: a) Provide administrative support for the CCS and Chairpersons of subcommittees of ECOMS.b) Receive and screen calls.c) Coordinate executive level staff calendars, schedule appointments, conferences and official meetings.d) Review and proofread outgoing correspondences and reports.e) Gather process and distribute mail and other correspondence for the CCS, ECOMS and ECOMS subcommittees.f) Take meeting minutes and notes and type correspondence.g) Maintain accurate email distribution lists for members of the clinical staff.h) Prepare the agenda and disseminate to staff members.i) Update the CLINICIAN’S CORNER website regularly.j) Prepare orders for supplies.k) Recommend operational and financial budget plans and forecast to staff members.l) Keep track of the budget processes and formulations by reviewing reports and accounting records to determine if allocated funds have been spent as specified.m) Coordinate work flow between executive level staff members of WRNMMC, Walter Reed National Military Medical Center, Joint Task Force CAPMED, BUMED and the Uniformed Services University Of the Health Sciences.n) Coordinate and schedule quarterly meetings of the Medical Staff.o) Administrative support for the CCS and Chairpersons of 10 subcommittees of ECOMSp) Prepare the agenda and minutes for multiple meetings, committees and distribute to over 2000 staff Membersq) Average 20 meetings per month, 44 conferences and official meetings for executive level staffITSC Secure Solutions, LLC (ITSC) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer and provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in its job application procedures. If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to access job openings or apply for a job on this site as a result of your disability by contacting the Human Resources/Recruiting Department.All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, genetic information, ancestry, marital status, disability, protected Veteran status or any other protected status by federal, state or local law. ITSC participates in the E-Verify program.Job Types: Full-time, ContractBenefits:401(k)401(k) matchingDental insuranceEmployee assistance programHealth insuranceHealth savings accountLife insurancePaid time offReferral programRetirement planVision insuranceSchedule:Monday to FridayApplication Question(s):Do you have efficient knowledge in office procedures, filing procedures and handbooks?Experience:Microsoft Office: 3 years (Required)Work Location:One locationWork Remotely:No",463,Washington
7,Functional Management Operational Support (Entry Level) PD,Chrysalis4Wealth Inc.,"Alexandria, VA",None,"Summary:

The Functional Management (FM) Operational Support (Entry Level) is associated with the C4W Aspirant program. It is intended to train, mentor and develop future business managers/owners. The selected candidate serves as a principle team member supporting C4W leadership in the planning, implementation and normalization of enterprise-wide day-to-day, monthly, and year-end marketing, community outreach, financial services and tax school operations. The FM consults with C4W leadership to provide accurate assessment of current challenges, implementation of solutions, and aids in ensuring organizational clarity when developing and implementing strategic direction and guidance. Additionally, the FM acts in a fiduciary capacity in the execution of his/her internal and external duties.

Key Attributes:

Possess basic mathematic skills
Ability to obtain a functional knowledge of IRS Tax Laws and willingness to involve in continuous education
Ability and willingness to obtain functional knowledge of financial service (risk mitigation and financial planning) and commitment to pursue continuous education
Excellent verbal and written skills in Proficient in English
Ability to multi-task
Ability to establish priorities
Organize efficiently
Knowledge of computers and familiarity with Microsoft, Liberty Tax and C4W productivity software

Duties:

I. Functional Management: Assisting the Chrysalis4Wealth, Inc CEO/Managing Partner(s) with the day-to-day, montly, and year-end operations.

i. Support staffing activities to include, job posting, interviewing and hiring activities

ii. Support development and implementation of entity-level strategic planning and operational procedures

iii. Support entity-level annual budget preparation

iv. Promote Chrysalis4Wealth’s culture of personal and professional growth development

v. Support online posting, preparation and presentation of John Maxwell Team (JMT), Dreamtrip, and Chrysalis Protection and Wealth Solutions (CPAWS) activities

vi. Provide year-round quality client service, prepare accurate tax returns, check returns, offer insurance policies and financial related product and services (if applicable), and performs general office duties all in accordance with the Company's policies and procedures

vii. Perform other duties and tasks as needed and assigned.

II. Marketing: Assist C4W leadership with Marketing campaign activities to seed for a fruitful tax season and generate year-round insurance and financial services clients.

i. Support the planning and execution of the Guerrilla Marketing and public relations programs and activities in accordance with (IAW) Company’s policies and procedures (to include wearing C4W and Liberty attire when appropriate)

1. Coordinate with C4W leadership to develop the annual marketing plan

2. Support tax School marketing and advertising activities

3. Work with C4W leadership to develop and implement Plus Services marketing activities (insurance, bookkeeping, notary, ITINs, etc)

III. Hispanic Brand Outreach: Support entity-level Hispanic Certification and Siempre Tax Plus Services integration activities

i. Coordinate with C4W leadership to market and establish a fiduciary relationship with individuals, non-governmental organizations (NGOs), and businesses in the Hispanic community

ii. Research, develop and implement strategy to partnership with NGO and immigrant help groups

IV. Tax School: Support annual Tax School activities, as needed to provide a top quality, highly trained tax preparers. Related responsibilities may include but are not limited to helping the principal:

i. Develop tax season class schedules, advertise, and recruit candidates for tax school

ii. Conduct administrative management of Tax School to include tracking inquiries, phone calls and student enrollments

iii. Provide input for curriculum enhancement…designs and develops curriculum content, training materials, training modules, teaching aids

iv. Manage, create and maintain setup documentation for compliance. This includes program binders, syllabi, textbooks, etc.

v. Develop and formalize a robust quality assurance review process of existing training program

vi. Establish a process to review and include feedback from end of course surveys, and student evaluations into the quality assurance and course maintenance processes.

vii. Plan, develop and produce curriculum materials, processes and best practices that highly effective in improving student outcomes.

viii. Continuously improve student outcomes through the seamless integration of seasoned tax preparer experience

V. Financial Services Support: The primary purpose of the Financial Services support is to perform moderately complex administrative and client services tasks for the business owner, putting the needs of the client first and providing exceptional service every single time.

i. Establishing new accounts and processing account changes; submitting new business, changes, deposits, etc. to home office

ii. Reviewing, tracking and monitoring all pending business and service requests to ensure follow up and completion; reviewing and responding to Customer Service Log (CSL) issues, keeping the Advisor updated on problem logs and escalating to back office management as needed

iii. Maintaining calendar for financial advisors and firm; scheduling appointments with clients, prospects, wholesalers and others; preparing outbound call list

iv. Preparing and mailing correspondence and marketing materials; assembling prospect and new client packets

v. Preparing for and attending client events

vi. Developing and maintaining files in a manner that facilitates rapid retrieval and satisfies all broker/dealer compliance requirements

vii. Maintaining cash and securities received blotter to the specifications of broker/dealer

viii. Maintaining firm’s procedures and recovery manual and developing, refining, writing and updating procedures and checklists related to each job function of the position

ix. May also perform special projects as assigned.

x. Income tax data entry/preparation

VI. Professional Development: Maintain up to date in job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities as determined by C4W needs; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks and participating in professional organizations.",463,Washington
8,Systems Technician III,General Dynamics Information Technology,"Chantilly, VA 20151",None,"Travel Required: Less than 10%
Public Trust: None
Requisition Type: Regular
GDIT is seeking candidates to support the US Army Intelligence and Security Command (INSCOM). Under the I2TS 3 task order, INSCOM ensures reliable, uninterrupted availability of Command, Control, Communications, Computers, and Information Management (C4IM) including: networks, hardware, software, engineering, and specialized tools at the point of customer need to support INSCOMs mission. INSCOM and its MSCs provide the enabling layer to connect the Army and its tactical formations to defense and national intelligence agencies via tactical networks. The ability to provide mission critical intelligence is dependent on the successful use of its information technology (IT) networks worldwide
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides first contact and incident resolution to customers with hardware, software, and application problems. Includes both customer telephone support as well as electronically submitted requests
Provides polite and friendly customer service
Attempts to resolve as many incidents during the first contact, or at Tier I. Efficiently escalates incidents to higher Tier II or Tier III when required
Documents incident status and solutions in incident database tools
Possesses current working knowledge of computers, printers, laptops, and common windows applications
Works through various types Tier II issues with telephone assist
Provides answers to Frequently Asked Questions or solutions to common problems as part of a customer self-help capability
Perform troubleshooting, maintenance, and repair on many types of hardware and software
Assist in repairing computers, printers, digital senders, etc.
Perform Level I/II Active Directory functions such as unlocking accounts, creating and issuing accounts, etc.
Desirable Skills / Experience:
Knowledge of the principles, methods, and techniques used in network administration and support
Knowledge of related hardware and software
Required Certification(s):
DoD 8570.01-M IAT Level II Computing Environment (CE) Certification as determined by the Program Manager is required prior to support on contract
Required Security Environment Certification: CompTIA Security+ CE or equivalent
Computing Environment certification: MTA 98-365, Windows Server Administrator Fundamentals.
Security Clearance:
TS/SCI required
Additional:
Candidates must be willing and able to attain a CI Polygraph for certain positions as determined by the contract
Position may require lifting of objects (i.e. IT Hardware), reaching/bending/kneeling (i.e. plug in cables) and other moderately strenuous activity
High School diploma/GED with 8 years of related experience, or Associate’s degree with 6 years of experience, or Bachelor’s degree with with 4 years of experience
#GDITINSCOM
#I2TS3
We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",463,Washington
9,Project Manager III,MAXIMUS,"Falls Church, VA 22042",None,"Job Description Summary WD USA:

This position (Project Manager Level III) is contingent upon award

This position is to join the leadership team of an IT project delivering mission critical services of national importance at a major cabinet agency. It is comprised of a series of legacy systems in disparate technologies that support significant processing volume upon which several cross-agency business processes depend. This position will be a senior representative of Maximus for the project and will be responsible for and/or participate in the management of contract transition, systems operations and maintenance, technology and operational enhancements, technology modernization, end user services, fulfillment of all contract terms and requirements and continuous improvement.


The Project Manager (PM) will oversee several aspects of the project including managing and leading a team. The project requires the development and management of small short-term projects based on customer needs. The PM must work with the team to analyze new and complex project-related problems and identify innovative and practical solutions. The PM will develop and manage project schedules, reports, client meetings and presentations, and the financial management of the project. The PM may be asked to develop short-range plans for systems’ enhancements development, systems maintenance, and production activities for necessary support resources.

The PM is responsible for client management and relationship building, team management and coaching, overseeing the team’s software development lifecycle, operations and maintenance in a multi-system environment, leadership for multiples projects/schedules, and subcontractors. The PM serves as a liaison between clients, other stakeholders and the Maximus. Overall, the ideal candidate will lead with the following primary project components:

Legacy system SDLC and operations and maintenanceDate Center OperationsOutreach and Help Desk OperationsData Management and SharingSystems Modernization (e.g., COBOL to Java; Mainframe to Cloud)
Essential Job Duties:
Project(s) financial management and adherence to Maximus targets
Leadership oversight for project schedules, adherence to performance metrics, overall achievement of outcomes, results and deliverables to support the business in delivering the contract requirements.
Ensure consistency and compliance with all company and program business rules as well as performance standardsClient relationship management. Know and understand the client’s environment that enables the team to successfully deliver the client’s needs.
Promote effective partnerships in a multi-contractor environmentLead and champion systems modernization while maintaining the legacy systemsFacilitate effective data management and data sharing across a large stakeholder baseProvide responsive customer service through the program help deskMaintain system security and data confidentiality standardsOversight for the continuity of operations as part of maintenance approach and modernization strategyOversee the quality and timeliness of contractually-required reports and deliverablesParticipate with project and executive management to establish strategic plans, objectives, initiatives, and work plansDevelop performance goals and objectives for senior managers. Work with program manager to develop performance goals for staff and monitor the achievement of those goals.
Identify any potential problem areas, recommend solutions, and work closely and cooperatively with the client to resolve issues quickly and fairlyProvide direction to team members and resolves problems in a timely and professional mannerFacilitate communication on project status, to include applicable corrective and preventive actions to leadershipFollow processes and operational policies to ensure project budgets and related financial schedules meet corporate requirementsOversee Subcontractor performance, provide status reports and assessments internallyDevelop, modify and execute project policies, ensuring all project team members are in complianceChampions risk and issue management, and participates in mitigation and contingency actions to address the risksPerform other duties as assigned by the program managerLead and manage the prioritization of changes and continuous improvement
Education and Experience Requirements
Bachelor's Degree from an accredited college or university required; Master's Degree preferredPMI Project Management Professional (PMP) Certification requiredAt least seven (7) years of related work experience requiredAt least five (5) to ten (7) years’ experience with managing and leading Federal projects
Knowledge of Application Operations and Maintenance and ITSM practices and principlesKnowledge of Federal contracting processDemonstrated ability to successfully manage teams serving different functionsBroad applied knowledge and experience with methods and standards of IT application development and program service deliveryDeep knowledge of and expertise in applying project management methodology, tools and techniques, software development methods and approaches and operational service delivery methods and practicesExpert working knowledge of and expertise in risk management and governance, configuration management, disaster recovery and quality assuranceBroad knowledge of IT and competency profiles for effective team mobilization and resource assignment for projectsExpertise in working with subcontractors to meet contract goals and objectivesStrong communication and negotiation skills including the ability to negotiate priorities, resources, etc.
Experience with dispersed multi-location teams (including subcontractors)Experience managing an operations and/or development program with an annual contract value above $20 Million requiredExperience with Earned Value Management, requiredExperience with a diverse set of stakeholders and stakeholder management including multiple office, entities (including other contractors) within the sponsoring agency, states, other federal agencies and other stakeholdersExcellent organizational, written, and verbal communication skillsAbility to perform comfortably in a fast-paced, deadline-oriented work environmentAbility to work as a team member, as well as independently
Preferred Experience:
Experience managing large projects following a traditional/waterfall SDLC methodology, preferredExperience with IBM Mainframe operations preferred
Experience with Mainframe modernization preferredExperience with HHS’ Enterprise Performance Life Cycle (EPLC) preferredExperience with Agile development methodologies (such as SAFe, Scrum) preferredExperience with CMMI and other Quality frameworks preferredExperience with ITIL Certification preferred
Â Job Summary:

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Manage multiple development projects, development groups and/or application support functions.
- Oversee the development and implementation of multiple, complex, organization- wide systems.
Define and manage resource requirements and allocations.Develop and implement application programs.Manage operational leads on addressing issues relative to production and processing.Direct, motivate and develop staff, maximizing their individual contribution, professional growth and ability to function effectively with their colleagues as a team.
Minimum Requirements:
Bachelor's degree with 7+ years of project management experience.Delivers multiple small and large projects with high values and high risk.Provides leadership for the project team to ensure that the project is delivered to specifications, on time and within budget.Develops innovative methodologies, techniques, and criteria for projects.Advanced knowledge of workflows and project mapping.Facilitates the tracking and resolution of issues impacting projects.
Project/Position Introduction (MAX 500 Characters): Since 1975, Maximus has operated under its founding mission of Helping Government Serve the People, enabling citizens around the globe to successfully engage with their governments at all levels and across a variety of health and human services programs. Maximus delivers innovative business process management and technology solutions that contribute to improved outcomes for citizens and higher levels of productivity, accuracy, accountability and efficiency of government-sponsored programs. With more than 30,000 employees worldwide, Maximus is a proud partner to government agencies in the United States, Australia, Canada, Saudi Arabia, Singapore and the United Kingdom. For more information, visit https://www.maximus.com. EEO Statement: EEO Statement: Active military service members, their spouses, and veteran candidates often embody the core competencies Maximus deems essential, and bring a resiliency and dependability that greatly enhances our workforce. We recognize your unique skills and experiences, and want to provide you with a career path that allows you to continue making a difference for our country. We’re proud of our connections to organizations dedicated to serving veterans and their families. If you are transitioning from military to civilian life, have prior service, are a retired veteran or a member of the National Guard or Reserves, or a spouse of an active military service member, we have challenging and rewarding career opportunities available for you. A committed and diverse workforce is our most important resource. Maximus is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer. Maximus provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disabled status.",463,Washington
10,Service Desk Manager,Booz Allen Hamilton,"Arlington, VA",None,"Key Role:
Lead a team of technicians directly supporting Cabinet level DoD staff to respond to all issues or requests that arise in an expedient manner. Provide Tier I support, field phone calls from the user community, log issues and requests into ticketing systems, and perform basic troubleshooting over the phone. Provide onsite Tier 2 support at the customer’s location. Respond to all issues or requests that arise in an expedient manner and support VIP customers in a fast-paced environment. Help team members improve their technical and customer service skills. Conduct in-depth troubleshooting or resolution of failed OS deployments, including working with vendors such as Microsoft, Adobe, Dell, or others and work with firmware and patching compliance teams to resolve issues.
Basic Qualifications:
8+ years of experience with supporting DoD or other government organizations as a member of a 24/7 service desk
5+ years of experience with managing a team of 10 or more individuals
5+ years of experience with troubleshooting Windows desktop hardware and software
Experience with managing multiple ongoing projects and tasks, managing team members’ work schedules, and providing directions to team members on handling complex issues or projects
Experience interfacing with high level government staff using verbal and written expertise
Ability to develop and implement a proactive approach to identifying and handling potential issues
TS/SCI clearance
BA or BS degree
DoD 8570 IAT II Certification, including Security+ and Computing Environment Certificate
Ability to obtain HDI Support Center Analyst certification within 60 days of hire
Additional Qualifications:
Experience with developing training requirements and materials to be presented and implemented within a team
BA or BS degree in IT or related field; MA or MS degree preferred
DoD 8570 IAT III or IAM II Certification
Clearance:
Applicants selected will be subject to a security investigation and may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; TS/SCI clearance is required.
We’re an EOE that empowers our people—no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other protected characteristic—to fearlessly drive change.",463,Washington
11,"CCC Program Manager, Level III",Azimuth Corporation,"Washington, DC 20002 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"This Position is Contingent Upon Contract Award*Citizenship: Must be a US Citizen*Clearance Required: Top Secret/SCI*Job Summary**The Defense Intelligence Agency’s mission is to provide all-source defense intelligence to prevent strategic surprise and deliver a decisive advantage to war fighters, defense planners, and policy makers. Our users include war fighters and interagency partners that defend America’s national security interests.This opportunity supports the transition to Intelligence Community Information Technology Environment (IC ITE), Joint Information Environment (JIE), and other IC efforts while improving mission capabilities, data migration, capacity planning, systems/infrastructure engineering, and support activities for IC ITE and enterprise operations.*Roles and Responsibilities*Provides overall management support for the CCC Task Order to ensure all projects move together toward meeting established goals and objectives.**Education, Experience and SkillsBachelor's degree, preferably with a major in computer science, management information systems, business administration, cybersecurity or a related fieldAt least 6 to 9 years of experiencePM Certification preferredShall be fully certified IAW DOD Directive 8570 and 8140 in order to receive access to DOD IT systemsMust be analytical and effectively able to troubleshoot and prioritize needs, requirements, and other issues. Aside from technical skills, prospective candidates should have excellent communication, teamwork, leadership and conflict management skills**Physical Requirements / TravelNormal office environment*Azimuth Overview*Azimuth is an award-winning Woman Owned Small Business specializing in providing research and development and professional services support to the federal government. Azimuth's agility, customer driven approach and our commitment to our employees allows us to meet and exceed our client goals. Excellence, Integrity, Accountability, Community and Humility are the core values of Azimuth as we continue to strive as a recognized leader in the management consulting community that both federal agencies and industry partners value doing business with. We are an organization that offers both our employees and clients an exceptional experience; our culture will be contagious, while always maintaining a genuine reputation.*Disclaimer*The above information on this description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.Azimuth Corporation does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, genetic information, age, membership in an employee organization, retaliation, parental status, military service, or other non-merit factor.Job Type: Full-time",463,Washington
12,Information System Security Manager III,Triumph Enterprises,"Washington, DC 20003 (Capitol Hill area)",None,"***This position is contingent upon contract award
Beyond your technical expertise (outlined below), you must be resourceful, detail-oriented, and 100% client focused, with a continuing passion for your profession. The rewards of joining Triumph Enterprises will include competitive compensation, exceptional benefits, matching 401K, and professional/training development allowances that exceed many companies of larger size and stature. Built around four core values, our employees, managers and leadership team work collaboratively to grow and sustain a Triumph Culture where:
“Client focus” has earned the trust and loyalty of our valued clients.
“Integrity” has earned us a reputation for doing the right thing in all situations.
“Imagination” and innovation has created new and exciting opportunities for both our company and our people.
“Employee Engagement” has resulted in benefits, promotions from within, a balanced work environment, professional development/training, social opportunities, and a culture of empowerment where our employees are as equally valued as our clients.

Triumph Enterprises is currently looking for a Information System Security Manager III to join a contract with a federal government client with an important mission. In this role, you will have the opportunity to work with a great team while serving a fulfilling mission. In this contract, you will be supporting the Navy’s submarine combat system subsystems, consultation, command, control, communications, computers, and intelligence to aid in integrating all systems into a single combat system for naval battle group interconnectivity. This candidate will be responsible for providing day-to-day system security operations by ensuring that operational security is maintained for an information system.
Responsibilities
The successful candidate will work directly with our government client and support team members to:
Oversees and manages information security program implementation within the organization or other area of responsibility.
Perform security analysis of operational and development environments, threats, vulnerabilities, and internal interfaces to define and assess compliance with accepted industry and government standards.
Manages strategy, personnel, infrastructure, policy enforcement, emergency planning, security awareness, and/or other resources.
Create and maintain System Security Plans, Security Control Traceability Matrixes, Plan of Actions and Milestones, and all other RMF documentation required for supported systems.
Acquire and manage the necessary resources, including leadership support, financial resources, and key security personnel, to support information technology (IT) security goals, and reduce overall organizational risk.
Assist with management of Authorization and Assessment processes for multiple authorities to operate across multiple sites.
Work with team members to develop briefings and presentations in support of the program.
Maintain the Security Authorization or Certification and Accreditation of their assigned system.
Produce required reporting for various management levels.
Coordinate and communicate with multiple ISSOs to ensure compliance with regulations and internal policies.
Prepare program communications and documentation including executive briefings, talking points, program milestones, weekly reports, etc.
Proactively identify issues and risks, and work with the team for timely resolutions.
Leverage best practices, techniques, and tools for quality control, project planning, execution, project management, ongoing milestone tracking, communication, and key performance metrics
Develop and build excellent relationships with prospects, clients, and internal team members.
Lead client calls and communications including the development of presentations, status reports, and requirements documents.

Required Experience
Must have an active Secret clearance with eligibility to obtain a TS clearance.
Masters’ degree from accredited University or CNSSI 4012 or NDU CISO certificate or NDU CIO certificate or AQD GA8. or successful completion of military training course: NEC 2779 (CIN: A-531-0009) or 3372 or (EKMS Manager CIN W-3B-1500 ) or A-4C-1340 (KMI) (or DOD Service equivalent)
At least 5+ years of specialized entry in information systems security management.
Certification in either GSLC or CISSP or CISM or CAP or CASP
Working knowledge of system functions, security policies, technical security safeguards, and operational security measures.
Understanding of system methodologies including but not limited to client server, web hosting, web content servers, policy servers, directory servers, firewalls, WAN, LAN, switches, & routers.
Experience with submarines, undersea weapons and warfare is highly desired.
Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal skills.
Exceptionally self-motivated, directed, and detail oriented.
Must be able to learn, understand and apply new technologies.
Excellent organizational, analytical and problem-solving abilities.
Working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, and SharePoint).

Desired Elements
Experience with government contracting firms supporting the Federal government.

Triumph is a veteran owned company specializing in Cybersecurity, Business Intelligence, Analytics, and Data Visualization, Program Management, Acquisitions Support, Engineering, and IT Service. Incorporated in Virginia in 2005, Triumph has risen to meet the Federal Government’s growing need for protecting critical infrastructure and key resources, problem solving using business intelligence, and providing acquisition and program management expertise; while cultivating a track record of success. Our pursuit of excellence is driven by an emphasis on Client Focus, Integrity, Imagination, and Employee Engagement – the Core Values that motivate and inspire our leadership, business practices, and company culture. For more information on Triumph, visit http://triumph-enterprises.com/.
Triumph participates in e-Verify. We provide the Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) with information from each new employee’s I-9 Form to confirm work authorization. Triumph is an equal opportunity employer and gives consideration for employment to qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other status defined by law. Go to www.triumph-enterprises.com to learn more about Triumph.",463,Washington
13,IT Business Process Engineer III,"Koniag, Inc.","Washington, DC 20001 (Shaw area)",None,"Eagle Harbor Solutions (EHS), a Koniag Government Services company, is looking for a highly qualified, experienced and self-motivated individual to perform the duties of an IT Business Process Engineer III to support EHS and our government customer in the DC Metro area.
We offer competitive compensation and an extraordinary benefits package including health, dental and vision insurance, 401K with company matching, flexible spending accounts, paid holidays, three weeks paid time off, and more.
The IT Business Process Engineer applies process engineering and improvement methodologies and principles to conducting process modernization programs. Responsible for effective transitioning of existing program and program teams, and for facilitating program teams' accomplishment of program activities and objectives. Provides group facilitation, interviewing, training, and additional forms of knowledge transfer. Key coordinator among multiple program teams to ensure enterprise wide integration of engineering efforts
Responsibilities:
Develop and maintain methodologies and processes pertaining to the management of IA programs, projects, and initiatives as well as the management of strategies as it matures over time.
Manage a knowledge management repository to centralize the communications, business processes, templates, SOPs; Operating Manuals and other materials required to support the IA business activities.
Create and maintain standard IA Business Processes, Standard Operating Procedures for all IA Subject Areas
Provide a consistent way of assessing, selecting, prioritizing, budgeting, and contributing to the organization’s strategic interest.
Assess, recommend, implement, and manage any required management tools to minimize the amount of manual process and improve productivity.
Establish a mechanism for filling resource gaps provides a core set of professional Project Managers and project support staff (Cyber Analysts, SA&A staff, Org. Change Management, Project Controls, etc.) that are deployed to various projects through the PMO’s resource management function.
Support the enhancement and execution of an IA Governance Structure.
Support activities centered around policy, procedures, and awareness, which may include strategic planning and alignment, policy enhancement and enforcement, security best practices, standard operating procedures, and enterprise education and awareness.

Required Qualifications:
Knowledge and experience with Cyber Security Programs, and NIST Risk Management Framework required
8 years of program related experience. Substitution Advanced degree equivalent to two (2) years of experience.
At least one (1) certification with focus on Program Management including PMP, PgMP, or CISM. Other certifications or advanced degree/experience may be allowable in substitution
Experience and competency with:
CSAM (or similar tool i.e. TAF, Archer, Xacta, etc.)
Privacy Programs (PII)
Incident Management solutions
eDiscovery/Forensic Management solutions
Governance & Risk Management & Compliance Support
Ability to work in a fast-paced, demanding environment
Excellent organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Ability to prioritize duties based on shifting demands
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Desirable:
College degree in Information Security or relevant field

Working Environment & Conditions
This position is primarily indoors, consistent with a standard office position and has a noise level of mostly low to moderate. The incumbent is required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. The work load may require the incumbent to sit for extended periods of time. The incumbent must be able to read, do simple math calculations and withstand moderate amounts of stress. The incumbent must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 lbs. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus.
Our Equal Employment Opportunity Policy
The company is an equal opportunity employer. The company shall not discriminate against any employee or applicant because of race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity (except where gender is a bona fide occupational qualification), national origin, age, disability, military/veteran status, marital status, genetic information or any other factor protected by law. We are committed to equal employment opportunity in all decisions related to employment, promotion, wages, benefits and all other privileges, terms and conditions of employment.
The company is dedicated to seeking all qualified applicants. If you require an accommodation to navigate or to apply to a position on our website, please contact Heaven Wood via e-mail at accommodations@koniag.com or by calling 703-488-9377 to request accommodations. This contact information is used for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire on a status of your application.",463,Washington
14,Urdu Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Urdu Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
15,Urdu Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Urdu Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
16,Supervisory IT Program Manager (INFOSEC/PLCYPLN),"US Offices, Boards and Divisions","Washington, DC","$144,128 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
The primary purpose of this position is to provide the overall direction and oversight for the Security, Compliance and Internal Controls (SCIC) section, including personnel management, strategy development, security assessment, and operations direction that provides a disciplined, reliable approach to the management of systems in Service Delivery Staff (SDS).
Responsibilities
Advises IT experts throughout Service Deliver Staff (SDS) on a variety of situations and issues that involve applying or adapting new theories, concepts, standards and practices.
Plans and coordinates SDS wide implementation of government wide IT security defense strategies.
Manages policies, government standards, security training and education for roles throughout SDS.
Formulates implementation of long-range security policies for SDS and management guidelines for complex and changing information technology systems.
Drafts, updates, edits, and reviews policies, documents compliance controls, and identifies required supporting materials.
Recommends selections for subordinate supervisory positions, work leaders, group leaders, and project director positions responsible for coordinating the work of others.
Provide administrative and technical supervision necessary for accomplishing the work.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - Business travel required approximately 10% of the time.
Supervisory status
Yes
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
2210 Information Technology Management
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
You must be a United States Citizen or National.
This position requires the candidate to be able to hold a security clearance at the TOP SECRET/SCI security clearance.
You may be required to complete a one-year probationary or two-year trial period.
Selective Service registration is required for males born on, or after, December 31st 1959. Those not registered should have an approved exemption on file.
You must meet all eligibility requirements by the closing date of this announcement and continue to meet these requirements throughout the hiring process. Offers can be rescinded if requirements are not met.
This position requires you to submit a Confidential Financial Disclosure Report (OGE-450) upon entry, and annually thereafter.
Additional selections may be made from this announcement, for up to 90 days, if openings occur in other offices serviced by Justice Management Division.
This position requires a Federal Acquisition Certificate for Contracting Officers Representative (FAC-COR) and/or Federal Acquisition Certificate for Program Manager (FAC-PM) Level III within 12 months of appointment.
This position is supervisory as defined by the Office of Personnel Management's (OPM) General Schedule Supervisory Guide (GSSG). A one year probation to assess your ability to perform supervisory duties is required unless previously completed.
This position is a Testing Designated Position (TDP). Applicants must pass a drug screen prior to employment and be subject to random drug testing for the duration of employment.
Qualifications
To qualify for the position of Supervisory IT Program Manager (INFOSEC/PLCYPLN) at (GS-2210-15), you must meet the basic qualification requirements listed below AND possess the required specialized experience specific to this series and grade you're applying to.


If you are a current or former government employee on a permanent appointment in the competitive service, you will need to demonstrate 1-year (52-weeks) at the next lower grade level, to meet the time-in-grade requirements for this occupational series and grade.

Basic Qualifications for the position are as follows:

1. Attention to Detail - Is thorough when performing work and conscientious about attention to detail.
2. Customer Service - Works with clients and customers (that is, any individuals who use or receive the services or products that your work unit produces, including the general public, individuals who work in the agency, other agencies, or organizations outside the Government)to assess their needs, provide information or assistance, resolve their problems, or satisfy their expectations; knows about available products and services; is committed to providing quality products and services.
3. Oral Communication - Expresses information (for example, ideas or facts) to individuals or groups effectively, taking into account the audience and nature of the information (for example, technical, sensitive, controversial); makes clear and convincing oral presentations;listens to others, attends to nonverbal cues, and responds appropriately.
4. Problem Solving - Identifies problems; determines accuracy and relevance of information; uses sound judgment to generate and evaluate alternatives, and to make recommendations,

Specialized Experience Statement: One year of specialized experience which includes organizing activities for the implementation of cybersecurity policies, security training, compliance initiatives, and cyber defense strategies; experience with various IT technology domains, networks, software development, security operations, and cloud service providers; and overseeing, planning, directing, and administrating the work through subordinates. This definition of specialized experience is typical of work performed at the second lower grade/level position in the federal service (GS 14).

You MUST meet all qualification requirements, including Time-in-Grade, by the closing date of this announcement, 06/23/2021.

Your resume must support your responses to the online questionnaire and the qualification requirements. Failure to do so may result in an ineligible rating.

See the Required Documents section for important notes about what must be included in your resume.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
The bullets below outline the various groups of applicants that fall under the term ""status candidates"". This vacancy is open to applicants from any of the groups listed below: When you apply you'll have the chance to claim an eligibility pathway, be sure you fully read each statement and any links provided to make sure you know which eligibility you qualify for.

See a full list and learn more at USAJOBS, see: What does Status Candidate mean? or Which Jobs am I Eligible to Apply for?

CURRENT AND FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEES: For more information, see USAJOBS Federal Employees.
CAREER TRANSITION PROGRAMS (CTAP or ICTAP): For more information visit: USAJOBS Career Transition Programs
VETERANS AND MILITARY SPOUSES: Please see USAJOBS Veterans Preference for more details.
SCHEDULE A, PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES Learn more at USAJOBS - Individuals with Disabilities.
General Employment Information:
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION: Our policy can be found at: https://www.justice.gov/jmd/eeos/manual-and-procedures-providing-reasonable-accommodation
DOJ EEO STATEMENT: The U.S. Department of Justice fosters an inclusive and diverse workforce, find our EEO statement online at: http://www.justice.gov/jmd/eeos/08-eeo-policy.pdf
SELECTIVE SERVICE: If you were born male, on or after December 31, 1959, you must certify that you have registered with the Selective Service System, or are exempt from having to do so under the Selective Service Law. Additional information is found at: www.sss.gov.


How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications described above.
Once the announcement closes, a review of your resume and supporting documentation will be conducted by the HR Specialist. This information will be compared against your responses to the assessment questionnaire to determine your eligibility for Federal employment, and then whether you are qualified for this particular position. If a determination is made that you have inflated your responses when compared to your background information, you may be deemed ineligible, or your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your skills and abilities.

Additionally, we will review your supporting documents and resume to determine if you are in the ""Area of Consideration"" for this vacancy. Government-Wide Merit Promotion vacancies may only accept applications from a limited audience, pay careful attention to the ""Who May Apply"" and the ""Hiring Paths"" information. Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your eligibility.

BASIS OF RATING:

DOJ's Merit Promotion Procedures will be used to evaluate candidates.

Your qualifications will be evaluated on the following competencies (knowledge, skills, and other characteristics):
Customer Service
Information Assurance
Information Systems Security Certification
Information Systems/Network Security
Managing Human Resources

Career Transition Programs (CTAP or ICTAP): These programs apply to Federal and/or DOJ employees who meet the definition of surplus or displaced from a position in the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must:
Meet CTAP or ICTAP eligibility criteria;
Be rated well-qualified for the position with a score of 85 or above based on the competencies listed above; and
Submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Special-Sensitive (SS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
Documentation requirements may vary from applicant to applicant based on your eligibility claims.


It is your responsibility to carefully review the list of document descriptions below, to see which documents are required for your application.

ALL APPLICANTS: You must submit a detailed resume containing the following information:

Official position title;
Employer name and contact information;
Start and end dates (including month and year);
A detailed list of duties & accomplishments,
Your highest salary (or grade/step) achieved; and
The number of hours worked per week (or indicate full-time).
If you are a current or former Federal employee:
You must submit your most recent SF-50 (Notification of Personnel Action) or equivalent agency form. Do not submit an award SF-50, these do not contain sufficient information about your appointment
Your SF-50 should list the full position title, series, grade and step, organization, duty location, service computation date, effective date, and your service type and tenure status.
Submit a copy of your most recent performance evaluation or appraisal, signed, showing your final rating. If a performance appraisal is not available submit a statement explaining why one is not available.
See USAJOBS Current & Former Employees for more information.
If you are a Veteran or a qualifying parent or spouse:
Submit all DD-214 (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty, Member-4 Copy) forms.
If you are a Veteran with a service-connected disability rating you will need to submit the SF-15 (Application for 10-point Veterans Preference) and a copy of your VA Letter stating your disability rating.
If you are the qualifying parent or spouse of a disabled, deceased, or deployed Veteran, and are seeking a derived preference eligibility, you must submit appropriate supporting documentation such as the Veterans DD-214, SF-15, VA Letter.
For more information on each type of Veterans Preference, and the documentation required for each, see FedsHireVets.

If you are a person with a disability, claiming eligibility under Schedule A:
You must submit ""proof of a disability"" documentation (""Proof of a disability"" is a letter stating that you have an intellectual disability, severe physical disability or psychiatric disability).
You must get this letter from your doctor, a licensed medical professional, a licensed vocational rehabilitation specialist, or any Federal, state, or local agency that issues or provides disability benefits.
For more information about Schedule A and verification requirements, please see OPM's Schedule A site.

If you are a displaced Federal employee claiming eligibility under CTAP or ICTAP:
You must submit your separation notice or agency RIF letter from your agency.
If you have not yet been separated, you can provide the letter of intent to separate you from the agency because of reduction-in-force.
See USAJOBS' Career Transition Programs for more information.
USAJOBS - What documents might I need to provide?
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
This vacancy announcement is open to Federal employees and other eligible applicants. Please read the ""This job is open to"" section above, to ensure you are eligible for consideration.",463,Washington
17,Enterprise IT Project Manager,Barbaricum,"Fort Belvoir, VA",None,"Enterprise IT Project Manager
Fort Belvoir, VA /
Mission Support /
Full-Time
Apply for this job
Barbaricum supports government clients with Integrated Communications, Mission Support, and Cyber Security/Intelligence. Our passion is innovation and we are committed to client value and effective technical solutions. We are an ISO 9001:2015-certified and CMMI Level 3 appraised, Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Small Business (SDVOSB) located in Washington, DC. Our mission is to transform the ways the U.S. Government approaches problem sets of increasing complexity by delivering innovative solutions, particularly in support of National Security missions.

Barbaricum is one of the fastest-growing companies in our market. The company is routinely recognized by institutions like Inc. Magazine, GovCon, AMEC, PRSA, and SmartCEO for corporate growth, capabilities, and award-winning client work. Our team is dynamic and agile, providing global support to current missions across five continents. We are also focused on developing and maintaining our vibrant corporate culture, having been recently named one of the best places to work by Inc. Magazine.
Barbaricum is seeking a qualified IT Project Manager to support the mission of the Product Manager Power Projection Enablers (PdM P2E). The Chief Information Officer of the Army has charged PdM P2E with procuring and installing leading-edge technologies including Command, Control, Communications, Computers and Intelligence (C4I) systems; computer and communication networks; network convergence; cloud computing; cyber security compliance; visual displays; product tools; product architecture; modeling; electro-optics; transport; radio frequency devices; control systems; and instrumentation equipment. Support and services performed under this contract include administration, operations, logistics, engineering, knowledge management, information technology, and program management support to PdM P2E.
Responsibilities
Serves as the assistant to the Program Manager as the Government’s point of contact at Ft. Belvoir
Performs all Program Manager’s duties as required at Ft. Belvoir
Provides technical supervision and guidance for all contractor personnel assigned to the specific theaters of responsibility
Plans, coordinates, and directs administrative activities, program control, and technical personnel involved in providing services in fulfillment of the contract
Is responsible for the overall management of specific project task ensuring that the technical solutions and schedules are implemented in a timely manner
Oversees all contractual responsibilities and delivery of all contract deliverables
Leads and manages projected team tasks and work flow, enforces procedures, creates and tracks budget, coordinating technical or data processing support for clients overseas
Qualifications
Active DoD Secret security clearance
Project Management Professional (PMP) certification or DAU Level III Project Management Certification required.
Bachelor’s degree or preferably a Master’s degree in a science-related, IT, or business field
8 years of related senior project management experience
Experience with Army acquisition processes
Experience providing oversight of large, multi-functional project teams, preferably in an information technology environment
Experience planning and managing complex tasks—sometimes under tight budget and time constraints—across multiple regions overseas
Strong management and leadership skills, written and oral communications skills
Experience in Government acquisition
Familiarity with industry best practices
Familiarity with Government contract and subcontract management
Additional Information
For more information about Barbaricum, please visit our website at www.barbaricum.com. We will contact candidates directly to schedule interviews. No phone calls please.",463,Washington
18,Federal - Strategic Planning Lead,Accenture,"Arlington, VA",None,"Job Description
Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Location: Washington, DC
We are:
Accenture Federal Services, bringing together commercial innovation with the latest technology to unleash the potential for our federal clients. Every day we bring bold thinking and diverse disciplines to solve problems in new ways. Ready to learn as much as you can? We’ll give you numerous opportunities of formal & informal training sessions to keep your tech smarts sharp.
The work:
Support client Enterprise Transformation Strategy and Portfolio Reengineering of multi billion dollar global organization. Expected Tasks This resource will lead development enterprise IT strategy with supplemental artifacts such as application strategy, portfolio strategy, IT talent strategy and others related to overall technology transformation. You will directly support all C-suite clients along with the Program Manager with enterprise scale assessments, recommendations, presentations, briefing content, whitepapers, industry best practice research and innovation. This role will also require work with key II and III commands and stakeholders outside of the Pentagon to gather inputs and build adoption of the new strategic direction and outcomes in a highly federated and contested stakeholder environment. As the Lead, you should know how to quickly pull the best of Accenture resources and methods to apply and tailor for client needs.

Here's what you need:
5+ years of experience leading strategic planning and organizational design for government subcontracting agencies
Ability to build trusted relationships with senior officials and stakeholders from diverse organizations and build buy-in across new initiatives
Proven ability to set guidelines, criteria, and best-in-class competencies for strategy development
Excellent oral and written communication skills and ability to effectively interact with a diverse set of internal and external stakeholders
Ability to work in team environments to coordinate project schedules and action items, and deliver exceptional work under tight deadlines
Bonus points if you have:
Bachelor's degree; Master's degree in a relevant field preferred
What We Believe
We have an unwavering commitment to diversity with the aim that every one of our people has a full sense of belonging within our organization. As a business imperative, every person at Accenture has the responsibility to create and sustain an inclusive environment.
Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and core values. Our rich diversity makes us more innovative and more creative, which helps us better serve our clients and our communities. Read more here
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Accenture is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We believe that no one should be discriminated against because of their differences, such as age, disability, ethnicity, gender, gender identity and expression, religion or sexual orientation.
All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age, race, creed, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, disability status, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal, state, or local law.
Accenture is committed to providing veteran employment opportunities to our service men and women.
For details, view a copy of the Accenture Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Policy Statement.
Requesting An Accommodation
Accenture is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for persons with disabilities or religious observances, including reasonable accommodation when needed. If you are hired by Accenture and require accommodation to perform the essential functions of your role, you will be asked to participate in our reasonable accommodation process. Accommodations made to facilitate the recruiting process are not a guarantee of future or continued accommodations once hired.
If you would like to be considered for employment opportunities with Accenture and have accommodation needs for a disability or religious observance, please call us toll free at 1 (877) 889-9009, send us an email or speak with your recruiter.
Other Employment Statements
Applicants for employment in the US must have work authorization that does not now or in the future require sponsorship of a visa for employment authorization in the United States.
Candidates who are currently employed by a client of Accenture or an affiliated Accenture business may not be eligible for consideration.
Job candidates will not be obligated to disclose sealed or expunged records of conviction or arrest as part of the hiring process.
The Company will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Additionally, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the Company's legal duty to furnish information.",463,Washington
19,Consultant - Federal Acquisition,Censeo Consulting Group,"Washington, DC 20006 (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"Position Overview
Position Description:
We are seeking an Federal Acquisition Consultant to join our team. In the role you will provide innovative business strategies, agile procurement solutions, and work with the team to develop and implement the agency procurement policy/processes and provide consulting support to the Center for Medicaid and Medicare Services, FCC, Department of State, or other Censeo clients.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree required
3+ years of experience providing strategic sourcing and procurement consulting support in the public sector
4+ years of experience supporting complex federal acquisitions for a program office; project management and/or Contracting Officer background a plus
Professional certification preferred (CPCM, CFCM, and/or DAWIA/FAC-C III)
Possess knowledge of the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR), agency-specific regulations, and be knowledgeable of acquisition streamlining initiatives and reforms
Strong understanding of various acquisition approaches and ability to formulate analyses and create comprehensive documentation
Demonstrated performance developing pricing and negotiation positions across fixed price, cost reimbursement, and time-and-materials contract types
Excellent verbal communication and writing skills
Ability to work independently and in a team on complex acquisitions
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite of tools, to include SharePoint
Responsibilities:
Provides acquisition lifecycle planning and execution support to a high-visibility program group within a major HHS component agency
Demonstrates knowledge of major acquisition lifecycle environments for strategy development and associated best practices
Applies knowledge of federal procurement principles, policies, procedures, and standards to implement programmatic requirements
Ensures on-time completion of task deliverables and activities such as developing SOWs/PWSs, IGCEs, market research, RFPs, project and operational plans, and process improvements
Delivers expert advisory support to government senior executives, program managers, CORs, and division managers regarding the acquisition lifecycle
Serves as a liaison between the program and acquisition offices on all matters of complex, high-dollar procurements
Performs on a team as an individual contributor with a proactive approach to project management
Position Particulars:
This is an exempt, full-time position
Location: Washington D.C.
About Censeo:
Censeo Consulting Group, a management consulting firm, is an advisor and partner to management teams who lead some of the largest and most complex organizations in the world. Our key areas of expertise include operations improvement, acquisition strategy, organization effectiveness, and IT strategy with a strong Federal footprint.

Censeo is rapidly growing and has been recognized for our unique approach, culture, and values:
2020 Forbes Best Management Consulting Firms in America
2019 Ivy Exec #7 Overall Boutique Consulting Firm and #6 Top Consulting Firms for Culture
2018 Consulting Magazine Best Small Firms to Work For
2017 Vault #12 Best Boutique Consulting Firm
2016 Forbes Best Management Consulting Firms in America
2015 Washington Business Journal’s Philanthropy List
Censeo is an equal opportunity employer. We are committed to providing equal opportunity to all applicants and employees in full compliance with all applicable state and federal laws prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, gender, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other class protected by applicable state or federal law.

vfkVvmEhvc",463,Washington
20,Dari Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.

Dari Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.

General Requirements, but are not limited to:

Language Instruction

Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.

Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)

Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.

Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.

Required Qualifications:

Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:

Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.

Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.

Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.

Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).

Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.

Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check

Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia

Travel: Some Travel may be required

Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:

Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.

Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.

Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.

Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).

Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.

Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check

Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia

Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
21,EST4 Fire Alarm Programmer,Orion Management LLC,"Washington, DC",None,"Want to join a team that exceeds expectations while solving complex technical challenges for our clients?
Founded in 2001, Orion Management, LLC is a Veteran-Owned provider of security, fire-life safety, training, and professional/advisory services to Commercial and Federal clients throughout the world. Our team members are what makes our service exceptional and makes us the preferred provider for clients like WMATA, NASA, DoD, Dept of State, Marriott, Nationals Stadium, VDoT, and more.
We’re experiencing rapid growth, and we’re looking for high-performing team members who are ready to contribute to our clients’ success. We can accomplish great things together!
Orion Management, LLC is looking for a Fire Technician who can program, install, repair, and maintain commercial fire alarm systems.The ideal candidate can effectively program, test, and ensure timely completion of installations. As a Fire Technician, you will be responsible for, but not limited to, performing the following functions:

Job Responsibilities:

Repair and maintain Fire Alarm systems including installation, programming, and maintenance of commercial, government, and private industry sites.
Familiar with and able to interpret and apply national consensus codes and standard.
Ensures Fire Alarm & Mass Notification installations are completed correctly and in a timely manner.
Assumes full control of testing procedures during and at completion of system installation.
Programs systems with a test configuration and initiates a working test regardless of system communication design.
Provide support for project managers from conception through completion.
Attend assigned organizational and customer meetings.
Respond to service calls on integrated Fire Alarm & Mass Notification systems as required during normal business hours and on weekends and after hours as scheduled.
Accurately analyzes problems or anticipates problem areas.
Troubleshoot system operation while ensuring a timely delivery.
Assesses and reacts to new developments or unexpected problems in the field with as little production loss as possible.
Maintains flow of field documentation to include change orders, head-end configuration, system drawings and diagrams, shop drawings, and as-built information.
Assists and advises on the preparation of ""Operation and Maintenance"" manuals as necessary.
Maintains technical and quality bridge between internal departments and contract client.
Notifies management of possible cost savings or cost incurred in a timely manner.
Maintains safety and HAZCOM program while in the field.
Adheres to company rules and regulations as set forth in the company handbook or other official source.

Basic Requirements:
Ability to write program, download program, manage program, and facilitate changes per contract agreement.
Must possess a working knowledge of applicable government standards and guidelines for Fire Alarm & Mass Notification systems, anti-terrorism/force protection, and / or facilities Fire Alarm & Mass Notification design.
Demonstrates comprehensive working knowledge of electronic system design and repair.

Other Requirements:

EST4 Certification Required.
2-6 years of functional experience or NICET Level III or IV
Education: Associate's degree or 1-2 years of vocational technical training preferred. HS diploma or equivalent required.
Must be very professional and possess excellent customer service skills.
Ability to work as a member of a team of technicians in the installation of Government Fire Alarm systems, to include start up, installation, programming, testing, and signoff.

Pay Range: Pay based on your level of experience and past performance
Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Flex Spending, Retirement (401K)
Orion is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer:.
It is the policy of Orion Management LLC to provide equal opportunity for all qualified persons and not unlawfully discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, marital status, sexual orientation, religion, veteran status, and citizenship status. This policy applies to recruitment and placement, promotion, training, transfer, retention, rate of pay and all other details and conditions of employment.",463,Washington
22,Designer III,KCI Technologies Inc.,"Fulton, MD",None,"Overview:

KCI's Wireless Practice is looking to hire a Wireless Designer in our Fulton, Maryland Office. As a Wireless Designer, you will working with a project manager and team of desingers to complete designs for wireless macro facilities and small cell facilitites throughout the east coast. Previous expereience in the wireless industry and knowledge using AutoCAD is required.
Join us as we Rise to the Challenge
At KCI, we’re building an enduring company that provides unparalleled value to our employee-owners. We make our mark designing and delivering our world-class solutions, so we invest deeply in developing our team. We reward integrity and commitment, and when we do well, you do well. Our people have freedom to innovate, unlimited growth, a voice that matters, a lifestyle that works, and skin in the game. Because life’s more fun when you own it.
THE COMPANY
KCI Technologies, Inc. is a 100% employee-owned engineering, consulting and construction firm serving clients throughout the United States. KCI is recognized as an industry leader, employing cutting-edge technologies, management practices and strategic growth initiatives. Employee ownership fosters an entrepreneurial spirit, encourages technical expertise, and shapes strategic planning.
KCI is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace dedicated to pursuing and hiring a diverse workforce.
BENEFITS INFORMATION
KCI Benefits Guide 2021
Duties, Responsibilities & Other:
Work with a team of designers and drafters to complete macro and micro wireless facility design.
Complete lease exhibits, zoning documents and construction documents utilizing AutoCAD.
Complete site visits as required.
Skills required will include: Ability to prepare site plans and research properties using county GIS systems. Knowledge of AutoCAD. Ability to read and interpret architectural plans. Must possess the ability to learn various software programs for design and asset management functions.
Qualifications:
High School Diploma. AA in engineering technology or drafting required or equivalent experience.
Minimum of 2 - 4 years of professional experience.
Pre-employment drug screening is a condition of employment. Background and motor vehicle checks may be required based upon position.

Performance Expectations:
Train adequate backup personnel to support your role in your absence
Comply with all KCI policies and procedures
Ensure projects fulfill ISO compliance requirements
Complete other duties as required/assigned
Achieve or exceed budgeted individual utilization target(85% typical)
Attend bi-weekly(or more frequently as necessary) meetings with project team on all projects/tasks
Complete all tasks on time and within budget while fully meeting the scope
Consult and coordinate with other practices and sub-consultants as required
Operate within specified (corporate or project) budget parameters
Compare field data to base plan
Design and draft construction drawings using standard engineering fundamentals for approval by Federal, state and local agencies
Gather data, including measurements, sketches, notes and photographs as needed
Read and interpret technical documents needed for performance of job
Review and interpret design manuals and details from local jurisdictions
Size and specify design requirements
Complete Annual Individual Training Program

KCI Technologies, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",463,Washington
23,Product Manager - Tech III,Discovery,"Sterling, VA 20166",None,"Discovery hires the very best and brightest talent who are enthusiastic and passionate to fulfill the company’s mission of empowering people to explore their world and satisfy their curiosity.
In exchange for their talent and drive, employees are provided with an engaging, diverse workplace and the resources they need to learn, thrive and grow in their careers.
Job Summary
Our Team
Discovery hires the very best and brightest talent who are enthusiastic and passionate to fulfill the company’s mission of empowering people to explore their world and satisfy their curiosity. In exchange for their talent and drive, employees are provided with an engaging, diverse workplace and the resources they need to learn, thrive and grow in their careers.
About Discovery Direct-to-Consumer
Discovery's Digital group is a well-funded start-up within Discovery, Inc. We are fast, nimble, and have fun developing new, innovative, and immersive digital products and content for iconic brands. We are working at the crossroads of technology, entertainment, and everyday utility. As content creators across the digital ecosystem, we continuously leverage our technology to create immersive viewing and interactive experiences.
We tell engaging stories to millions of viewers across the Internet every day and bring new interactive experiences to life to not only entertain but improve the lives of our customers. Most recently, our group is behind the launch of Discovery+, Discovery’s global streaming service, serving as the definitive destination for real life entertainment with the largest ever content offering at launch, which debuted in the U.S. on January 4, 2021.
About the Role
The Product Owner oversees product planning, execution, roll-out, and maintenance for a variety of Content Systems’ applications and services to support the direct to consumer initiatives. This includes creating and prioritizing product and business requirements, defining the product roadmap, and working closely with business and technology teams to satisfy the product’s users. The product owner plays the primary role in defining features and requirements. He/she will determine and prioritize product enhancements to meet Discovery’s changing needs and adapt to current technology. The product owner must have strong analytical skills, be an excellent communicator and negotiator, and be able to work towards high-level goals with minimal oversight. The Product Owner must understand business objectives and build compelling products that meet them. He/she must be a strong team player who can build consensus within a cross-functional team while keeping everyone on task and on-schedule. The product owner must be both a listener and a negotiator, hearing the needs of business stakeholders while advocating for the product. This will require him/her to effectively collaborate across disciplines in a matrixed and geographically diverse team.
The group’s focus is on enterprise application development using state of the art front end development tools and database technology. We follow an agile software development lifecycle methodology.
In addition to the direct to consumer products, we support all major revenue generating areas within Discovery including US and international linear television networks spanning dozens of countries and languages.
ResponsibilitiesCreate materials to guide the work of the team (user stories, business process flows, use cases, usability specifications, prototypes, code samples, etc.)Develop and maintain a thorough understanding of business processesDevelop and maintain effective working relationships with business customersWork with business partners to gather process, functional, and data requirementsFacilitate communication throughout the product development process between a variety of internal business and technology teamsMaintain product backlog and prioritized roadmap for assigned productsAct as a product evangelist within Discovery, making users aware of new features and benefitsMentor other team members and support efforts to cross-train staff to ensure proper redundancy and growth opportunitiesManage systems analysts and review their output to ensure the quality and accuracy of analysis findings and business and system documentationAssist in coordinating the implementation of new system functionality into productionProvide functional, business, and system expertise for IT projects and business systems supportCollaborate with media operations team leads to transform business process and workflows to maximize efficiency and speed to market of contentAssist analysts and production support team with analysis of production issues including problem identification, definition and implementation of short-term work around, and coordination of long- term software solution with development teamProvide project management support for software releases, vendor evaluations, and assessment of business requestsProvide functional, business, and system expertise for IT projects and business systems supportProvide feedback for process improvements to help improve team effectiveness and efficiencyWork with the development teams to maintain product documentation to provide easier knowledge transfer and cross-team project visibilityProvide management with ongoing updates on team progress, velocity, and capacity, including initial project sizing, potential release scoping, and project completion projectionsPerform other duties as assigned
RequirementsBachelor’s degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Business Administration, or equivalent degree/work experienceMinimum of 8 years of experience in the IT industry, with 4+ years of business, systems analysis, and/or quality assuranceStrong preference for experience in one or more of the following; digital or broadcast media industry, video production, content management, content localization and multi-language content workflowsAbility to work on multiple projects at one time and to ensure that overall priorities are being metExcellent problem solving and analytical skillsAbility to quickly learn key concepts and apply concepts when identifying solutionsAbility to develop and execute simple SQL queries to produce ad-hoc reports and analyze business dataStrong communication, critical thinking and analytical capabilitiesStrong proficiencies in MS Visio, PowerPoint, Word, Excel and general design and project management disciplinesWillingness to accept varying levels of responsibility in support of projects and initiativesPossesses understanding in the areas of application programming, database and system designWillingness to work weekends in support of software releasesStrong attention to detail and a high-degree of follow-throughA love of working closely with others to empower them to excelCuriosity and a willingness to learnMust have legal right to work in the United States
Discovery Communications, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. Discovery is committed to being an employer of choice, not just a good place to work, but a great and inclusive place to work. To that end, we strive to recruit and maintain a workforce that meaningfully represents the diverse and culturally rich communities that we serve. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or disabled status or, genetic information.
We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including but not limited to all local Fair Chance Ordinances.
EEO is the Law
Pay Transparency Policy Statement
California Job Applicant Privacy Policy
If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application process, please send an email request to HR@discovery.com.",463,Washington
24,Acquisition Specialist Sr. - State - DC,Jefferson Consulting Group,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"Jefferson Solutions, the well-respected government consulting arm of the Jefferson Consulting Group, is looking for highly qualified individuals to serve as Sr. Acquisition Specialists to perform the full range of acquisition services in support of the State Department Bureau of Consular Affairs, Office of Consular Systems and Technology team. These services include, among other things, developing acquisition packages, supporting source selections and providing post-award contract support.

WHO WE ARE
Jefferson Solutions is a woman-owned small business that helps federal agencies improve program and mission outcomes throughout the entire program life cycle – from defining effective requirements to assessing workforce capabilities and competencies to measuring accountability and performance. We are performance, management and organizational experts with a thorough understanding of acquisition, human capital, federal management initiatives, and administration and agency priorities. To achieve results, we leverage the decades of our experienced personnel, our thought leadership across the federal sector, and our proven approaches from public and private sector engagements. Since our founding in 1996, Solutions has employed collaborative approaches with our clients to address agency challenges and improve performance. Building on exceptional past performance from its work in over 50 federal agencies, Solutions tailors approaches and solutions specific to each client’s needs.
WHAT YOU'LL DO
All aspects of pre-award contract support to include:
Provide direct acquisition and procurement support on all CST procurements and acquisitions from inception through award providing high quality technical writing, project management and analysis support drafting of the following
Acquisition Strategy
Acquisition Plans
Market Research Analysis
Determination & Findings
Justification for Approvals
Independent Government Cost Estimates
Quality Assurance Surveillance Plans
Source Selection Plans
Requirements documents (Statement of Work, Performance Work Statement, Statement of Objectives, and Statement of Requirements)
Update and maintain accurate and complete electronic Contract Files to mirror the Contract Officer Representative (COR) file in accordance with the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) for all CST’s acquisition and procurements to ensure availability of all contract related documents for administration
Facilitate and participate in Acquisition Integrated Project Teams
Coordinate and meet with government stakeholders to understand and collect technical data needed to produce rational and appropriate contracting recommendations
Coordinate and assist the Department’s Acquisition Management (AQM) in the development of acquisition milestones
Provide program office with other acquisition related documentation and support, including, but not limited to assistance in drafting milestones, correspondence with AQM, and creating and maintaining reports for contract administration
Coordinate and attend meetings with senior-level government managers, and other Department stakeholders (i.e., AQM) that can provide technical information for all contracting efforts
Provide advisory assistance during source selections, including providing advisory assistance to the Technical Evaluation Team (TET), assist in the response to vendor questions related to the solicitation package, participate as an advisor and non-voting member on the TET, and assist with preparing the TET report
Develop administer, and maintain various existing reports pertaining to pre-award acquisition activities
All aspects of post-award contract administration support to include:
Monitor and facilitate contract actions and accounting for the internal and external processing lead times to ensure timely contract awards and avoidance to any disruption to services
Assist CORs with the facilitation and review of timely acceptance/rejection of contract deliverables
Assist CORs with the facilitation and review of timely acceptance/rejection of invoice
Assist CORs with the scheduling and facilitation of monthly CSR meetings
Assist CORs with the timely submission of Contractor Performance Assessment Reports (CPARs) by providing information garnered during contract administration, such as trends in deliverables meeting deadlines, issues with invoicing, timeliness in response, etc.
Develop, administer, and maintain various CST/SSPM existing reports pertaining to contract support activities
Document and maintain procedures detailing all CST aspects of the requisition of professional services, hardware and software, maintenance, and IT equipment
Assist CORs with timely contract close- out support in accordance with FAR 4.804(a), Department and Bureau regulations and policies
Experience and Prior Accomplishments
Shall have at least ten (10) years of federal acquisition.
Proficiency with pre-award and contract administration duties and responsibilities.
Demonstrated knowledge of the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR).
Education and Certifications
Education: Bachelor’s Degree.
Current SECRET clearance and/or able to obtain one.
Preferred Qualifications:
FAC-C/DAWIA certification at Level II or Level III.
Experience with procuring information technology (IT) services and systems.
Experience with contract management systems.
WHO YOU ARE
You are someone with strong organizational, interpersonal, communication, writing and analytical skills who can effectively interact with program and contracting officials. You are detailed oriented with high standards for excellence and a commitment to perform and execute all project activities successfully.
WHAT'S NEXT
If you are interested in this opportunity, please apply by using the link. We look forward to reviewing your resume and credentials.
Jefferson Consulting Group is proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, disability, national origin, genetic data, veteran status or any category protected by law.",463,Washington
25,ENGINEER,US Naval Sea Systems Command,"Washington Navy Yard, DC","$72,750 - $134,798 a year","Duties
Summary
You will serve as an ENGINEER in the Naval Architecture and Engineering Department (C80) of CARDEROCK DIV NS. This position is located onsite for SEA 073 at NAVSEA Headquarters in the Washington Navy Yard, DC.

This position is part of the Warfare Centers Personnel Demonstration Project. The (ND-4) pay band encompasses positions equivalent to the (GS-12) and (GS-13).
Responsibilities
You will serve as the overall Team Submarine Stealth Assistant Program Manager (APM) for the Submarine Stealth Integration Program Office (SSIPO).
You will act as the Program Acquisition Resource Manager (PARM) for submarine signature management systems with responsibility of ACAT III level cost, schedule, and performance execution.
You will coordinate, analyze, prioritize, and integrate submarine stealth activities within the undersea community.
You will implement, manage, and sustain initiatives within the Team Submarine Advanced Signature Management Plan.
Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0801 General Engineering
0830 Mechanical Engineering
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a US Citizen.
Must be determined suitable for federal employment.
Must participate in the direct deposit pay program.
New employees to the Department of the Navy will be required to successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit e-verify.gov
Within the Department of Defense (DoD), the appointment of retired military members within 180 days immediately following retirement date to a civilian position is subject to the provisions of 5 United States Code 3326.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service.
You will be required to obtain and maintain an interim and/or final security clearance prior to entrance on duty. Failure to obtain and maintain the required level of clearance may result in the withdrawal of a job offer or removal.
This position is covered under the Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA). You must be certified as a Career Field Program Management (A), Level II. Certification is required within 24 months of appointment.
Successful completion of a pre-employment drug test (including marijuana) is required. A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if you fail to report to the drug test appointment or fail the test. You will be subject to random testing.
This position may require travel from normal duty station to CONUS and OCONUS and may include remote or isolated sites. You must be able to travel on military and commercial aircraft for extended periods of time.
You may be required to perform occasional work at shipyards/field activities or on submarines.
Qualifications
In addition to the basic education requirements, your resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience at or equivalent to the next lower pay band ND-03 (GS-09/11 equivalent) in the Federal service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector. Specialized experience must demonstrate the following: as a professional engineer coordinating engineering projects involving the research, development or technology for submarine or submersible systems to ensure effective performance.

Additional qualification information can be found from the following Office of Personnel Management website:
https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/#url=List-by-Occupational-Series AND https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/0800/files/all-professional-engineering-positions-0800.pdf

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment.
Education
Applicants must meet the following basic education requirements of the Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Qualifications Standards Manual:

Successful completion of a professional engineering degree. To be acceptable, the program must: (1) lead to a bachelor's degree (or higher) in a school of engineering with at least one program accredited by the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (ABET); or (2) include differential and integral calculus and courses (more advanced than first-year physics and chemistry) in five of the following seven areas of engineering science or physics: (a) statics, dynamics; (b) strength of materials (stress-strain relationships); (c) fluid mechanics, hydraulics; (d) thermodynamics; (e) electrical fields and circuits; (f) nature and properties of materials (relating particle and aggregate structure to properties); and (g) any other comparable area of fundamental engineering science or physics, such as optics, heat transfer, soil mechanics, or electronics. Such education must demonstrate the knowledge, skills, and abilities necessary to do the work of the position.

OR

Current registration as an Engineer Intern (EI), Engineer in Training (EIT), or licensure as a Professional Engineer (PE) by any State, the District of Columbia, Guam, or Puerto Rico. Absent other means of qualifying under this standard, those applicants who achieved such registration by means other than written test (e.g., State grandfather or eminence provisions) are eligible only for positions that are within or closely related to the specialty field of their registration For more information about EI and EIT registration requirements, please visit the National Society of Professional Engineers website at: http://www.nspe.org

OR

Evidence of having successfully passed the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) examination or any other written test required for professional registration by an engineering licensure board in the various States, the District of Columbia, Guam, and Puerto Rico The FE examination is not administered by the U. S. Office of Personnel Management. For more information, please visit: http://www.nspe.org/Licensure/HowtoGetLicensed/index.html.

OR

Successful completion of at least 60 semester hours of courses in the physical, mathematical, and engineering sciences and in engineering that included the courses specified in the basic requirements under paragraph A (above). The courses must be fully acceptable toward meeting the requirements of an engineering program as described in paragraph A (above)

OR

Successful completion of a curriculum leading to a bachelor's degree in an appropriate scientific field, e.g., engineering technology, physics, chemistry, architecture, computer science, mathematics, hydrology, or geology, may be accepted in lieu of a bachelor's degree in engineering, provided the applicant has had at least one year of professional engineering experience acquired under professional engineering supervision and guidance. Ordinarily, there should be either an established plan of intensive training to develop professional engineering competence, or several years of prior professional engineering-type experience, e.g., in interdisciplinary positions.
Additional information
This position is covered by the Department of Defense Priority Placement Program.

Additional vacancies may be filled by this announcement.

Recruitment incentives may be authorized to eligible new hires.

A relocation incentive is generally a single payment intended to offset some of the relocation costs experienced by the selectee. A relocation incentive may be authorized.

This position is eligible for part time, full time or ad-hoc telework at the discretion of management.

A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if the selectee fails to meet the pre-employment requirements, including failure to report to any of the scheduled appointments.

If you are unable to apply online and request information about the Alternate Application process, please contact the Department of Navy's Employment Information Center.

Federal annuitant information: The selection of an annuitant is subject to the Department of Defense and Department of the Navy policy on the employment of annuitants. Policy information may be found at: http://www.secnav.navy.mil/donhr/Documents/CivilianJobs/FedCivAnnuitants.pdf

ICTAP Applicants: To be considered well-qualified and exercise selection priority as an ICTAP candidate, displaced Federal employees must satisfy all qualification requirements for the position and receive a rating in the highly qualified category (score 85) or higher. ICTAP candidates must provide copies of all of the following documentation at the time of application: 1) agency notice; 2) most recent performance appraisal; and 3) most recent SF-50 or notification of personnel action that includes position, grade level, and duty location. Applicants who do not provide this documentation will not receive consideration as an ICTAP candidate. For more information about ICTAP eligibility please review the following link: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/unique-hiring-paths/federal-employees/ictap/

Military Spouse Preference applicants will receive priority consideration at the Full Performance Level (FPL) and if determined to be Best Qualified at the FPL, and selected, must be placed at the FPL. A BQ military spouse possesses knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies comparable to others who meet the competitive referral criteria for the specific position.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
When the application process is complete, we will review your resume to ensure you meet the hiring eligibility and qualification requirements listed in this announcement. You will be rated based on the information provided in your resume and responses to the Occupational Questionnaire, along with your supporting documentation to determine your ability to demonstrate the following competencies:
ENGINEERING PROJECT MANAGEMENT
ORAL COMMUNICATION
PARTNERING
SYSTEMS ENGINEERING
WRITTEN COMMUNICATION

You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.

If after reviewing your resume and supporting documentation, a determination is made that you inflated your qualifications and/or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities or you may be found ineligible/not qualified.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

All eligibility and qualifications requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Position sensitivity and risk
Critical-Sensitive (CS)/High Risk
Trust determination process
National security
Required Documents

Required Documents
You are required to provide documentation that supports the eligibility and qualification claims made in your resume and assessment questionnaire. You must submit the applicable documents listed here and those listed with the eligibilities you select in the announcement questionnaire with your application package. Applicants who do not provide supporting documentation that fully support their claims will not be referred to the hiring manager. Cover letter is optional.

A complete resume is required. Your resume must show relevant experience, job title, duties and accomplishments. Your resume must show complete information for each job entry to support minimum qualifications. The following information should be provided in your resume, but it is acceptable to provide elsewhere in your application package: employer's name, starting and end dates (Mo/Yr), hours per week, and pay plan, series and grade level (e.g. GS-0201-09) for relevant federal experience.TIP: A good way to ensure you include all essential information is to use the Resume Builder in USAJOBS to create your resume.

Are you applying for a promotion? If you are a current GS employee applying for a higher grade than the grade that you currently hold you must provide an SF-50 that shows that you have held the next lower grade for at least one year. Some SF-50s effective within the last 52 weeks will not demonstrate you have held the next lower grade for at least one year (e.g. General Adjustment SF-50 from this year). In many cases, we need to see two (2) SF-50s to determine time-in-grade and eligibility for promotion. If you are a DoD employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF- 50(s) from MyBiz.

Are you claiming membership in any professional organizations, or possession of a license, certificate or credentials? Check the Conditions of Employment section above to see if any are required. If you claim membership, license, certification, or credentials, you must submit a copy of said document in your application package.


Are you using education as a substitute for some or all of the experience requirement? Is there a basic education requirement for this position? Check the Education section above to see what is allowed and what is required. Any claims you make in your resume or assessment questionnaire regarding education or degrees MUST be supported by submitting with your application official or unofficial transcripts or a list of courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned issued from your school. While unofficial transcripts are acceptable for initial application, an official transcript will ultimately be required if you are selected for the position. You may submit a copy your degree(s) if specific coursework does not have to be verified.

Are you a veteran claiming 5-point veterans' preference or claiming sole survivorship preference? You must submit a copy of your latest DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (any copy that shows all dates of service, as well as character of service [Honorable, General, etc.] is acceptable) OR a VA letter that shows dates of service or service connected disability AND character of service. If you have more than one DD-214 for multiple periods of active duty service, submit a copy for each period of service. If you were issued a DD-215 to amend aforementioned information on the DD-214 you must submit that too. If you are not sure of your preference eligibility, visit the Department of Labor's website: Veterans' Preference Advisor

Are you a disabled veteran or claiming 10-point veterans' preference?
If you are eligible to claim 10 point veterans preference you must submit a DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty as described above for 5-point preference.

You must also provide the applicable supporting documentation of your disability (e.g. disability letter from the VA) as described on Standard Form-15 (SF-15). http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/SF15.pdf.

Are you an active duty service member? Active Duty Service Members are required to submit a statement of service printed on command letterhead and signed by the command. The statement of service must provide the branch of service, rate/rank, all dates of service, the expected date of discharge and anticipated character of service (Honorable, General, etc.).

Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents contain personal information such as SSN and DOB and some documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove said personal information before you submit your application. You must provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected.
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Internal to an agency
Current federal employees of this agency.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current DoD employees, Former federal employees DoD Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligibles, and VEOA eligible, current or former time-limited employees that occupied a position located at a Defense Industrial Base Facility (DIBF) or Major Range and Test Facilities Base (MRTFB)",463,Washington
26,Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification (CMMC) Assessor,TestPros,"Sterling, VA 20165",None,"Company Overview:
TestPros is a successful and growing business, established in 1988 to provide Information Technology (IT) technical support services to a wide range of Commercial and U.S. Federal, State, and Local Government customers. Our capabilities include Program Management, Program Oversight, Process Audit, Intelligence Analysis, Cyber Security, NIST SP 800-171 Assessment and Compliance, Computer Forensics, Software Supply Chain Assurance, Software Testing, Test Automation, Section 508 and WCAG Accessibility Assessment and Remediation, Localization Testing, Independent Verification and Validation (IV&V), Quality Assurance (QA), Compliance, and Research and Development (R&D) services. TestPros is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Job Summary:
TestPros is looking for an expert level Cyber Security professional to participate in commercial Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification (CMMC) consulting/preparation services.
You should be an expert in conducting information technology compliance assessments across various frameworks (e.g., NIST 800-171, 800-53, etc), to include, but not limited to:
NIST SP 800-171, Protecting Controlled Unclassified Information in Non-federal Information Systems and Organizations (DFARS 252.204-7012).
NIST SP 800-53 Rev. 4, Security and Privacy Controls for Federal Information Systems and Organizations.
Framework for Improving Critical Infrastructure Cybersecurity - NIST Cybersecurity Framework (CSF)
Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification v1.0.
Responsibilities and Duties:
You should also be able to deliver on the following expertly and consistently:
Help our customers to implement and enforce NIST 800-53, NIST 800-171, DFARs, and CMMC requirements.
Participate in the development, review and de-confliction of customer information system security policy and standards, including writing guidelines, standards, procedures, and other technical documentation (technical roadmaps, project plans, etc.).
Support the development and maintenance of system asset lists; hardware, and software baselines.
Provide detailed security-related reports including data, analyses, and conclusions upon completion of tests, scans, and assessments, including mitigations and, if indicated, appropriate escalation of identified risks and vulnerabilities.
Verify and document the implementation of security controls necessary to achieve compliance.
Keep management apprised of impending areas of concern, verbally and in writing.
Convey project/task material to individuals, small and large groups.
Review and develop System Security Plans (SSPs), Plans of Actions and Milestones (POA&Ms), and as well as necessary artifacts.
Facilitate the Plan of Actions and Milestones (POA&M) program to ensure customer systems have accurately and fully provided information for POA&M activities to include valid remediation of findings.
Develop various policy documents (SOPs/CONOPs) as required. This may include policies regarding Configuration Management, IS Sanitization, Media Security, Password Policy, Business Continuity, Continuity of Operations, Incident Response, Disaster Recover, and Security Assessments.
Develop new, and mature existing information security and risk policies.
Initiate, and lead on-going information security maturity assessment processes and training, using industry accepted frameworks and implement into the overall cyber security posture.
Produce and review key performance indicators for implemented security measures and distribute KPIs.
Maintain knowledge of threat landscape by monitoring threat intelligence, and other related sources.
Qualifications and Skills:
5+ years of directly related experience in IT security assessment and compliance
Cloud computing security
Security governance and policy
Security risk analysis
Auditing and monitoring systems
Scanning and vulnerability management systems
Advanced Malware Protection
Threat Intelligence
Incident Management - analysis, detection, and handling of security events
Penetration testing and associated tools (e.g., nmap, Metasploit, etc.)
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or a related technical discipline, or the equivalent combination of education, professional training, or work experience (preferred)
Military and/or practical job experience may be considered in-lieu of formal education, with significant industry certifications
Must possess at least one of the following certifications/prior experience:
Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP)
Certified Chief Information Security Officer (CCISO)
Certified Information Security Manager (CISM)
Certified Expert RMF Professional (CERP)
CMMI Level 2 or 3 Lead Appraiser
CMMI Level 2 or 3 Instructor
CERT-RMM Lead Appraiser
ISO 27001 Lead Auditor
DoD 8570.IAM Level III (or certifications necessary to become level III certified)
FedRAMP 3PAO Assessor
DIBCAC Assessor
GIAC Security Leadership Certification

4cKu667UGw",463,Washington
27,Management Analyst III (CRS),"CGI Group, Inc.","Washington, DC 20022",None,"Management Analyst III (CRS)


Position Description

CGI Federal is seeking a Management Analyst III to support the Community Relation Services division of DOJ in Washington DC

Your future duties and responsibilities

The incumbent contractor serves as the secondary operations reporting analyst, reporting to the Associate Director. Selects and adapts plans, techniques, designs, or layouts that ensure component practices align to all governing policies, procedures, rules and laws


MAJOR DUTIES
Performs non-routine and assists the case manager with complex assignments involving responsibility for planning and conducting a complete project of relatively limited scope or a portion of a larger and more diverse project.Contacts personnel, including all Conciliation Specialist, Senior Conciliation Specialist, Regional Directors and Headquarters staff, in related activities to resolve problems and coordinate the work; reviews, analyzes, and integrates the technical work of others.Under the supervision of the case manager, assists in the following activities:
1) Monitoring the alignment between case reporting and component reporting for purposes of meeting all agency established objectives, requirements, and design approaches; completed work is reviewed for technical adequacy and satisfaction of requirements by the Associate Director and Training Specialist and Deputy Director and Director upon request.

2)Designs, develops, and constructs major processes for accurately capturing the nuanced work performed by conciliators and the impact such work has, from a collective perspective, for purposes of reporting the component's performance to Congress.

3)Conducts tests or experiments on the best format for liaising with conciliators and capturing all relevant data and maintaining a current case report catalogue of all services and resources being provided by conciliators.

4)Analyzes results and redesigns or modifies communication system, and reporting process, and case report catalogue to improve accuracy and ease of searching the catalogue for data upon request for reports.

5)Analyzes conciliator case data to determine applicability to CRS Methodology problems; selects from several possible reporting trends; identifies issues with case reporting system and CRS Methodology and prepares layouts, detailed specifications, and written recommendations of specific suggested modifications to both systems for purposes of resolving design issues.

6)May conduct research to analyze various case reporting system designs to determine which practices work best for CRS

Required qualifications to be successful in this role

All employees providing Administrative support under this contract shall be able to read, write, and speak English well enough to effectively communicate with all internal/external customers.


Must be able to obtain a DOJ waiver

Must have a HS diploma

Must be able to pass the CGI Federal background investigation

4+ years of relevant work experience

Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this change-supporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.


At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI at www.cgi.com .

No unsolicited agency referrals please.",463,Washington
28,Management Analyst III (SUB-I),Sentek Global,"Washington, DC",None,"The Team::At Sentek Global, we are always looking for highly motivated professionals, bold innovators and top industry talent. Headquartered in beautiful San Diego with worldwide capabilities and opportunities, Sentek Global is on the cutting edge in Department of Defense and commercial consulting. We’re shifting the paradigm in cybersecurity solutions, IT support, software development, engineering and sales. Not only are we looking for top talent, we’re looking for passionate contributors who will be inspired by a culture where innovation thrives.If you are interested in joining a team of collaborators, leaders, visionaries and problem-solvers, contact us today at talent@sentekglobal.com.The Role::Reporting to the MITS Account Manager, the* Management Analyst III (SUB-I)* will support NAVSEA, Team Submarine, and Team Sub International Programs (SUB-I). This position is located at the Washington Navy Yard (WNY) in Washington, DC. Our team provides Program Management, Financial Management, Engineering, Logistics, and Foreign Military Sales (FMS) professional support services to the Team Submarine organization.What You'll Do::Provide support to NAVSEA, Team Submarine, and Team Sub International Programs (SUB-I).Provide overall Program Management of various Team Submarine Acquisition and Sustainment programs.Support acquisition documentation and financial management tracking of program documents.Provide Program Management, Stakeholder Communications, Schedule Coordination, and other organizing functions as required.FMS Case Manager for SUB-I. Coordinates all FMS cases within SUB-I.Bid and Proposal support if requested.Other duties as assigned.What We're Looking For::Required Qualifications: An active secret clearance is required to be considered for this position.A bachelor's degree in a business or technical field is required.Ten (10) or more years experience in engineering/science management, operations research analysis, financial/cost analysis, or a relevant field is required.Possesses analytical and problem-solving skills for both technical and business-related matters.Experience with DoD / Navy program management, Government technical management, or Industry business management.Knowledge of NAVSEA / Navy organization, stakeholders, and policies.Exhibit effective listening skills and communication skills.Foster cooperation among individuals.Establish and model high standards of performance.Exceptional organization skills with high attention to detail.Advanced time management and analytical skills.Exceptional customer service experience.Excellent written and oral communication.Strong organizational skills.Advanced Microsoft Office Skills, with an ability to become familiar with firm-specific programs and software.Desired Qualifications: Ten (10) or more years of experience with Navy acquisition and/or In-Service Programs is desired.Five (5) or more years of experience working with International/Foreign Military Sales (FMS) Programs, Foreign Disclosure, and Export Control.Experience leading a project and interfacing with an end item customer.Sentek Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.Job Type: Full-time",463,Washington
29,Hindi Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Hindi Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
30,Language not listed / MISC Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
31,System-Network Administration-Tier II/III Help Desk Support & Cyber Security Specialist,"Global Science & Technology, Inc.","Greenbelt, MD 20770",None,"Global Science & Technology, Inc. (GST), a growing scientific and high technology company, is seeking an experienced information technology professional to support our Corporate headquarters office. Position is available in either Greenbelt, MD or Fairmont, WV.
Position Summary:
Provide overall System-Network Administration support with an ability to lead/guide a group of junior IT/Help desk apprentices. Provide instructive Help Desk and System Administration support to the GST headquarters and remote offices. Provide Cyber Security (InfoSec) which would include familiarity with Cyber policy/processes (logging, detection, remediation, etc.) and Cyber applications (forensics, etc.).
Primary Duties:
Network Administrator Support
Assist and contribute to the establishment of the network specifications by conferring with users; analyzing workflow, access, information, and security requirements; designing router administration, including interface configuration and routing protocols
Assist and monitor and analyze network performance issues, as assigned; including availability, utilization, through-put, and latency; planning and executing the selection, installation, configuration, and testing of equipment; defining network policies and procedures; establishing connections and firewalls, and troubleshooting network problems
Assist with the network security by developing network access, monitoring, control, and evaluation; maintaining documentation. Assist the Lead IT for external reviews and independent audits
Assist the Lead IT with upgrades to the network by conferring with vendors; developing, testing, evaluating, and installing enhancements
Help Desk & General System Administration
Act as escalation support for the Helpdesk; responsibilities include,
Re-image and configure laptops. Maintain computers asset inventory.
Create documentation for the Helpdesk and end-users.
Maintain, operate the GST help desk software.
Provide end user support including desktops, printers, wireless, and mobile devices for all GST locations. This will be done desk side or by use of remote support software.
Installing and updating software appropriate to the HQ staff requirements.
Software patches, upgrades password monitoring, initialization, resets, etc.
Installing and monitoring security measures/countermeasures.
Troubleshooting hardware and software related problems.
Provide systems administration operations and maintenance support under limited supervision.
Assist with GST's IT enterprise infrastructure support under direct supervision.
Maintenance
Assist with and contribute to the application of OS patches and upgrades on a regular basis, and upgrade administrative tools and utilities. Configure/add new services as necessary.
Assist with periodic performance reporting to support capacity planning.
Maintain data center environmental and monitoring equipment.
Phone (Communication) Support
Responsible for and support GST's internal VOIP telephone system (Vonage). Perform as the initial point of contact for all phone services including vendor and accounts payable activities.
Responsible for the administration, maintenance, and support of GST's mobile phone servicing packages (Verizon). Perform as the initial point of contact for all mobile services including vendor and accounts payable activities.
Facilities Support
Support the Facilities ticketing (bar code) system for tracking GST computer, facility equipment. Coordinate with Accounts Payable for depreciation and end-of-life criteria.
Secondary Duties:
Perform other duties as assigned by manager and the Director of IT.
Required Education/Experience/Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Information Technology or related field and 4-6 years of relevant professional experience, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Certifications with Cyber (InfoSec) Security; White-hat Hacker, etc. highly desired.
Physical Qualification(s) Required:
Ability to lift a minimum of 50 pounds.
Mental Qualification(s) Required:
Must be able to effectively communicate technical information and work status (written and verbal) accurately and reliably to project leads and manager.
Function well in a fast-paced/moderate-high pressure IT environment.
U.S. citizenship or Permanent Residency (Green Card holder) is required.
Selected applicants will be subject to a government background investigation.
GST offers competitive salaries; vacation, sick, and holiday leave; major medical, dental, life, long-term and short-term disability insurance; 401K retirement plan; tuition assistance; and opportunities for employee career growth and development.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veterans' status, sexual orientation and gender identity. GST is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.",463,Washington
32,Commercial Team Lead III,Atlantic Union Bank,"Reston, VA 20191 (Hunter area)",None,"Job Details
Description
Position Description:

The Commercial Team Lead III is responsible for the overall performance and management of team’s borrowing and non-borrowing portfolio. Typical team will consist of 4-10 bankers, including self. The Team Lead is accountable for developing and implementing a business plan to acquire, retain and expand relationships and grow the team’s loan and deposit portfolio, while monitoring the portfolio to insure credit quality standards and procedures are met. The Team Lead will be a sales leader by developing a cohesive, experienced and effective team. Team Lead will mentor, coach, and support the group in its loan, deposit and fee income goals. It is expected that the Team Lead III will split time as a producer and coach.

Position Accountabilities:

Relationship Management (60%)

Work closely with internal partners to facilitate the development of new business relationships as well as develop prospects through lead lists and Centers of Influence (COI).
Responsible for acquiring, retaining and expanding customer relationships.
Develop and maintain a quality loan portfolio, obtaining deposits and cross-selling other Bank products and services along with building strong customer relationships.
Maximize bank profitability through appropriate pricing of new loan originations, fee income, and cross selling of all bank products and services, including Treasury Services products Prepare correspondence, commitment letters, loan memorandums and associated documents as required.
Monitor loan portfolio and maintain updated financial information.
Expand existing knowledge base of commercial and other products and services, including loan policy, documentation, structuring and regulatory requirements.
Ensure the portfolio administration and risk management of each client relationship is in compliance with established credit policy, procedure and business strategy as well as commercial and regulatory guidelines.
Identify and successfully capitalize on cross-sell opportunities and makes appropriate referrals.
Execute a call program to acquire, retain and expand customer relationships.
Maintain pipeline of existing relationships and new prospects.
Collect and maintain financial information on borrowers and interact with customers to ensure that all banking needs are being met.
Provide financial advice to customers and profitably sells appropriate products and services to those prospects and clients.
Prepare correspondence, commitment letters, and loan memorandums and associated documents as required.
Ensure that own work is in compliance with applicable policies, procedures, laws, regulations and guidelines.
Participate in organizations and projects to establish referral contacts and Centers of Influence (COI) within the community.
Other Duties as Assigned

Leadership/Management (40%)

Assist in mentoring teammates, to include credit analysis, financial spreading and underwriting.
Regularly meets with team of bankers to ensure that individual goals and objectives are set, monitored and met in support of the Bank’s strategic plan related to market penetration and production.
Assist team to call on non-customers; negotiate transactions; cross sell the Bank’s products and services; and obtain approval for new loan requests.
Ensure timely and thorough monitoring of all credits in individual portfolio, as well as assigned team members portfolio’s
Provide timely response to requests for extension of credit by approving loans within established lending limit or make recommendations on loans requiring higher approval authority.
Provide direct reports with proper tools and authority to execute their assigned functions. Develops skills of team through goal setting, coaching, problem resolution, delegation, training, counseling and performance management.
Assist manager and work collaboratively with Human Resources to recommend staffing levels and approves personnel actions such as hiring, terminations, promotions, transfers, training and development of staff, timely performance reviews and salary increases, in accordance with legal and acceptable Bank personnel practices.
Accountable for the establishment and management of team’s individual goals. Provide regular ongoing coaching and performance feedback to team.
Coach team members to successfully navigate through the client selection sales negotiation, underwriting, approval, documentation and closing processes.

Organizational Relationship:

This position typically reports to a Commercial Group Leader, Market President or Regional President.

Position Qualifications:

Education & Experience

Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics or Finance preferred, or equivalent banking experience
Minimum of 10 years’ experience as a commercial banker
Previous leadership experience preferred

Knowledge & Skills

Strong credit skills evident
Possesses excellent C&I lending and product knowledge and organization skills
Ability to service and originate real estate and more challenging and complex C&I loans
Ability to make knowledgeable loan decisions based on information supplied by the customer verified through a rigorous underwriting process, strong ability to structure loans
Demonstrates effective problem solving and excellent collaboration and inter-personal communication skills
Proven track record with sales and new business development in conjunction with exceeding sales goals.
Ability to work well in a sales driven environment.
Excellent organizational skills, initiative, dependability and ability to work with minimal direction
Knowledge of applicable laws and regulatory compliance related to commercial lending
Proficient computer skills with good working knowledge of Microsoft Office programs including Excel, Word and Outlook.
Strong professional writing skills

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer, Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran. We maintain a drug-free workplace.",463,Washington
33,Bulgarian Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Bulgarian Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
34,Network Engineer III,"Dovel Technologies, LLC","College Park, MD",None,"Overview:

AceInfo is seeking to hire a Network Engineer III to support a federal project in College Park, MD.
Our customer provides a broad range of network and communication capabilities to NWS and other parts of NOAA as well as external agencies. NCEP is responsible for the design, installation, maintenance, and system administration for several local and wide area networks. NWS networks interface with a wide variety of partners and customers to support the NWS mission by collecting and distributing raw and processed hydro meteorological data and products. All observational data ingested by NWS systems access through the NWS networks and the network acts as a message switch which routes weather related products to meet our customer. The successful candidate will be able to provide support for seamless operation and expeditious operational issue remediation accordingly.

Duties & Responsibilities:

The successful candidate will support the installation, implementation, troubleshooting, and maintenance of agency wide-area networks (WANs) and local-area networks (LANs). Assist in designing and managing the WAN infrastructure and any processes related to the WAN. Provide Production Support of the Network, including: day-to-day operations, monitoring and problem resolution client Networks. Provide second level problem identification, diagnosis and resolution of problems. Support the dispatch of circuit and hardware vendors involved in the resolution process. Support the escalation and communication of status to agency management and internal customers. A working knowledge is desirable in various software systems and architectures, communications protocols: and network hardware devices.
Define, design, plan, and implement LAN/WAN infrastructure changes including cabling, switches, routers, and firewalls, Layer 2 and Layer 3 design, and network configurations.
Operate and maintain all network hardware and software.
Plan and execute network migrations, network OS upgrades, network hardware upgrades, firewall implementations and VPN installations.
Provide in-house technical training to staff on a continuing basis.
Monitor network activity including, but not limited to, network equipment health, data transfer rates, network connectivity, bandwidth consumption, and security intrusions.
Create, maintain, and disseminate system documentation and Standard Operating Procedures for network maintenance activities.
Monitor, troubleshoot, diagnose, and resolve problems with Very Small Aperture Terminal (VSAT) satellite systems.
Maintain and operate communication devices and services including Network
Management tools, equipment and software, and telephone support lines (such as the 1-888-OPSnet line).
Deliver monthly reports concerning network metrics including, but not limited to, network uptime statistics, bandwidth consumption, network link utilization, and outages for both network links and network equipment.
Configure and operate CISCO Unified Communications server (Call Manager) in support of enterprise wide VOIP Phones and DVTCs.
Configure Quality of Service (QOS) over a Multiprotocol Label Switching (MPLS) network to support classes of service and voice/video traffic.
Provide the on-call and after hours support as required.
Requirements:
Required qualifications:
A BS degree in engineering, computer science, related field or equivalent demonstrated experience
Ability to pass a background investigation for a position of public trust
Ability to work under general supervision;
Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures.
4-6 years of experience in the field or in a related area.
U.S. Citizen or Green card is required for the position. Candidate must successfully pass a Federal Background Investigation.
#LI-JS1

Company Description:

We are a trusted government partner that blends deep domain expertise with advanced technologies to help our customers solve complex problems that improve, protect, and save lives. As a rapidly growing company, we combine entrepreneurial spirit, customer focus, and an outcomes-based approach to support agency missions in health IT, life sciences, public safety, and grants management.
The Dovel Family of Companies offers employees an opportunity to advance beyond a specific role or contract, we offer a path to develop an enriching career. We believe in empowering a culture of innovation, customer success, and employee growth.
What you’ll get…
Time Off! Flexible schedules and company paid holidays allow you to take the time you need.
Investment in YOU! 401(K) company contributions are yours to keep with no waiting period.
Choices! Unique healthcare plans to choose from with options like fertility and orthodontia benefits.
Discovery! With our tuition assistance and training programs, we support your career advancement.
Tax Savings! Enroll in pre-tax Health or Dependent Care Flexible Spending, HSA with company contributions, parking, and/or transit commuter benefits.
Support! Working parents and busy professionals – we’ve got you covered with a supportive culture, confidential Employee Assistance Program and a membership to Care.com.
Perks! Employee discounts, peer recognition programs, company-wide wellness challenges, and fun community events.
A Voice! A unique culture where you can influence decisions and have your voice heard.
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer with a commitment to diversity. All individuals, regardless of personal characteristics, are encouraged to apply. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, or veteran status.",463,Washington
35,Bengali Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Bengali Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
36,"Supervisor, QC Testing",Emergent Biosolutions,"Rockville, MD 20850",None,"Those who join Emergent BioSolutions feel a sense of ownership about their future. You will excel in an environment characterized by respect, innovation and growth opportunities. Here, you will join passionate professionals who advance their scientific, technical and professional skills to develop products designed-to protect life.
I: JOB SUMMARY
The QC Supervisor, position supports the Quality Control group at Emergent BioSolutions Rockville Campus. The QC Supervisor is responsible for reviewing and scheduling activities in support of the Microbiology, Environmental Monitoring, Analytical (including testing and method transfer), Critical Utility testing programs, Manufacturing Support Testing, and supporting quality initiatives. Individuals will manage teams of 4-7 analysts. An individual in this role will serve as a QC trainer and a coach for their team. Analyst’s performance review, goal planning and compensation planning will be the responsibility of an individual in this role.

II: ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Assist the QC Manager with feasibility assessment of client projects
Reviews/Approves microbiological / analytical work per SOPs, and applicable protocols
Informs supervisor/manager upon observing OOS, OOL, or generation of deviations
Leads/Assists with complex investigations by obtaining root cause and implementing changes
Writes, reviews, revises, and approves SOP’s and Testing Standards as necessary
Trains QC analyst
Reviews, analyzes, interprets, reports, and approves data
Applies Environmental/Analytical knowledge to support change and risk management
Support department compliance and productivity goals
Track time Individual and Team time worked per project and holiday
Identify and implement continuous improvement opportunities to reduce non-value-added work or complexity.
May require work on weekends and nights, travel, or work with 3rd party vendor
Detailed oriented – Able to complete required tasks and associated documentation with minimal error.
Adaptability – Maintain positive attitude in a changing work environment
Communication – Effectively communicates with all levels of manufacturing and support staff.


R equires vaccination against different viruses including Vaccinia virus.

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature of work performed by those in this job. It is not an exhaustive list of all duties, and other duties may be assigned.

III: MINIMUM EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, SKILLS

Education:
BS in Microbiology/Biology/Chemistry or related field

Experience:
5+ years (MS with 3+ years) in the Pharmaceutical or Biotechnology with emphasis in aseptic processing, QC microbiology, environmental monitoring, water system, quality control, validation, and manufacturing processes.
Proven track record of achievement and sustained performance in a cGMP/GLP environment.
Strong technical and communication skills: oral/written and listening. Personal Competencies: Self – awareness, Integrity, Team Player, Creative and Flexible

Skills:
Knowledge of MS Word, Excel, LIMS and PowerPoint.
There are physical/mental demands and work environment characteristics that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. This information is available upon request from the candidate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform all essential functions.

Emergent BioSolutions is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and values the diversity of our workforce. Emergent does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), sexual orientation, age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, marital status, physical or mental disability, military service or veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristics protected by applicable federal, state or local law.

Information submitted will be used by Emergent BioSolutions for activities related to your prospective employment. Emergent BioSolutions respects your privacy and any use of the information submitted will be subject to the terms of our Privacy Policy .

Emergent BioSolutions does not accept non-solicited resumes or candidate submittals from search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list. Unsolicited resumes or candidate information submitted to Emergent BioSolutions by search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list shall become the property of Emergent BioSolutions and if the candidate is subsequently hired by Emergent BioSolutions, Emergent BioSolutions shall not owe any fee to the submitting agency.",463,Washington
37,Project Manager,IEM,"Arlington, VA",None,"Why Join IEM?
We are a woman owned company in Emergency Management that embraces teamwork, collaboration, flexible performance, actionable solutions and integrity/ethics. Our work touches everyone. We produce results that matter. Results that save lives – join us while we build a safe, secure and resilient world.
Our Culture:
IEMers believe in the greater good and it is our commitment to attract those who have excellent technical skills, creative minds and innovative ideas to keep propelling us forward.
Primary Location: Client Site(s) in Aberdeen Proving Ground, MD OR Crystal City, VA
Job Summary:
IEM is looking for a suitable candidate to support a potential Department of Defense customer as the Project Manager of a team providing Test and Evaluation (T&E) Information and Data Management System prototyping and demonstration support; this system is based on a configurable low-code cloud-based enterprise software solution combining project management, content (data and documents) management, workflow management, application integration, and business intelligence/data analytics capabilities in order to more efficiently plan and execute T&E projects, manage the T&E results data and reports, and track organizational performance metrics.
Responsibilities:
Provide management, direction, administration, quality management, and leadership of the execution of the prototype development and demonstration project leading to field deployment.
Act as the overall lead, manager, and administrator for the effort.
Direct efforts of cross-competency teams including Contractors at multiple locations and shall serve as the primary interface and POC with Government program authorities and representatives on technical and project issues.
Responsible for regularly briefing leadership on program status and milestones including leading technical demonstrations of prototype system during various phases of development.
Oversee and manage overall project execution schedule by developing procedures, planning and directing execution of the contractual, technical, multi-disciplinary engineering, programming, maintenance, and administrative support effort, and monitoring and reporting progress.
Manage acquisition and employment of project resources and control financial and administrative aspects of the project. Notifies the CORs, immediately, of any problems or issues

Requirements:
Possess a Master of Business and Management (MBM), a Master of Business Administration (MBA), or a master’s degree in a related technical discipline (e.g., Engineering, Computer Science, or Electronics). A Bachelor’s degree with additional years of experience is acceptable.
Possess a minimum of 5 years of Project Management experience managing complex projects in an IT engineering or big data environment.
Possess a minimum of 3 years of experience managing projects utilizing non-traditional program management methodologies (e.g., Agile) in a big data environment.
Possess knowledge of current Department of the Army, Army Test and Evaluation Command (ATEC) T&E process Life Cycle and all existing T&E information, data management and sharing systems.
Possess knowledge of Army’s digital transformation plan to accelerate and improve T&E and other data and information sharing by empowering a digital workforce with democratized access to data, collaboration tools, and advanced analytics.
Possess an active certification in one of the following:
Project Management Institute (PMI) Project Management Professional (PMP), PMI Program Management Professional (PgMP) certification, or equivalent program or project management certification.
Federal Acquisition Certification for Program and Project Managers (FAC P/PM) Level 3.
Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) Level III Program Management certification
Hold an ACTIVE SECRET CLEARANCE or higher.
Knowledge of and/or experience with Cloud Hosted data/information sharing and analysis systems under Impact Levels 5 and 6 is a plus.

Benefits and more:
10 paid holidays
Vacation pay
Sick pay
401 (K) plan with matching
Company paid STD and LTD

IEM is an Equal Opportunity Employer including Vets and Disabled

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
XJ6",463,Washington
38,Azerbaijani Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Azerbaijani Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
39,Program Manager,Technical and Project,"Alexandria, VA 22310",None,"Contingent Upon Award
JOB SUMMARY
In this position you will provide custom commercial IT services and IT services-based solutions and support for Program Management, Portfolio and Product Line Support, and Communication and Outreach, and Tier III Operations (T3Ops) to the Transformation Program.
 ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Responsible for all Contractor work performed under this Performance Work Statement (PWS).
Perform as single point of contact for the Contracting Officer and the Contracting Officer’s Representative (COR).
Provide technical/management leadership on major tasks or technology assignments.
Establish goals and plans that meet project objectives.
Possess domain and expert technical knowledge.
Direct and control activities for a client, having overall responsibility for financial management, methods, and staffing to ensure that technical requirements are met.
Direct and control activities for the client, having overall responsibility for financial management, methods, and staffing to ensure that technical requirements are met.
Possess decision-making skills and domain knowledge. Decision making and domain knowledge may have a critical impact on overall project implementation.
May supervise others.
Plan, initiate, and manage information technology (IT) projects.
Lead and guide the work of technical staff.
Serve as liaison between business and technical aspects of projects.
Plan project stages and assess business implications for each stage.
Monitor progress to assure deadlines, standards, and cost targets are met.
 EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
PMP certification preferred
Must be available at the start of the Task Order
Must participate in Proposal Oral Presentation
 KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS/ABILITIES
Proficiency with MS Office products Word, Excel and PowerPoint
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
In addition to being subject matter expert in his/her respective field, this person will serve as a leader of the Contractor team and will be empowered to resolve issues within his/her span of responsibility.
Public Trust Clearance
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
 While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee is frequently required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.
WORK ENVIRONMENT
All employees are responsible for their own safety, as well as that of others in the workplace. To help us maintain a safe workplace, everyone must be safety-conscious at all times. This position is performed in a typical office environment. The noise level in the work environment is usually quiet to moderate. The safe use of TAPE equipment, as well as safe practices while on TAPE property, is essential.
DISABILITY SPECIFICATIONS
TAPE will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990.
EEO/AA/ADA Employer",463,Washington
40,Public Affairs Specialist,US National Telecommunications and Information Adm...,"Reston, VA 20191 (Hattontown area)","$72,750 - $113,362 a year","Duties
Summary
This position is with the First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet Authority), an independent authority within the National Telecommunications and Information Administration. Authorized by Congress in 2012, The FirstNet Authority's mission is to develop, build and operate the nationwide, broadband network that equips first responders with the necessary communications to save lives and protect U.S. communities. Come join the FirstNet Authority team and make a difference in public safety.
Responsibilities
This position is also being announced to All US Citizens: DE-11105319-21-DL

The primary purpose of this position is the development and implementation of communications projects - audio, visual, and written - to enhance awareness among internal and external audiences about FirstNet Authority programs, activities, and accomplishments.

Duties performed:

Serves as point of contact and liaison on public safety communication matters.
Cultivates strong partnerships with public safety organizations and associations to develop publications, messaging, and social media campaigns.
Enhances engagement with public safety on public affairs communications, outreach, and consultation program and initiatives.

Travel Required
25% or less - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
4
Job family (Series)
1035 Public Affairs
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a U.S. Citizen to apply.
You must be suitable for Federal employment.
You must be registered for Selective Service (www.sss.gov), if applicable.
You must successfully pass a background investigation. This may include a credit check, a review of financial issues, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.
A probationary period may be required.
Time in grade requirements must be met.
If you receive a conditional offer of employment for this position, you will be required to complete an Optional Form 306, Declaration for Federal Employment, and to sign and certify the accuracy of all information in your application.
All Federal employees are required to have Federal salary payments made by direct deposit to a financial institution of their choosing.
Permanent Change of Duty Station (PCS) Expenses will not be paid.
Qualifications
Applicants must demonstrate that they meet the Minimum Qualification requirements as noted below.

Minimum Qualifications ZA-III: You qualify for the ZA-III (GS-11/12) grade level if you possess one year of specialized experience, equivalent to the GS-09 grade level or equivalent pay band ZA-II in the Federal government, performing all of the following duties:
Supporting the planning and execution of media relation efforts, including social media, as part of a larger public affairs program;
Providing editorial, speech writing, and other communications support for public affairs campaigns; and
Supporting internal communications efforts, including the development and production of newsletters, internal staff emails, and presentations.
(NOTE: Your resume must explicitly indicate how you meet this requirement, otherwise you will be found ineligible.)

-OR-

Successfully completed a Ph.D. or equivalent doctoral degree or 3 full years of progressively higher level graduate education leading to such a degree or LL.M., if related;

-OR-

A combination of the required experience and education for this grade level.

All qualification requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement. Qualification claims will be subject to verification.


Time-in-Grade Requirements: Under competitive merit promotion procedures, any individual who is currently holding, or who has held within the previous 52 weeks, a General Schedule position under a non-temporary appointment in the competitive or excepted service, must meet ""time-in-grade"" requirements (have served 52 weeks at the next lower grade of the grade for which you are applying). Time-In-Grade requirements also apply to current employees applying for a Veterans Employment Opportunities Act of 1998 (VEOA) appointment. NOTE: All current or former Federal employees must provide a copy of their SF-50 (you may need to submit more than one), ""Notice of Personnel Action"" that indicates proof of status and time-in-grade eligibility. The SF-50 must include your position, title, series, grade, step, tenure (1 or 2), and type of service (Competitive or Excepted).

NOTE: Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., Peace Corps, AmeriCorps) and other organizations (e.g., professional; philanthropic; religious; spiritual; community; student; social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment. You will receive credit for all qualifying experience, including volunteer experience.

Applicants must meet ALL application requirements, to include a complete online resume, by 11:59 p.m. EASTERN TIME ZONE (ETZ) on the closing date of this announcement. Applicants must meet all qualification requirements by the closing date of this announcement. Qualification requirements in the vacancy announcements are based on the U.S. Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Qualification Standards Handbook, which contains federal qualification standards. This handbook is available on the Office of Personnel Management's website located at www.opm.gov/qualifications
Education
If you are claiming education as any part of your qualifications for this position, you must submit an official transcript, unofficial transcript, or a list including courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned.

Special Instructions for Foreign Education: If you are using education completed in foreign colleges or universities to meet the qualification requirements, you must show that the education credentials have been evaluated by a private organization that specializes in interpretation of foreign education programs and such education has been deemed equivalent to that gained in an accredited U.S. education program; or full credit has been given for the courses at a U.S. accredited college or university. Failure to provide such documentation with your application will result in lost consideration. For further information, visit: https://sites.ed.gov/international/recognition-of-foreign-qualifications/.
Additional information
Promotion Potential: When promotion potential is shown, the agency is not making a commitment and is not obligated to provide future promotions to you if you are selected. Future promotions will be dependent on your ability to perform the duties at a higher level, the continuing need for an employee assigned to the higher level, and administrative approval.

Background Investigation: To ensure the accomplishment of its mission, the Department of Commerce requires each and every employee to be reliable and trustworthy. To meet those standards, all selected applicants must undergo and successfully complete a background investigation for a clearance as a condition of placement in this Low Risk position. This review includes financial issues such as delinquency in the payment of debts, child support and/or tax obligations, as well as certain criminal offenses and illegal use or possession of drugs.

Veterans Employment Opportunities Act (VEOA): To be eligible for a VEOA appointment, the veteran must 1) be a preference eligible; or 2) be a veteran separated after 3 or more years of continuous active service performed under honorable conditions (you must submit a DD214-member copy 4).

Current or Former Political Appointees: The Office of Personnel Management (OPM) must authorize employment offers made to current or former political appointees. If you are currently, or have been within the last 5 years, a political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee in the Executive Branch, you must disclose this information to the Human Resources Office.

The Department of Commerce provides reasonable accommodations to applicants with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application and hiring process, please notify the Human Resources Office. The decision on granting reasonable accommodation will be on a case-by-case basis. TTY users can contact the Human Resources Office via the Federal Relay Service, 1-800-877-8339.

The physical worksite for this position is located in Reston, VA. However, the FirstNet Authority is currently under a maximum telework posture due to the COVID-19 pandemic; therefore, this position is currently under a 100 percent telework schedule. The position's telework schedule will likely change in the future when the FirstNet Authority moves away from its maximum telework posture. At that time, the incumbent will be expected to report to the physical work site in accordance with the updated status requirements of their supervisor. The nature and scope of future telework opportunities will be subject to the unit's telework policy, any applicable bargaining unit agreements, and supervisory approval. Payment of relocation expenses, as applicable, will be paid in accordance with this Job Opportunity Announcement. Non-compliance with the supervisor's telework-schedule requirement could result in adverse action, including separation.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
We will review your resume, optional cover letter and supporting documentation to determine if you meet the minimum qualifications for the position. If you meet the minimum qualifications stated in the vacancy announcement, we will compare your resume, optional cover letter and supporting documentation to your responses on the scored occupational questionnaire (True/False, Yes/ No, Multiple Choice questions). However, your resume and/or optional cover letter must support your responses to the scored occupational questionnaire, or your score may be lowered. The best qualified candidates will be identified for referral to the hiring manager and may be invited for an interview.

The scored occupational questionnaire will evaluate you on the following competencies; please do not provide a separate written response.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES (KSA): Your qualifications will be evaluated on the basis of your level of knowledge, skills, abilities and/or competencies in the following areas:

Communications and Media
Technical Competence
Writing
Written Communication

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Not Required
Drug test required
No
Position sensitivity and risk
Non-sensitive (NS)/Low Risk
Trust determination process
Suitability/Fitness
Required Documents

Required Documents
To apply for this position, you must submit a complete Application Package which includes:

1. Your resume showing a detailed description of your job-related qualifications that includes beginning and ending dates with the month and year and hours worked per week (if less than 40) for each paid and non-paid work experience job title listed.

2. Other supporting documents (only submit if applicable to you):

Are you qualifying based on education? Submit a copy of your college transcript (unofficial is acceptable) or a list of coursework with hours completed.
Are you claiming veterans' preference? Submit Member Copy 4 of your DD-214 or other (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty) or notice form. Those applying for 10-Point preference must fill out the SF-15 and provide an official document dated 1991 or later, from the Department of Veterans Affairs or from a branch of the Armed Forces, and/or any other associated documentation based on your preference. If applying based on eligibility under the Veterans Opportunity to Work (VOW) Act, you must submit certification from the Armed Forces that you will be discharged or released from active duty within 120 days from the date on the certification. This must indicate your dates of service, your rank, and confirm that you will be separated under honorable conditions.
Are you claiming special priority selection rights under the Career Transition Assistance Program (ICTAP/CTAP)? If so, submit:
A copy of your RIF separation notice, notice of proposed removal for failure to relocate, notice of disability annuity termination, or certification from the National Guard Bureau or Military Department that you are eligible for disability retirement;
A copy of your SF-50 ""Notification of Personnel Action'', documenting your RIF separation, noting your positions, grade level, and duty location, and/or Agency certification of inability to place you through RPL, etc.;
A copy of your latest performance appraisal including your rating; and
Any documentation from your agency that shows your current promotion potential.
Are you a current or former political Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES or Presidential Appointee employee? Submit a copy of your applicable SF-50, along with a statement that provides the following information regarding your most recent political appointment:
Position title;
Type of appointment (Schedule A, Schedule C, Non-career SES, or Presidential Appointee);
Agency; and
Beginning and ending dates of appointment.
Are you a current or former federal employee?
A copy of your latest SF-50 ""Notification of Personnel Action'' documenting your pay plan, series and grade.
Career Transition Assistance Program: This program applies to Federal service employees whose positions have been deemed surplus or no longer needed, or employees who have been involuntarily separated from a Federal service position within the competitive service. To receive selection priority for this position, you must: 1) meet eligibility criteria for CTAP or ICTAP; 2) will be eligible if it is determined that they have exceeded the minimum qualifications for the position by attaining at least a rating of 85 out of 100; and 3) submit the appropriate documentation to support your CTAP or ICTAP eligibility. Well-Qualified includes those applicants whose knowledge, skills, and abilities clearly exceed the minimum qualification requirements for the position. For information on eligibility criteria and required documentation, go to: http://www.opm.gov/rif/employee_guides/career_transition.asp

You will be required to submit official documentation prior to appointment. The agency will then verify the information provided on your application (i.e., degree, veterans' preference, disability, etc.).

AGENCY CONTACT INFORMATION:

Philadelphia Services Branch
philadelphia@opm.gov
215-861-3074

Agency Information:
First Responder Network Authority
National Telecommunications and Information Administration
Department of Commerce
12201 Sunrise Valley Drive
RestonVirginia20192
If you are relying on your education to meet qualification requirements:
Education must be accredited by an accrediting institution recognized by the U.S. Department of Education in order for it to be credited towards qualifications. Therefore, provide only the attendance and/or degrees from schools accredited by accrediting institutions recognized by the U.S. Department of Education.
Failure to provide all of the required information as stated in this vacancy announcement may result in an ineligible rating or may affect the overall rating.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Family of overseas employees
Family members of a federal employee or uniformed service member who is, or was, working overseas.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Individuals with disabilities
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Peace Corps & AmeriCorps Vista
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Status Candidates (this includes current or former Federal employees with career or career-conditional tenure in the competitive service; Former Overseas Employees, CTAP, ICTAP, VRA, VEOA, 30% or More Disabled Veterans, Schedule A, Military Spouses, Americorps, Peace Corps, Vista and Interchange Agreement Eligibles)",463,Washington
41,"Senior Adviser, Financial Stability and Climate Change - Division of Financial Stability",Federal Reserve Board of Governors,"Washington, DC (Foggy Bottom area)",None,"I. JOB SPECIFIC DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
1) Chairs the Financial Stability Climate Committee (FSCC) which is the staff committee charged with developing and implementing a program to incorporate climate-related risks into the Board’s financial stability framework.
2) Leads the integration of climate-related risks into the Board’s financial stability framework. The result of this multi-year effort will be a coherent program that identifies the most relevant climate-related risks and the mechanisms by which these risks are most likely to erode the resilience of the financial system. In addition, it will permit ongoing assessments of the magnitudes of these potential effects as well as evaluation of policy options to increase the resilience of the financial system to these potential effects.
3) Manages the ongoing implementation of the resulting program. The program and its implementation will include, but not necessarily be limited to: the effects of climate-related risks on relevant financial institutions and markets; the extent to which climate-related risks are increasing key financial vulnerabilities, such as asset valuations, leverage, and funding risks; evaluation of relevant policy options; and assisting the Board of Governors in its domestic and international engagement on climate related financial stability risks.
4) Represents the Board domestically and internationally at forums where climate related financial stability policy is developed. Such forums include the Financial Stability Oversight Council, the Financial Stability Board, and the Network for the Greening of the Financial System.
5) Manages staff in a small support team for the FSCC. Staff members would include the Secretariat within the Division of Financial Stability and any future hires working in the support of the FSCC’s goals.
6) Informs governors, as needed, on emerging issues related to climate risk and financial stability.
7) Prepares governors for testimony, speeches, or other public engagements.
II. DIVISION SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS:
Reporting to the deputy director, serves as a senior leader in the Division of Financial Stability to be a thought leader in the Division’s work at the intersection of financial stability and climate change. The position is a leadership role in the division’s efforts to organize and lead a broad-based program to incorporate climate-related risks into our financial stability efforts.
Position requires location in Washington, DC office once remote work period is complete.

Position Requirements
III. KNOWLEDGE/SKILL/EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:
1) PhD in economics, finance, or a related field is preferred; however, a PhD in one of the physical sciences with a focus on climate will be considered.
2) A minimum of 5 years of relevant post-doctoral experience is required.
3) Demonstrated interest or knowledge in the field of climate economics is required. Such interest or knowledge can be demonstrated, for example, through several years of work experience in the field of climate or environment economics. Knowledge of financial markets, institutions, and regulation is also required. Such knowledge can be demonstrated through publications in high quality academic journals, publication of working papers, and presentations at high-quality conferences and workshops.
4) Experience working in interagency/intergovernmental work is desirable.
5) Experience working with policymakers or in a policymaking institution is desirable.
6) Requires the ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing, with the public as well as with all levels of staff and management
7) Strategic thinker with demonstrated strong project execution and project management capabilities, analytical skills, political savvy, and conflict mediation skills.
8) Demonstrated experience and commitment to fostering collaboration and employee engagement.
9) Ability to lead and manage staff and projects effectively, set priorities, assess performance, guide staff development, and make budgetary recommendations.
10) Ability to balance competing interests among a variety of clients and readily readjust priorities to respond to pressing and changing client demands. Must be able to anticipate and meet the clients’ needs while maintaining high-quality end products.
11) Exceptional organizational savvy and agility as demonstrated by ability to manage across organizational boundaries, building high performing teams, diminishing organizational silos, strengthening teams, and facilitating effective group and team dynamics.
IV. OFFICER SPECIFIC POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES:
1) Acts as responsible steward to the function(s), Division, and Board by demonstrating proficiency in the Board’s espoused competencies.
2) Balances and mitigates key organizational and functional risks where appropriate and develops and executes sustainable risk mitigation strategies.
3) Fosters a continuous learning culture.
4) Exercises appropriate judgement and decision-making in complex situations.
5) Demonstrates innovation and thought leadership relevant to future-state organizational and functional people strategies.
6) Demonstrates strong leadership and management skills aligned to the Board’s espoused values.
7) Keeps skills and knowledge current and aligned to best practices relative to key rules, regulations, and policies, as well as economic, political, and social trends that affect the organization. Understands near-term and long-term needs for the organization and determines how operations should be positioned to meet such needs.
8) Demonstrates proficiency in political savvy, organizational savvy, and interpersonal communication skills.
V. BOARD COMPETENCIES:
1) Decision Quality: Makes timely, thoughtful, strategic decisions
2) Learning Agility: Takes responsibility for building organizational agility
3) Drive for Excellence: Delivers results by developing shared vision and direction for the organization
4) Perspective and Strategic Agility: Leads and acts with the future in mind
5) Collaborative Relationships: Sets the tone for collaborative organization
6) Effective Communication: Effectively speaks and acts on behalf of the Board
VI. PERSONAL RELATIONSHIPS:
1) Has frequent contact with members of the Board, both in discussions and through memoranda, regarding matters pertaining to area(s) of responsibility.
2) Has frequent contact with senior staff and other professionals in the division, elsewhere at the Board, and the Reserve Banks regarding matters pertaining to area(s) of responsibility.
3) Has regular contact with all staff in the function(s) to stay connected to the pulse of the division, provide leadership, and act as a role model.
4) Has frequent contact with individuals from other federal agencies, international organizations, and in the private sector regarding the subject matters in area(s) of responsibilities.
VII. INTERNAL MANAGEMENT RESPONSIBILITIES:
1) Provides guidance, coaching, and feedback to, and conducts performance reviews for managers and other direct reports, and ensures same is provided to all function staff.
2) Responsible for accomplishing approved program objectives for area(s) of responsibility within the financial and personnel resources allocated by the Board and the division's senior management.
3) Participates in the development of the division’s strategic plan, goals, and budget. Recommends program objectives and their priorities for area(s) of responsibility.
4) Recommends personnel actions involving promotions, reclassifications, merit increases, and reassignments or separations in area(s) of responsibility.
VIII. POSITION DEMANDS:
1) Ability to exercise independent and sound judgment in establishing objectives for assigned area(s) of responsibility that provide support and services for the division’s and Board’s missions.
2) Ability to translate customer service and organizational development theories and best practices into effective strategies for adoption in area(s) of responsibility to achieve and maintain high levels of customer service.
3) Ability to communicate effectively, both orally and in writing, to the Board and individual members thereof, senior Board staff, other Board and Reserve Bank staff: and staff at other government agencies and in the private sector on complex and technical matters.
4) Ability to be an effective spokesperson and advocate for the Board and the division in outside contacts, which may involve significant business dealings.
5) Ability to operate under pressure to meet deadlines accurately and in a timely manner.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, or application, membership, or service in the uniformed services.",463,Washington
42,A&A Project Manager,"Amazon Web Services, Inc.","Annapolis Junction, MD",None,"
5+ years of Assessment and Authorization experience in a related industry (experience owning a program/product/feature, scoping requirements, planning milestones, project management and working with technical teams)
5+ years of familiarity with the processes and documentation required to articulate the appropriate system security products or services with stakeholder government customers to define a project scope, requirements, and deliverables.
1+ years experience architecting information systems for authorization under ICD 503 or DoD Risk Management Framework.
Current, active US Government Security Clearance at the TS/SCI level with Polygraph.

Amazon Web Services (AWS) is the leading cloud provider, providing virtual infrastructure, storage, networking, messaging, and many other services to customers all over the world. AWS runs a globally distributed environment, operating at massive levels of scale. Businesses, from start-ups to enterprises, run their operations and applications on AWS’s multi-tenant infrastructure. Governmental organizations are also looking to and depending on AWS for cloud solutions and services.

World Wide Public Sector is looking for an exceptional A&A Project Manager to support Assessment and Authorization (A&A) and audit activities for AWS services in our Federal Delivery Organization (FDO). The FDO is responsible for program management activities across a portfolio of Federal programs, and activities include managing multiple concurrent region expansion work packages, task orders, maintaining the program’s integrated master schedule, risk mitigation strategies, Assessment and Authorization activities, quality assurance and IV&V functions.

This position is based in the Annapolis Junction, MD. You will join a cadre of program management, technical business development, and information security professionals to establish a proactive, results-driven team focused on improving our ability to deliver new capabilities to our customers. As a A&A Project Manager on the A&A team, you will spend the majority of your time working with technical business leaders (such as hardware and software engineering leaders, and technical program managers) to develop and produce A&A related documentation to ensure efficient service onboarding.

The role requires working experience with the Risk Management Framework (RMF), System Security Plans (SSP), Security Control Traceability Matrices (SCTM), familiarity with the customer environment, and an understanding of existing AWS services. You will draw upon an information security background, critical thinking, and analytic problem solving skills to support A&A activities, recommend improvements as required, and effectively support the delivery of industry leading, secure services to our Federal customers.

Core Responsibilities include:
Coordinate amongst government customers to produce and implement system security packages across cloud infrastructure platforms.

Work across a wide variety of AWS teams to establish and maintain information security documentation, including security questionnaires, SSPs, and SCTMs.

Responsible for reviewing proposed new systems, networks, and software designs for potential system security risks, and resolving integration issues related to the implementation of new services with the existing cloud infrastructure.

Implement higher level system security requirements such as those resulting from laws, regulations, or government directives by developing long range plans for security systems that anticipate, identify, evaluate, mitigate, and minimize risks associated with cloud infrastructures’ vulnerabilities or perceived vulnerabilities.

Here at AWS, we embrace our differences. We are committed to furthering our culture of inclusion. We have ten employee-led affinity groups, reaching 40,000 employees in over 190 chapters globally. We have innovative benefit offerings, and we host annual and ongoing learning experiences, including our Conversations on Race and Ethnicity (CORE) and AmazeCon (gender diversity) conferences. Amazon’s culture of inclusion is reinforced within our 14 Leadership Principles, which remind team members to seek diverse perspectives, learn and be curious, and earn trust.

This position requires that the candidate selected be a US Citizen and obtain and maintain an active TS/SCI security clearance with polygraph.

Our team puts a high value on work-life balance. It isn’t about how many hours you spend at home or at work; it’s about the flow you establish that brings energy to both parts of your life. We believe striking the right balance between your personal and professional life is critical to life-long happiness and fulfillment. We offer flexibility in working hours and encourage you to find your own balance between your work and personal lives.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded professional and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.


DoD Manual 8570 IAM Level III certification
Solid foundation in service-oriented and web-service technologies
Experience designing and implementing systems using AWS
Familiarity with Information Security or Audit frameworks
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role

Amazon is committed to a diverse and inclusive workplace. Amazon is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, protected veteran status, disability, age, or other legally protected status. For individuals with disabilities who would like to request an accommodation, please visit https://www.amazon.jobs/en/disability/us.",463,Washington
43,Thai Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Thai Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
44,Ukrainian Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Ukrainian Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
45,Napali Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Napali Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
46,Management Analyst III (PMS 415 FMS),Sentek Global,"Washington, DC",None,"The Team::At Sentek Global, we are always looking for highly motivated professionals, bold innovators and top industry talent. Headquartered in beautiful San Diego with worldwide capabilities and opportunities, Sentek Global is on the cutting edge in Department of Defense and commercial consulting. We’re shifting the paradigm in cybersecurity solutions, IT support, software development, engineering and sales. Not only are we looking for top talent, we’re looking for passionate contributors who will be inspired by a culture where innovation thrives.If you are interested in joining a team of collaborators, leaders, visionaries and problem-solvers, contact us today at talent@sentekglobal.com.The Role::Reporting to the MITS Account Manager, the* Management Analyst III (PMS 415 FMS)* will support NAVSEA, Team Submarine, and PMS 415. This position is located at the Washington Navy Yard (WNY) in Washington, DC. Our team provides Program Management, Financial Management, Engineering, Logistics, and Foreign Military Sales (FMS) professional support services to the Team Submarine organization.What You'll Do::Provide support to NAVSEA, Team Submarine, and PMS 415.Provide overall Program Management of various Team Submarine Acquisition and Sustainment programs.Support acquisition documentation and financial management tracking of program documents.Provide Program Management, Stakeholder Communications, Schedule Coordination, and other organizing functions as required.FMS Case Manager for PMS 415. Needs to be able to handle cases from inception to closure.Bid and Proposal support if requested.Other duties as assigned.What We're Looking For::Required Qualifications: An active secret clearance is required to be considered for this position.A bachelor's degree in a business or technical field is required.Ten (10) or more years experience in engineering/science management, operations research analysis, financial/cost analysis, or a relevant field.Possesses analytical and problem-solving skills for both technical and business-related matters.Experience with DoD / Navy program management, Government technical management, or Industry business management.Knowledge of NAVSEA / Navy organization, stakeholders, and policies.Exhibit effective listening skills and communication skills.Foster cooperation among individuals.Establish and model high standards of performance.Exceptional organization skills with high attention to detail.Advanced time management and analytical skills.Exceptional customer service experience.Excellent written and oral communication.Strong organizational skills.Advanced Microsoft Office Skills, with an ability to become familiar with firm-specific programs and software.Desired Qualifications: Ten (10) or more years of experience with Navy acquisition and/or In-Service Programs is desired.Five (5) or more years of experience working with Foreign Military Sales (FMS) including drafting Price and Availability (P&A) and/or Letter of Authorization (LOA) packages as well as monitoring case execution and developing case closure package is desired.Experience leading a project and interfacing with an end item customer is desired.Sentek Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.Job Type: Full-time",463,Washington
47,Mail Management Analyst III- DHS,"CGI Group, Inc.","Washington, DC 20022",None,"Mail Management Analyst III- DHS


Position Description

CGI Federal is seeking a Management Analyst III to support DHS in Washington DC.

Your future duties and responsibilities

The Management Analyst III position within the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) Mail Management Program Office (MMPO) will perform the following tasks:


Participates in special studies with team members to aid managers as well as assists in developing and evaluating policies in assigned program areas. Works with the Senior Management Analyst and management to gather reporting requirements, translate requirements into high quality automated reports, dashboards, and analyses using various technologies, including advanced Excel, MS Access, MS PowerPoint, MS Project, MS Visio, SharePoint and/or other analytical tools;


Provides services in support of ICE Official Mail Accounting System (OMAS) processes/transactions. (OMAS is the system by which ICE pays the U.S. Postal Service [USPS] for postage related expenditures.) Technical support for this requirement includes reviewing OMAS data for tracking purposes, providing recommendations for program effectiveness, maintaining spreadsheets of OMAS data, and drafting OMAS related reports. (One OMAS report is the monthly USPS OMAS report.) The Management Analyst III shall become familiar with the OMAS system within 30 days of starting work at ICE;


Provides support for mail management reports, metrics, and scorecards. The Management Analyst III shall apply best in-kind techniques/practices and work within the DHS/ICE organizational and business structures;


Assists the Senior Management Analyst in providing administrative/management services in support of current initiatives to include postal inspections/compliance activity to improve the ICE Mail Management Program work effort, and provides services in support of DHS Mail Management Program mandates and to assist in meeting DHS requirements;


Provides services to support the collection of mail performance measures, mail volume data, and expenditure data for all ICE mail operations (approximately 400 locations). The Management Analyst III shall provide services to support the maintenance of location data, and compliance efforts;


Collects and maintains data from monthly Express Service provider reports on mail/shipping volumes, performance and costs (including fees); identifies problems/concerns and monitors ICE program office inquiries; develops extensive profiles of ICE incoming/outgoing mail/shipments, and recommends process changes to the Senior Management Analyst and ICE Mail Manager, as well as effectively communicates as necessary to program offices, and personnel; profiles ICE mail stops and monitors the number and effectiveness of them, and makes recommendations to open/close mail stops;


Assists the Senior Management Analyst in designing and interpreting data for analytical deliverables (e.g., statistical analyses, reports, dashboards, etc.) using advanced Excel, MS Access, MS PowerPoint, MS Project, MS Visio, SharePoint and/or other analytical tools to identify patterns and correlations among various data points;


Assists the Senior Management Analyst in querying relevant data from databases, manipulate large structured and unstructured data sets to build insightful solutions to complex problems, and present the results in visually engaging and intuitive reports and dashboards that can be easily understood, and actionable;


Assists the Senior Management Analyst in the development of ICE Mail Management Instructions and manuals reflecting current GSA/DHS policy and standards for the ICE Mail Manager to review. Additionally, regularly reviews and updates, as necessary, these Instructions and manuals;


Documents business and technical reporting methodology, best practices and related rules for generating reports to ensure results are accurate. Utilizes knowledge of administrative regulations and operating procedures, and possesses skill applying fact-finding techniques to gather clear-cut factual evidence of administrative waste and abuse, or compliance with regulations;


Administrative and interpersonal skills are required to organize and coordinate systematic, professional efforts to meet difficult planning needs and unanticipated requirements, and provide written and/or oral reports with conclusions, alternatives, and/or recommendations on policies, projects, or studies;


Works with limited guidance, manages conflicting priorities, plans, organizes and works as a team and/or task force across organizational lines, including the ability to monitor progress to ensure that realistic objectives and milestones are achieved, to accept assigned responsibilities, and get mission requirements accomplished in a timely manner;


Effectively communicates, both orally and in writing, and an ability to grasp conceptual ideas and exercise original thought where there is an established time limit for deliberation, consultation and evaluation, and to present well-considered and sound recommendations/suggestions; and


Assists the Senior Management Analyst and/or the ICE Mail Manager, as necessary.


Additionally, the Management Analyst III position is responsible for serving as a back-up to the Management Analyst II and will perform the following tasks, when necessary:


Reviews the ICE Mail Management group mailbox and responds in a timely manner, as necessary, to all daily Stamps.com account requests from ICE field locations. Specifically, answers all types of account requests (i.e. postage funding requests, adding a user requests, deleting a user requests and resetting a user's password requests).

Required qualifications to be successful in this role

experience/practical ability with Microsoft Excel, Access, Visio, and SharePointcritical thinkergood with taking broad or abstract ideas and creating concrete results, recommendations, or analysesgood customer service skills (dealing with hundreds or ICE field locations)good with being adaptable to a rapidly changing environment (special projects with short suspenses)
Must have a BA/BS degreeMust be able to work from 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., Monday through Friday.Must be able to obtain an ICE Suitability Clearance before entering on duty to perform work at ICE locations.Must be able to communicate effectively orally and in writing using the English language and ability to read, interpret, and apply Federal policy, directives, and regulations.

Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this change-supporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.


At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI at www.cgi.com .

No unsolicited agency referrals please.",463,Washington
48,New Job Openings (DOL),eKuber,"Tysons Corner, VA 22182",None,"Job Code PM1.
Program Manager (PM)

The Program Manager has overall responsibility for coordinating all contractor activities performed and the contractor personnel assigned under this requirement while maintaining project budgets, schedules, quality standards and ensuring risk mitigation. The PM will also coordinate the activities of other contract development teams throughout DFEC, DEEOIC, and DLHWC into the master project schedule/work breakdown structure.

Qualifications: Must have managed a contract of similar size (IT service contract with over $5,000,000 value) and scope (case management and compensation system) at a CMMI level 2 or higher. Must also have working experience with Six Sigma or similar management discipline.

The Program Manager will report to each of the Program IT Branch Chief for technical direction. Requires competence in field of expertise such as Information Technology (IT), Enterprise Architecture (strategic, performance, business, data and technology domains as well as transition planning), Systems Development Life Cycle Management (SDLCM), and business process reengineering with adequate knowledge of Capital planning, IT portfolio management, and Earned Value Management (EVM). At least 15 years’ experience managing very complex and/or high risk programs or series of programs and providing internal/external IT support services to management and technical staff.

At least 10 years’ experience working with IT tools and developing web applications and user interfaces with Java technologies, especially, Servlets, JSP, JavaScript, or other development tools such as Business Intelligence Reporting Tools, etc.

At least ten years’ development experience with databases and related technologies, - especially EA frameworks SQL, JDBC – DB2 and experience developing with web presentation technologies, including Flash/FLEX, HTML, JavaScript and multi-browser compatibility. Leader in the field of enterprise architecture and has the ability to relate the IT development lifecycle, business process engineering, business architectures and related concepts to solutions for a client with a broad range of strategic needs. Thorough knowledge of the IT investment management process including SDLCM, cost benefit analysis, risk analysis, alternative analysis and portfolio management.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code DFEC 1.
Solution Architect

The Solution Architect is responsible for transforming the requirements created by the Business Analysts into a documented architecture and design that can be used by the rest of the team to create the solution. Key responsibilities are evaluating business needs and developing appropriate technology solutions to include refining business requirements, architecting new applications, and evaluating and enhancing existing applications.

Qualifications: The Solution Architect must have more than 10 years of IT Development Experience. Must have 5 years’ experience with Java/J2EE/EJB (Server Side/Middle tier) development; 3 years’ experience as a solution Architect for a large, complex software development project; 7 years’ experience with SDLC, OODesign/Development, n-tier architecture and Web Architecture; 4 years’ experience with UNIX, database design and development. Fully experienced in SDLC concepts, systems and procedures. Claims processing system experience desired. Incumbent reports to the Program Manager.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code DFEC 2.
Technical Project Manager

The Technical Project Manager is responsible for coordinating all IT project activities performed and contractor personnel assigned under this order to ensure smooth daily operations of the system, maintaining schedules, quality of standards, and ensuring risk mitigation. The Technical Project Manager will lead the development team for Tier II/III technical support, requirements management, system architecture and design, development, seamless integration with iFECS, testing, and quality assurance. The Technical Project Manager is also responsible for coordinating efforts with other stakeholders, including various OCIO teams and security team, to properly address external dependencies and ensure maximum system uptime and security compliance.

Qualifications: The Technical PM should have seven to ten years of applicable application development and maintenance experience, including five years of specialized experience in supervising projects of similar size and complexity. The Technical PM should have thorough knowledge of Agile development and user experience, programming and integration concepts, design, procedures and practices; ability to handle sensitive information, work with minimum management oversight, and the ability to work with all levels of internal and external contacts.

Experience with tier architecture, data center hosting, relational database such as SQL Server, J2EE, CITRIX, Java, MS Project and Visio are required. Experience with Agile Scrum Software development methodology is a plus.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code DEEOIC 1.
Project Manager (PM)

The PM has overall responsibility of coordinating all DEEOIC IT project activities performed and contractor personnel assigned to DEEOIC under this order while maintaining schedules, quality of standards and ensuring risk mitigation. The PM will support senior technical management with regards to DEEOIC initiatives through strategic planning, and the development of an integrated project plan that communicates task, milestone dates, status, and resource allocation. PM will lead a team of technical people who have responsibility for requirements management, system architecture and design, application development, testing, and quality assurance.

The PM will coordinate schedules, and assign duties to subordinates and Subcontractors, and ensure that assignments are completed as directed. The PM will collaborate, as necessary, with the contracting government PM, government senior leadership, and contracting PM to ensure that all activities conform to the terms and conditions of the order. The PM will work with the contracting program manager to reduce costs and maximize efficiency in achieving state requirements.

Qualifications: PMs should have seven to fifteen years of applicable experience, including five years of specialized experience in supervising projects of similar size and complexity. A master’s degree with 5 years of applicable experience may be substituted. PMs should have thorough knowledge of programming concepts, design, procedures and practices; ability to handle sensitive information, work with minimum management oversight, and the ability to work with all levels of internal and external contacts. Experience with relational database, SQL, MS Access, Excel, CITRIX, Java, MS Project and Visio are required. Experience with Agile Scrum Software development methodology is a plus.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job code DEEOIC 2.
Development Lead

The Development Leads are responsible for providing details to the overall architecture created by the solutions architect (SA), choosing methodologies and techniques that will be used by the developers to solve specific problems, and providing the first line of support for the developers who need to understanding a concept. The incumbent coordinates with the release manager and reports to the contracting project manager.

Qualifications: Must have more than 10 years of IT Development experience. Must have high level JavaScript, HTML and CSS knowledge. Must have knowledge of JavaScript frameworks, design patterns (MVC), interfacing with front end JavaScript with web services. Must have 3 years’ experience with SDLC, OO Design/Development, C/S Architecture and Web Architecture, Must have 1 years’ experience with DB2 database design and development. Claims processing system experience desired.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code DEEOIC 3.
Middle Tier (MT) Development Lead

The MT Development Lead participates in all phases of the software development lifecycle for new development and upgrades. Leads and mentors other middle tier team members and perform code reviews. Works with the government/contracting project manager, other DOL staff and contractor support to troubleshoot and resolve application server/database server configuration and other issues.

Must have more than 10 years of IT development experience. Must have experience with Java/J2EE/EJB (ServerSide/Middle tier) development; 3 years’ experience as a lead developer for a large, complex software development project; 7 years’ experience with SDLC, OO Design/Development, N-tier architecture and web architecture; 2 years’ experience with UNIX, database design and development.

Claims processing system experience desired. Agile Scrum development methodology, a plus. The incumbent reports to the government/contracting project manager.

Qualifications: Must have more than 7 years of IT Development experience. Must have 5 years’ experience with Java/J2EE/EJB (Server Side/Middle tier) Development; 3 years’ experience with SDLC, OO Design/Development, C/S Architecture and Web Architecture; 1 years’ experience with DB2 database design and development. Claims processing system experience desired.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code DLHWC 1.
Development Lead

The Development Lead participates in all phases of DLHWC’s software development life cycle for new development and system upgrades. The Lead is responsible for maintaining and enhancing the code in the DLHWC applications. The Lead also troubleshoots and provides technical solutions to application issues encountered by DLHWC applications.

Qualifications: The DLHWC Development Lead should be a highly skilled and experienced developer who is either familiar with the existing code or will be able to master the code quickly.

Strong knowledge/experience with Object oriented concepts and Delphi 7, significant Knowledge/experience with DB2 back end tools. Claims processing system experiences a plus. Position reports to the DLHWC IT coordinator.

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code 1
Project Management Office (PMO) Coordinator

The PMO Coordinator will assist in the preparation of project management reports related to the various Task Orders. Key responsibilities will include preparation of software documentation formats/templates, analytical reports, as well as technical training materials. Manages and coordinates documentation of all aspects of the system development life cycle for projects.

Establishes documentation guidelines and practices. Writes and edits technical material as needed. Prepares manuals, user guides, and other technical documentation for presentation.

Possesses excellent writing skills and uses a variety of tools and techniques to organize and present information. Understands Automatic Data Processing (ADP) operations and Communicates effectively orally and in writing. Applies the principals and techniques to develop and deliver training materials and programs. Training materials include user guides, reference guides, and system documentation for system applications. The PMO coordinator should also be fluent with WEBEX and Project coordination. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code 2
Web Content Specialist (WCS)

The Web Content Specialist is responsible for the development and implementation of content on OWCP websites as well as creating and/or acquiring content for SharePoint and other online communications.

The WCS may also be involved with integrating the work of writers and designers to produce a final ECM layout compatible with DOL and OWCP standards. Responsible for designing, configuring and maintaining Folio Views system. Must be able to design, configure and maintain existing and yet to be developed websites for DOL OWCP programs both internally and externally. Ensures that all OWCP websites are available to the desired audience with appropriate links, security, and updates. Must be able to create web page layouts, graphics, color schemes and infrastructure to maintain a cohesive website base. This may include changing existing websites or creating from scratch new ones. Must apply the principals and techniques of the instructional Computer Based Training (CBT) to develop and deliver training materials and programs. Training materials include user guides, CBT training modules, reference guides, and system documentation for OWCP applications.

The WCS must have knowledge of HTML, HTML5, XHTML, JavaScript, and LiveCycle Programming language. This is an important requirement where at the least WCS has great knowledge of Java, HTML/HTML5. WCS must be proficient using Dreamweaver, Acrobat and LiveCycle Designer with at least 2 year of experience within each. Must demonstrate experience with Trivantis Lectora software in a production LMS. At least 5 years of overall IT experience is necessary. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 1
Configuration Manager

The Configuration Manager is responsible for creating complex Windows MSI packages using Install Shield Developer 8.0 for both Windows Desktop and Citrix Desktop as well as write DOS batch files, SQL scripts, Excel macros, and Delphi Executables to automate day-to-day duties.

Configuration Manager will Interface with DITMS on deployment releases, Change Controls, VPN setup, CITRIX issues, and external agency communications. The Configuration Manager will have expert knowledge of Use Rational tools to include: ClearQuest. Familiarity with ReqPro, Test Manager, and Atlassian suite of tools, (such as JIRA and Confluence). Working knowledge of Configuration Management (CM) tools: StarTeam, CVS. Familiarity with processes to convert CM repository to new vendor tools (IE Rational ClearCase/Team Concert).Develop custom built software and scripts to perform client-side Delphi-builds. Work closely with various teams and Federal CORs to schedule and implement frequent releases. Adhoc iFECS-related PC support for external/internal users and developers with client-side tools JIntegra for COM, Print-2-Image, WebSphere 8.X, detailed knowledge with the following developers’ tools: Delphi, IBM DB2 Client, WebSphere RAD, Business Objects, Interactive Intelligence IVR Client, Connect Direct, EDI. Experience setting up PCs for various test beds. Assist Production staff in monitoring daily batch processes. Assist Government/contract staff in troubleshooting back-end processes. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 2
Delphi Developer

The Delphi Developer is responsible for maintaining and enhancing the Delphi code in the DFEC iFECS application and the Web applications, troubleshooting and providing technical solutions to Delphi application issues encountered by new and existing DFEC applications. The Delphi Developers must have at least 8 years of Delphi experience, strong knowledge/experience with Object oriented concepts and Delphi 6/7. Significant knowledge/experience with DB2 back end tools. (.5 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 3
Software Developer

The Software Developer participates in all phases of software development life cycle for new development and upgrades. Works with the various OCIO teams and DOL staff to troubleshoot and resolve application server and database configuration and other issues. The software developers are responsible for maintaining and enhancing the Middle Tier code in the DFEC’ iFECS application and the Web applications, troubleshooting and providing technical solutions to Middle Tier application issues encountered by new and existing DFEC applications. Must have more than 7 years of IT Development experience. Must have 5 years’ experience with Java/J2EE/EJB (Server Side/Middle tier) Development; 3 years’ experience with SDLC, OO design/Development, C/S Architecture and Web Architecture; 1 years’ experience with DB2 database design and development. Claims processing system experience desired. (2 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 4
Production Management Specialist

The Production Management Specialist is responsible for maintaining production system, troubleshooting issues, monitor system performance, liaison between OCIO and DFEC for production operations, application quality control and testing. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 5
Business Analyst

The Business Analyst is responsible for capturing, consolidating, and documenting requirements information from the Subject Matter Experts (SMEs). The analysts are responsible for capturing requirements and completing formal business analysis and design, managing analysis and design artifacts throughout the project life cycle and ensuring the quality assurance of the delivered product to requirement specifications. Responsibilities include: Investigates and analyzes problems and business requirements, including impact analysis of change on all systems and business areas in order to recommend appropriate solutions; Determines scope and prepares detailed requirements documents for tasks and projects to ensure scope and business

Requirements are understood and acceptable to all impacted areas; Works with various teams to design solutions to meet business requirements. Conduct system testing, and quality control of the system to ensure the system is designed according to the requirements. Tests delivered systems solutions. Provides assistance to internal and external customers in the effective and efficient resolution of issues. (2 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 6
QA/Tester

The Tester shall design, build and test critical and complex custom designed, multi-tier business applications that use a wide range of technologies. Ensure satisfactory problem resolution and user satisfaction. Responsible for creating automated testing scripts, test plans, and testing procedures to conduct testing throughout the entire software development lifecycle. Responsible for testing and quality control in the DFEC’ iFECS application. Troubleshoot and provide technical solutions to a variety of application issues encountered by new and existing DFEC applications. Must have at least 3 years of testing experience, strong knowledge/experience with Object oriented concepts. Knowledge/experience with DB2 back end tools. (2 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 7
Data/Database Administrator (DBA)

The Application DBA is responsible for supporting a large complex data model and application team. The main responsibilities include Database design, data modeling, and data architect in OLTP and possible data warehousing environment. Work on and participate in project development throughout the entire SDLC lifecycle, participate in the development of database standards and best practices, perform database design using data modeling tools (Erwin). Participate in database design review sessions. Troubleshoot and provide technical solutions to database issues encountered by new and existing applications in the environment. Actively monitor the database environment to increase efficiency, improve reliability, and minimize operating expenses. Must have at least 5 years of experience in logical/physical modeling and 3 years of technical experience in the DB2 8.2 in IBM/AIX environment. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 8
Reports Developer

The Reports Developer: Responsible for Reports Universe design, development, deployment, and maintenance. Maintaining, developing, and testing canned or Ad-hoc reports. Understanding of relational database environments. Experience with the full-client tools. Proven technical and analytical skills. Utilize report tools to maintain, design, develop, test, implement and document delivery solutions. Interface with business customers, business analysts, data analysts, and various teams to complete requirement gather, design, testing, and deployment of reports. Must have at least 5 years of experience. (3 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 9
Senior Database Analyst

The Senior Database Analyst shall coordinate the implementation of all IT system operations and maintenance and enhancements in support of the DOL, OWCP, and DFEC mission of administering the Federal Employees’ Compensation Act (FECA). Using current experience and understanding of the system, particularly with respect to the database schema and data processing produce ad hoc statistical reports and data extracts for DFEC management and outside agencies. The Senior Database Analyst shall have 10 plus years database analysis experience in claim processing system and 10 plus years of overall technical expertise supporting government programs (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 10
Middle Tier Developer

The Middle Tier (MT) Developers participate in all phases of software development life cycle for new development and upgrades. Works with the OCIO operation team and DOL staff to troubleshoot and resolve application server and database configuration and other issues. The MT developers are responsible for maintaining and enhancing the Middle Tier code in the DFEC’ iFECS application and the Web applications, troubleshooting and providing technical solutions to Middle Tier application issues encountered by new and existing DFEC applications. Must have more than 7 years of IT Development experience. Must have 5 years’ experience with Java/J2EE/EJB (Server Side/Middle tier) Development; 3 years’ experience with SDLC, OO Design/Development, C/S Architecture and Web Architecture; 1 years’ experience with DB2 database design and development. Claims processing system experience desired. (.5 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DFEC 11
Information Systems Technician (IST)

The Information Systems Technician (IST) is responsible for operating/maintaining DFEC information systems. The IST duties will include adding/modifying user accounts within the AQS/CQS system. The IST will also be responsible for creating Computer Based Training (CBT) as necessary. The IST will also conduct Asset Management which includes the systematic process of operating, maintaining, and upgrading assets cost-effectively while conducting ongoing assessments of short and long-term hardware and software program needs as necessary.

The IST will also aid in the procurement of electronics, hardware and software and will investigate, troubleshoot, and resolve DFEC end-user problems. Must have experience with web design. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 1
Database Administrator (DBA)

The DBA has overall responsibility of the design and implementation of the back end server solution for DEEOIC. The DBA will provide database support during development and maintenance in all of the DEEOIC different environments (development, integration, testing, and production). The DBA will proactively generate relevant ideas for new and improved use of technology, and must understand the impacts of new projects and technical impacts to the supported system. The DBA should be able to assist in the development of a project plan to migrate the database to another platform, if necessary. The DBA will be proficient at database design and modeling, and work with the government IT data lead and support contractors to create a comprehensive database design documentation and schemes. The DBA must be able to work with other development teams to help design, implement new database changes or designs.

The DBA will contribute, write, and maintain DB scripts for system DB maintenance. The DBA should have a minimum of seven years of experience in database design and administration with proficient knowledge in DB2, and other relational databases. The DBA must have the ability to work as part of a team as well as independently towards assigned goals.

The DBA should demonstrate the ability to translate customer requirements into solutions. The DBA should have strong knowledge of SQL, ERWin Diagrams, MS Access, and MS Visio. Experience with an Agile Scrum development methodology is a plus. (2 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 2
Release Manager (RM)

The Release Manager’s responsibilities include working closely with the government/contracting PMs to ensure that the projects are completed on-time. The RM works with the business owners on planning and preparing for the new projects, examining, evaluating, and assessing the impact of potential changes in the technology, evaluating ways to improve the skill set of the development teams. The RM is responsible for the oversight of all release activities to include recommending and negotiating content, planning, schedule, and life cycle phases. The RM tracks and maintains status of the release progress through the life cycle, manages data to day issues with releases as they elevate from the various stakeholders, works with the stakeholders to get estimates for planning, forecasting resource requirements, and works with the government PM to develop a release plan.

The release manager provides plan and status to customer, describing approaches to complete the release, publish the release schedule, and any updates to the schedule to the team, elevates issues as necessary for the customer to address, and report/risk mitigation to the government/contracting PM. Release Manager should have a minimum of seven years of experience in release planning involving complete SDLC. The incumbent must have experience in implementing SDLC, and other related procedures, and policies (version control, bug tracking, product support, and project management). The incumbent must have release management experience within a structured software development environment with knowledge of software builds tools, test methodologies, techniques and processes. Experience in Agile Scrum is a plus. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 3
Configuration Manager (CM)

The Configuration Manager is responsible for the development and execution of the configuration management plan for both the ECS Application and reporting. The configuration management will include all software code deliveries and project management documentation.

The Configuration Manager will have expert knowledge of Use Rational tools to include: ClearQuest. Familiarity with ReqPro, Test Manager, and Atlassian suite of tools, (such as JIRA and Confluence). Working knowledge of Configuration Management (CM) tools: StarTeam, CVS. Familiarity with processes to convert CM repository to new vendor tools (IE Rational ClearCase/Team Concert).Develop custom built software and scripts to perform client-side Delphi-builds. Work closely with Program Manager, Project Coordinator, Software Development Manager, Test Manager and Federal CORs to schedule and implement frequent releases. Ad-hoc iFECS-related PC support for external/internal users and developers with client side tools J-Integra for COM, Print-2-Image, and WebSphere 8.X, detailed knowledge with the following developers’ tools: Delphi 6, IBM DB2 Client, WebSphere RAD, Business Objects, Interactive Intelligence IVR Client, Connect Direct, and EDI. Experience setting up PCs for various test beds. Assist Production staff in monitoring daily batch processes. Assist Government/contract staff in troubleshooting back-end processes. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 4
Senior Developer

The Application Senior Developers designs, develops, and implements web-based Java applications to support business requirements. Follows approved life cycle methodologies, creates design documents, and performs program coding and testing. Resolves technical issues through debugging, research, and investigation. The Reporting Senior Developers must have high level knowledge of updating, repairing, modifying and expanding on existing SQL server/DB2 scripts. Knowledge of database architecture and design and work experience with SQL programming with at least one of DB2, Oracle, or SQL Server. Must possess a solid foundation in PL/SQL Programming Language and experience. Ability to code SQL/DB2 scripts according to published standards and design guidelines.

The Web senior developer must have knowledge of HTML, HTML5, XHTML, JavaScript, and LiveCycle programming language. Sr. Developers require at least 5 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Has knowledge of standard concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Performs a variety of tasks. May lead and direct the work of others. A wide degree of creativity and latitude required (15 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 5
Document Specialist/Technical Writer

The Document Specialist/Technical Writer will provide support and assistance to the government PM, and contracting project managers to help ensure that project documentation is completed on time and that the appropriate project approvals are obtained on schedule. Key responsibilities will include preparation of software documentation formats/templates, analytical reports, as well as technical training material. As directed by the government and contracting project managers. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 6
Developer

The Developers are responsible for developing and enhancing code in DEEOIC applications. Developers will be responsible for maintaining the middle Tier code and/or enhancing the code supporting the user interface. They will troubleshoot and providing technical solutions to application issues encountered by new and existing DEEOIC applications. They will design web pages layout, graphics, color schemes and infrastructure to maintain a cohesive look to the ECS applications and reports. Must have at least 5 years of Java experience, strong knowledge/experience with Object oriented concepts. Significant knowledge/experience with industry standard DB backend tools. The incumbent reports to the government/contracting project manager. (3 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code – DEEOIC 7
Tester

The Testers are responsible for functional and unit level testing of the software code in the ECS application and reports. They shall also troubleshoot and provide technical solutions to application issues encountered by new and existing ECS codes, reports, and/or DEEOIC applications. They must have at least 3 years testing experience, strong knowledge/experience with object oriented concepts. Knowledge/experience with industry standard DB backend, java/J2EEE/EJB. Knowledge and experience in automated testing tools is a plus. Testers will report to the Release Manager. (3 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 8
Business Analyst

The Business Analysts are responsible for capturing, consolidating, and documenting requirements information from the SMEs. The incumbent is responsible for capturing requirements (user stories) and completing formal business analysis and design, managing analysis and design artifacts throughout the project life cycle and ensuring the quality assurance of the delivered product to requirement specifications. Responsibilities include: Investigates and analyzes problems and business requirements, including impact analysis of change on all systems and business areas in order to recommend appropriate solutions; Determines scope and prepares detailed requirements documents for tasks and projects to ensure scope and business requirements are understood and acceptable to all impacted areas; Works with development teams to design solutions to meet business requirements. Tests delivered systems solutions.

Provides assistance to internal and external customers in the effective and efficient resolution of issues. The incumbents also perform integration testing, and assist with user assessment testing. (4 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code - DEEOIC 9
Information Systems Technician (IST)

The (IST) is responsible for operating/maintaining DEEOIC information systems. The IST duties will include adding/modifying user accounts within the AQS/CQS system. IST will also be responsible for creating Computer Based Training (CBT) as necessary. IST will also conduct Asset Management which includes the systematic process of operating, maintaining, and upgrading assets cost-effectively while conducting ongoing assessments of short and long-term hardware and software program needs as necessary. IST will also operate, configure, and initiate procurement of electronics, hardware and software. IST shall also investigate, troubleshoot, and resolve end-user problems. The IST should have at least 5 years of experience within the IT sector and at least 2 Microsoft Certifications (MCP, MCDST, and MCITP) preferred. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Unit)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code -BTS 1
Senior Developer

The Senior Developer designs, develops, and implements web-based Java applications to support business requirements. Follows approved life cycle methodologies, creates design documents, and performs program coding and testing. Resolves technical issues through debugging, research, and investigation. Requires at least 5 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Has knowledge of standard concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Performs a variety of tasks. May lead and direct the work of others. A wide degree of creativity and latitude required (6 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code -BTS 2
System Administrator

The System Administrator is responsible for the installation, configuration and maintenance of the organization's server’s operating systems and all related systems or software. Analyzes and resolves problems associated with server hardware/software and applications software and ensures scalability and appropriate integration with other systems. Detects, diagnoses, and reports problems on the servers. Responsible for backup or recovery procedures. Familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Performs a variety of tasks (2 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code –BTS 3
Database Administrator

Develops, implements, administers, and maintains policies and procedures for ensuring the security and integrity of the company database. Implements data models, database designs, data access and table maintenance codes. Resolves database performance and capacity issues, and replication and other distributed data issues. Requires 2+ years of experience working with DB2 and/or SQL Server databases. Has knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, and procedures within a particular field. Relies on instructions and pre-established guidelines to perform the functions of the job. Works under immediate supervision. Primary job functions do not typically require exercising independent judgment. (1 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com


Job Code -BTS 4
Business Analyst

The Business Analyst interprets results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to complex data mining independently. Designs, develops, implements and maintains business solutions. Works with main clients and project and business leaders to identify analytical requirements. Provides tutorship to junior analysts.

Requires at least 4 years of experience in the field or in a related area. Familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Performs a variety of tasks. May lead and direct the work of others. A wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected (3 Full Time Contractor Support Units)

Please email us your resume along with the Job code to: career@ekuber.com",463,Washington
49,Turkmen Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Turkmen Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
50,Sinhala Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Sinhala Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
51,Ewe Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Ewe Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
52,Chechen Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Chechen Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
53,Bosnian Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Bosnian Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
54,Partnership Associate III,FHI 360,"Washington, DC 20009 (Adams Morgan area)",None,"Job Summary:

To support FHI Partners management team across all core functional areas: Business Development, Program Management, Business Operations & Finance and Contracting. To help manage a growing portfolio of a new organization by serving as support to and backstop for key functional areas. This role will report to the directly to Associate Director of Business Development but will also work very closely with the leads for Business Operations & Finance, Contracting and on special projects as designated by the Managing Director.
Overall responsibilities will range from:

Business Development support - Provide assistance in managing FHI Partners opportunity development process to ensure internal client satisfaction, support framing of key approaches, ensure high quality client delivery, manage BD portfolio metrics for continual performance improvement

Portfolio and Project Management support - Assist in managing project portfolio metrics and reporting, tracking project performance, troubleshooting implementation issues, and ensure client communication/satisfaction

Business Operations & Finance support - Work in partnership with the Operations Business Manager to provide financial administration support from pre-award to close-out.

Contracts & Grants Management support – Work in partnership with the Contracts Manager to provide contract administration support from pre-award to close-out, assisting in the efficient operation and maintenance of a contracts portfolio management system.

Accountabilities:


Business Development
Manage New Opportunities Process – Assist in FHI Partners Opportunity Assessment process (identifying viable opportunities), with eventual goal of being POC for opportunities < $250k
Manage Development Accounts – Once opportunities are approved, manage development accounts process (approval, intercompany work order to issue code, communicating to team)
Systematize BD Process – Support efforts to improve process and communications with key internal stakeholders. Compile standard operating procedures into an operational “Play Book”
Support BD Analysis & Dashboards – Support the development and management of dashboards tools to track performance metrics and analyze BD results (Salesforce, Costpoint, Power BI)

Portfolio and Project Management
Manage Portfolio Dashboard – Manage portfolio dashboard (currently in development) to ensure it reflects up to date data and project information
Track Project Performance – Support team in tracking project performance. Manage calendar of key dates (team check-ins, major deliverables, project close, client check-ins, etc.)
Support Troubleshooting Implementation Issues – Support team in addressing any constraints, challenges that project teams are facing
Ensure Client Communication/Satisfaction – Support development of client satisfaction tracking tool and execution of systematic client check ins

Business Operations & Finance
Manage New Project Codes - Open new project numbers using Excel template and automated IWO process. Maintain updated project number list and related organizational file structure
Manage Portfolio Tracker - Update portfolio tracker for new awards
Payment processing and review - Process payment transactions for business development activities and small projects; Review payment transaction for accuracy and adherence to policy
Monthly reporting and review - Run monthly cost sheets for projects, business development and management accounts
Operational institutionalization – Assist with documenting standard operating procedures into an operational “Play Book”

Contracts & Grants Management
Assist in the review of prime award documents prior to signature.
Prepare subcontract and consultant agreements packages for business development activities and small projects, assuring completeness and accuracy of packages.
Close out subcontracts and consultant agreements upon expiration.
Data set-up in contract management/financial management system.
Work in partnership with Finance to maintain the accuracy and integrity of the Partners filing system.
Prepare and submit routine business transactions such as requests for donor approval.
Prepare periodic management reports.

General
Provide support to the Managing Director for special projects and administrative matters
Performs other duties as assigned.

Applied Knowledge & Skills:
Comprehensive knowledge of concepts, practices, and procedures with establishing new

strategic relationships.
Strong knowledge of organization’s technical capacity and programs to share information

and create new partnerships/relationships in one or more key areas: health, education,

governance, civil society, social change, gender, economic growth, research and the

environment.
Strong knowledge of fundamental accounting, finance and core business principles
Demonstrates and applies sound judgment with managing internal and external

stakeholders.
Ability to influence, motivate and works well with others.
Ability to understand and negotiate procurement agreements.
Ability to draft basic contracting terms.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills.
Must be able to read, write, and speak fluent English.

Problem Solving & Impact:
Works on problems that are varied and complex that require novel and creative approaches to solve.
Addresses, oversees and resolves issues from external constituents and revives old or fading partnerships.
Contributes to decisions on the overall strategy and direction of the entire organization.
Contributes to business and operational decisions that affect the department and/or area.

Supervision Given/Received:
Reports to Associate Director, Business Development, but will also work very closely with the leads for Business Operations & Finance, Contracting and on special projects as designated by the Managing Director.

Education:**
Bachelor's Degree or International Equivalent in Business Administration, International

Development, Public Policy or Related Field. Master’s Degree preferred.

Experience:**
Typically requires a minimum 8+ years of professional work experience with private sector businesses, relationship management, business development, accounting or finance. 6+ years required with a master’s degree.
Demonstrated experience with multilateral organizations, or major corporations and foundations.
Experience with economic growth efforts or advancing social equity in the United States preferred
Prior experience working overseas preferred.

Typical Physical Demands:
Typical office environment.
Ability to spend long hours looking at computer screen and doing repetitive work on a

keyboard.
Ability to sit and stand for extended periods of time.
Ability to lift 5 - 50 lbs.

Technology to be Used:
Personal Computer, Microsoft Office 365 (i.e. Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Skype/TEAMS, email), office telephone, cell phone and printer/copier.

Travel Requirements:
10 - 25%
This job posting summarizes the main duties of the job. It neither prescribes nor restricts the exact tasks that may be assigned to carry out these duties. This document should not be construed in any way to represent a contract of employment. Management reserves the right to review and revise this document at any time.
FHI 360 is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer whereby we do not engage in practices that discriminate against any person employed or seeking employment based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national or ethnic origin, age, marital status, physical or mental disability, protected Veteran status, or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",463,Washington
55,Hungarian Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Hungarian Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
56,Program Manager/Task Lead,CALNET INC.,"Reston, VA 20191 (Hattontown area)",None,"Founded in 1989, CALNET, Inc. is a privately held company in the Technology, Intelligence Analysis, and Language Services consulting arena. Headquartered in Reston, VA and with a branch office in San Diego, CALNET employees deliver true value to our customers by employing best practices, world class technologies industry expertise in every project. CALNET is an ISO 9001, ISO 20000, ISO 27001, and CMMI-Level III certified.
We are currently searching for a talented, “PROGRAM MANAGER-TASK LEAD” to support the Naval Criminal Investigative Service (NCIS) from our Reston, VA Headquarters. This individual will be spending some time travelling to NCIS HQ in Quantico, VA on a weekly basis. NCIS is the Department of the Navy (DoN) component with primary responsibility for criminal investigation, law enforcement (LE), counter-terrorism (CT), counterintelligence (CI), and physical and personnel security matters. NCIS has the primary investigative and CI jurisdiction within the DoN, and exclusive investigative jurisdiction in non-combat matters involving actual, potential, or suspected criminal, terrorism, sabotage, espionage, and subversive activities. NCIS requires technical support services through their Information Technology Common Services Unit (ITCSU), which executes its shared mission through the auspices of NCIS’ executive sponsorship. The functional support to the ITCSU spans multiple areas, including project management, software maintenance, data management, program management assistance, daily operations, and customer service. This candidate will be the Overall manager for the contractor effort who will serve as the Contractor's authorized point of contact with the Contracting Officer Representative, and is responsible for managing scope, budget, schedule and performance. Provides direction, prioritization, coordination, and conflict resolution while managing project teams that accomplish project objectives. Senior-level project manager with a demonstrated ability to lead and manage a multi-disciplinary team of technical and technical support staff for Government customers in the information technology domain. Excellent written and spoken communication skills are required, as well as the ability to work with all levels of management.
Qualifications:
 Must have a current Active SECRET security clearance and eligible for a TS/SCI.
 Minimum of ten (10) years of intensive and progressive experience working in IT or engineering industries.
 Demonstrated ability of managing at least 12 or more IT professionals in similar program requirements.
 Greater than one year managing complex organizations of which he/she had total responsibility for the financial success of the organizational unit.
 Demonstrated project and risk management skills including ability to manage multiple priorities, resources, customers, and managers with a focus on consistency and accuracy.
 Skilled in the use of MS Project.
 Requires a Project Management Professional (PMP) certification.
Location: Reston, VA (with some travel to Quantico, VA).
To be considered for this opportunity, please send a word copy of your resume to helena@calnet.com.
Applicant must be a U.S Citizen and have a Current Active SECRET Security Clearance.
CALNET, Inc. offers a competitive salary and a generous benefits package. This package includes medical, dental, vision, life, short and long term disability insurances, a 401(k)-retirement savings plan, and generous leave time.
CALNET, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. EEO/M/F/D/V",463,Washington
57,Quality Assurance Analyst III,"Customer Value Partners, Inc","Bethesda, MD",None,"Overview:

CVP is seeking a Senior Quality Assurance Analyst in support of our federal healthcare client who is an essential service provider to the “research enterprise” of the world’s foremost and largest cancer research entity. This is a mature organization that effectively and efficiently serves scientific computing and informatics support needs of NIH. Our team will consist of SME’s with deep expertise in health and biomedical IT and informatics services, as well as clinical and biomedical research experience.

Responsibilities:

Provides technical expertise and administrative guidance for personnel performing software quality assurance and compliance tasks, including reviewing work products for correctness, adherence to the QA methodology and processes and to user standards, program documentation to ensure adherence to Government standards/requirements, and for progress in accordance with schedules.
Manage the coordination with other the Project Manager and/or Quality Assurance Manager to ensure problem resolution and user satisfaction.
Lead efforts for the evaluation and testing of software and associated documentation.
Conduct software and applications testing, validates data, and documents and reports test results.
Lead and review recommended changes, corrections, retesting, and, when appropriate, promotion of developed products to operational status.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering or related field.
6+ years of specialized experience, to include all aspects of quality assurance and compliance of software applications, information models and data processing.
Expert Knowledge of automated testing tools and defect tracking application.
Must possess extensive knowledge and understanding of the software development life cycle and demonstrated ability to work well with business analysts, developers and end-users in a cross functional team.
Must meet all requirements for obtaining and maintaining a Public Trust Clearance.
Desired Skills
Possess knowledge, expertise, and experience in supporting biomedical and/or research information technology and informatics.
Knowledge and experience with NIH processes, procedures, technologies, and applications are a strength.
Possess leadership/managerial experience at the National Institute of Health.
About CVP
Customer Value Partners (CVP) is an award-winning business and next-gen technology consulting company that helps organizations navigate disruption and prepare for a culture of Continuous Change. We solve critical problems for healthcare, national security, and public sector clients through innovative strategies and solutions which leverage technologies and industry expertise in areas including Technology Modernization, Health, Data Science & Engineering, Business Transformation, and Cybersecurity. CVP delivers unparalleled excellence to clients and employees through our strong culture of integrity, engagement, respect, and a passion for our clients’ missions.
Customer Value Partners, Inc. is a VEVRAA Federal Contractor and an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability. Customer Value Partners seeks to provide employment opportunities for protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.",463,Washington
58,Phlebotomist III,Quest Diagnostics,"Fairfax, VA",None,"Go the extra mile. Patients and Physicians rely on our diagnostic testing, information and services to help them make better healthcare decisions. These are often serious decisions with far reaching consequences, and require sensitivity, tact and a clear dedication to service. It’s about providing clarity and hope.
In Patient Services you will work for the world leader in the industry, with a career where you can expand your skills and knowledge. You’ll have a role where you can act with professionalism, you can inspire colleagues, and you can care about the work we do and the people we serve.
At Quest, Patient Service roles are tremendously important – it is a patient-focused role where it is essential to remember that there is a life and person behind every test tube. Your skills are critical, as is your ability to work with the patients. The role is varied and offers a developing career in Phlebotomy due to the scale and reach of Quest. You can grow and improve your skills in a fast-moving, supportive team environment. Most importantly, you can help us make a real difference.
Phlebotomist III - Float- Fairfax, VA req67553
Rep PS III (Phleb) - Float- Fairfax, Virginia - Monday to Friday 8:00AM - 5:00PM (Weekly Rotations 6:00AM - 2:00PM)
Job Summary
The Patient Service Representative III - Float (PSR III - Float) represents the face of our company to patients who come to Quest Diagnostics, both as part of their health routine or for insights into life-defining health decisions. The PSR III - Float draws quality blood samples from patients and prepares those specimens for lab testing while following established practices and procedures. The PSR III - Float has direct contact with patients and creates an atmosphere of trust and confidence while explaining procedures to patients and drawing blood specimens in a skillful, safe and accurate manner. The PSR III - Float is responsible in providing coverage at multiple locations for multiple roles. The PSR III - Float must ensure that daily activities of the Patient Service Center/Mobile/Long Term Care/In-Office Phlebotomy are completed accurately and on time. The PSR III - Float demonstrates Quest Leadership Behaviors while focusing on process excellence skills and sensitivity to confidentiality and accuracy to patient information. Successful applicants may be assigned to work and direct daily activity in a doctor's office, a patient service center, in a house call environment, long term care or as business needs dictate. Must be able to step in for a PSR II and lead one or more PSR on site. Will be required to act as a coach, mentor, instructor, resource advisor for new employees and provide effective onboarding services to new clients. They will also act as point of contact to staff on site and provide regular input to the group lead or supervisor. The PSR III PSR III - Float may also focus on working with customers who have a high complexity and/or volume practice with a specialized focus requiring outstanding phlebotomy skills. In addition, these practices require a higher level of customer facing skills including; verbal and written communications, problem solving, and collaboration with multiple functions, such as: Sales, Laboratory Testing Services, IT connectivity, Billing, and Logistics due to their specialty and or complex test orders. The PSR III - Float must be capable of handling multiple priorities in a high volume setting.
Job Accountabilities

1. Collect specimens according to established procedures. This includes, but not limited to: drug screens, biometric screening and insurance exams.
2. Administer oral solutions according to established training.
3. Research test/client information and confirm and verify all written and electronic orders by utilizing lab technology systems or directory of services.
4. Responsible for completing all data entry requirements accurately including data entry of patient registration; entry of test order from req or pulling order from database; managing Standing Orders.

5. Enter billing information and collect payments when required, including the safeguarding of assets and credit card information.

6. Data entry and processing specimens including: labeling, centrifuging, splitting, and freezing specimens as required by test order.
7. Perform departmental-related clerical duties when assigned such as data entry, inventory, stock supplies, and answer phones when needed.
8. Read, understand and comply with departmental policies, protocols and procedures: (i.e. Procedure Manuals, Safety Manual, Compliance Manual, Automobile Policies and Procedures, Employee Handbook, Quality Assurance Manual); and ensure that all staff members follow instructions.

9. Perform verification of patient demographic info / initials including patient signature post-venipuncture to verify tubes were labeled in their presence and that the name on the label is correct.
10. Assist with compilation and submission of monthly statistics and data.

11. Maintain all appropriate phlebotomy logs in a timely manner and based on frequency, such as maintenance logs and temperature logs.
12. Complete training courses and keep up-to-date with the latest phlebotomy techniques.
13. Travel to Territory Manager meeting if held off-site or off normal shift.
14. Participate on special projects and teams.
15. Stay up-to-date on company communications and assist with the distribution of technical information to the work group.
16. Perform Point of Care (POC) testing at those sites where needed and the complete training/competency evaluations per Standard Operating Procedure (SOP).
17. With appropriate training, act as mentor and resource for new employees, assisting with transition into the PSC work environment and the familiarity with established procedures.
18. Assist with periodic inventory counts report shortages and problems to group leader or supervisor as they occur.
19. Assist with the preparation of schedules for the assigned work group or PSCs.
20. Communicate professionally with clients to resolve or refer, and document problems, prepare problem documentation and report critical issues as they occur.
21. Ensure staff is following all safety precautions by wearing a clean, button lab coat, gloves and face shield when required.
22. Assist supervisors with the implementation of SOPs and the distribution of technical information and communication to the work group in accordance with Quest Diagnostics guidelines.
23. Ensure facilities are neat, clean and in good repair, take appropriate action to advise Group Leader or Supervisor of required repairs and maintenance.

24. Will be required to act as a coach, mentor, instructor and resource advisor for new employees, as well as be the point of contact to staff on site and provide regular input to the group lead or supervisor.
25. Provide effective onboarding services to new clients.

26. Partner with Supervisor and Group Lead to assist the transition process setting up new offices for both PSCs and IOPs.

27. Must be able to step in for a PSR II and lead one or more PSR on site.
Job Requirements
1. Ability to provide quality, error free work in a fast-paced environment.
2. Ability to work independently with minimal on-site supervision.
3. Excellent phlebotomy skills to include pediatric and geriatric.
4. Flexible and available based on staffing needs, which includes weekends, holidays, on-call and overtime.
5. Committed to all Quest Diagnostics policies and procedures including company dress code, Employee Health & Safety, and Quest Diagnostics Everyday Excellence Guiding Principles.
6. Must be able to make decisions based on established procedures and exercise good judgment.
7. Must have reliable transportation, valid driver license, and clean driving record, if applicable.
8. Travel and flexible hours required to work multiple locations and required to cover at Patient Service Center/Mobile/Long Term Care/In-Office Phlebotomy locations with minimal notice.
9. Capable of handling multiple priorities in a high volume setting.

10. Must demonstrate superior customer focus; ability to communicate openly and transparently with peers, supervisors and patients; ability to accelerate and embrace change throughout Quest; and knowledge of our business.
Physical Requirements

1. Lift light to moderately heavy objects. The normal performance of duties may require lifting and carrying objects. Objects in the weight range of 1 to 15 pounds are lifted and carried frequently; objects in the weight range of 16 to 25 pounds are lifted and carried occasionally and objects in the weight range of 26 to 40 pounds are seldom lifted and carried. Objects exceeding 41 pounds are not to be lifted or carried without assistance.
2. Must be able to sit or stand for long periods of time; requires long hours of eye and hand coordination.
3. Must be able to perform repetitive tasks with dominant hand frequently to constantly throughout the day.
4. Position requires travel.

5. Extensive use of phone and PC.

6. Fine dexterity with hands/steadiness.

7. Talking.

8. Walking.

9. Balancing.

10. Bending/kneeling.

11. Pushing/pulling.

12. Reaching/twisting.
 [All requirements are subject to possible modifications to reasonably accommodate individuals with disabilities. All duties and requirements are essential job functions.]
Required Education
1. High school diploma or equivalent.

2. Medical training: medical assistant or paramedic training preferred.
3. Phlebotomy certification preferred. Required in California, Nevada, and Washington.
Work Experience
1. Five years phlebotomy experience required, inclusive of pediatric, geriatric and capillary collections.
2. Minimum 3 years in a PSC/IOP environment preferred.

3. Customer service in a retail or service environment preferred.
4. Keyboard/data entry experience.
All requirements are subject to possible modifications to reasonably accommodate individuals with disabilities. Quest Diagnostics is an Equal Opportunity Employer: Women / Minorities / Veterans / Disabled / Sexual Orientation / Gender Identity / Citizenship.",463,Washington
59,Khmer Language Instructor at FSI,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Khmer Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
60,Senior Program Management Specialist,Client Solution Architects,"Arlington, VA",None,"CSA Guidance Consulting is seeking a Senior Program Management Specialist to support our government client.

Duties include but not limited to the following:
Coordinate and assist the Government with monitoring performance and progress against plans, baselines, and requirements.Assist in the identification and resolution of issues impacting program/project cost, schedule,
and performance.Coordinate budget, costing, acquisition, and contract input for program/project cost, schedule and performance estimates and draft work products.Assist in program/project prioritization.Assist in preparation and coordination of internal and external Program Management
Reviews (PMRs) and briefings to provide the Program Manager with a comprehensive view
of the following:
1.Budget execution against current Spend Plan(s)Quarterly work accomplishments and outstanding work
1.Upcoming quarter work efforts
2.Estimates at Completion.
3.Challenges and IssuesPrepare Program/Project senior leadership for external Program management reviews.Assist in Program Management briefing material creation and editing.Consult with Program/Project subject matter experts (SMEs) regarding background
information in support of work activity descriptions and impacts.Create and update guidance related to Program Management processes, roles and
responsibilities, and business rules.Integrated Master Schedule (IMS) development and analysis, including the following:
1.Development of the IMS and the associated processes for validating task, resource, and schedule realism.Maintain a fully resourced baseline IMS that accurately includes milestone dates, predecessor, and successor.


Required Qualifications
8 years of demonstrated experience in DoD Program Management and Acquisition Management for ACAT programs across the acquisition life cycle.
PMP or DAWIA PM Level III or Equivalent Certificate.
Active DoD Secret Clearance
Bachelor’s Degree


Applicants may need to meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information; an active United States Department of Defense security clearance or the ability to obtain one may be required for this role.
WE BELIEVE great companies know who they are and what they stand for. CSA’s common purpose and core values were purposefully developed to create a culture focused on unlocking the full potential of our people—so they are inspired to solve our clients’ toughest challenges. It’s no secret, we owe the past 18 years of our success to our outstanding and ambitious team members. To support our hard working team, we offer an environment focused on learning and growth, an awesome benefits package, and opportunities to build a long and successful career.

We are constantly on the hunt for talented, forward-thinking problem solvers with an energetic attitude and a strong work ethic to join our elite team of CSAers.
Be a part of CSA… do great things!
CSA is a Federal Contractor and an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.
If you are an individual with a disability and would like to request a reasonable workplace accommodation for any part of our employment process, please send an email to hr@csaassociates.com. Please indicate the specifics of the assistance needed. Assistance is reserved for individuals who are requesting a reasonable workplace accommodation. It is not intended for other purposes or inquiries. We’re an equal opportunity employer that empowers our people no matter their race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or veteran status or other protected characteristic.
Federal Equal Opportunity is the Law
Federal Employee Rights under FMLA
Federal Employee Polygraph Protection Act
E-Verify Participation Poster (uscis.gov)
If you are a California resident applying for a job, you consent to our California Job Applicant Privacy Notice.
Notification for current or previously cleared professionals:
Official U.S. Government information appearing in the public domain shall not automatically be considered UNCLASSIFIED or approved for public release. CSA recognizes that information contained in resumes of current or previously cleared professionals may be sensitive, contain potentially proprietary and/or protected information. Protected Information is considered classified, in the process of a classification determination, or unclassified, but protected by statute. Therefore, all resumes should be approved for public release by a U.S. Government Official with Original Classification Authority, prior to posting the resume to CSA’s applicant tracking system.
By submitting my resume, I understand that I am NOT authorized to upload content with Official U.S. Government information that is considered, sensitive, proprietary, or protected.",463,Washington
61,Mitigation Department Manager,Rainbow Restoration,"Lorton, VA 22079","$40,000 - $50,000 a year","Rainbow International of Northern Virginia provides expert emergency cleanup and restoration. We respond to your emergency loss quickly to help minimize the damage caused by your emergency situation. Our goal is to provide clients with quality restoration services to restore their property to pre-loss condition. We focus on repairing before we replace. Our responsibility to the client is to preserve and restore the affected property and to limit the extent of the loss from smoke, fire, water and storm damage whenever possible.

We have an immediate openings for experienced Mitigation Department Managers to drive the management and execution of restoration projects. As we are a 24/7/365 operation, all project managers serve on an on-call rotation to respond to emergencies and manage ongoing project’s.

Job Description

The role of the Department Manager is to plan, execute, and finalize restoration projects according to strict deadlines and above industry standards. This includes acquiring resources and coordinating the efforts of team members and third-party contractors or consultants in order to deliver projects according to plan. The Mitigation Department Manager Manager will also define the project’s objectives and oversee quality control throughout its life cycle

Responsibilities:

Direct and manage project development from beginning to end
Define project scope, goals and deliverables that support business goals in collaboration with senior management
Effectively communicate project expectations to team members and customers in a timely and clear fashion
Estimate the resources and participants needed to achieve project goals
Set and continually manage project expectations with team members and other stakeholders
Delegate tasks and responsibilities to appropriate personnel
Identify and resolve issues and conflicts within the project team
Identify and manage project dependencies and critical path
Plan and schedule project timelines and milestones using appropriate tools
Track project milestones and deliverables
Proactively manage changes in project scope, identify potential crises, and devise contingency plans
Coach, mentor, motivate and supervise project team members and contractors, and influence them to take positive action and accountability for their assigned work
Build, develop, and grow any business relationships vital to the success of the project

Education or Equivalent Experience

4 years in a project management role for an emergency services restoration and reconstruction firm

Required Skills

Direct work experience in a project management capacity, including all aspects of process development and execution
 IICRC certifications
Through knowledge of Xactimate Estimating Programming
Prior use of smart phones and laptops preferred
Demonstrated experience in personnel management
Experience at working both independently and in a team-oriented, collaborative environment is essential
Ability to manage multiple, shifting priorities, demands and timelines through analytical and problem-solving capabilities
Strong written and verbal communication, interpersonal and negotiation skills required


Compensation: $40,000 - $50,000 plus commision



At Rainbow International® Restoration we’re helping families out when disaster strikes, turning their damaged houses back into homes. Our franchisees are looking for qualified people seeking to do what it takes to restore the customers property. Does the sound of that excite you? Then seeking a career with an independently owned and operated Rainbow International® franchise might be the place for you. Because for our family, this isn’t just a job, it’s a calling.
Notice

Rainbow International LLC is the franchisor of the Rainbow International Restoration® franchised system. Each Rainbow International Restoration® franchised location is independently-owned and operated by an independent franchisee performing services. As a service to its independent franchisees, Rainbow International LLC lists employment opportunities available throughout the franchised network so those employment opportunities may be conveniently found by interested parties at one central location for brand management purposes only. Rainbow International LLC is NOT the employer seeking help. The only employer is the independent franchisee who has listed its available positions on this website.
Acknowledgement

I acknowledge that each independent Rainbow International Restoration® franchisee hires and determines the terms and conditions of employment for its own employees. Any employment benefits, compensation and employment practices vary by location. Neither Rainbow International LLC (“Franchisor”) nor its affiliates have the power to: (1) hire, fire or modify the employment condition of franchisee’s employees; (2) supervise and control franchisee’s employee work schedule or conditions of employment; (3) determine the rate and method of payment; or (4) accept, review or maintain franchisee employment records. Rainbow International LLC is NOT the employer and/or joint employer for: (i) any of the job opportunities listed on this website; (ii) any of the independent franchisees; and, (iii) any of the employees of the independent franchisees.",463,Washington
62,Software Engineer 3,Asurion,"Sterling, VA 20166",None,"Software Engineer III
The Product Solutions Engineering team is at the leading edge of a fundamental shift at Asurion. We write software of a different kind that creates and manages infrastructure, automates the software lifecycle, automatically scales, and self-heals. We automate everything we touch and make it self-serve so that we don’t need to touch it again. If you are looking for a dynamic and collaborative environment to work where your contribution is recognized and valued, where you continuously learn new things, solve new problems and enjoy being part of something larger than yourself, then this is the place to work. We are looking for ambitious technical minds to help us in our transformative journey.
As a Software Engineer Level III, you will be working with an array of leading-edge tools and paradigms, such as automating project lifecycles using GitHub Actions, creating infrastructure using AWS CDK, building Chat-Ops using AWS Lex, and create automated solutions that makes everyone’s job easier. Languages you will encounter are Node, Typescript, python and go. Regardless of the languages or tools in use, you will be challenged to think beyond your immediate task or project and to think about how something you created can be made useful across the organization.
Roles / Responsibilities
Follows established coding standards and techniques to develop effective, maintainable code & libraries; assists with establishing standards.
Conducts code reviews with peers and develops automated unit test cases to validate defect-free code.
Ensures the developed code complies with utilization of design patterns that align with security policies and guidelines.
Shows a strong attention to development detail, produces high-quality code.
Treats infrastructure as code – infrastructure lives in source control and everything is provisioned with tools but not limited to Terraform, Ansible, Serverless, Cloud Formation, and or AWS CDK.
Implement and secure best in class software delivery pipelines that increase our ability quickly, reliably, and repeatedly deliver to production.
Write technical procedures and documentation including operational runbooks.
Build requisite automation for repetitive yet complex tasks and self-healing of systems.
Participate in Change, Incident, Event and Problem Management processes as needed.
Work with Incident Management on the resolution of application specific items with service impact and direct Incident Management to engage vendors where necessary.
Provide proactive capacity and performance management; making recommendations for improvements to ensure there are enough infrastructure resources to grow with business demand.
Maintains a working knowledge of company's applications and system integration and can understand changes to anticipate cross-system or cross-process impacts.
Maintains proficiency in the application and use of systems, tools, and processes within the department's scope.
Maintains proficiency in the business processes that drive the applications within the department’s scope.
Organizes workload to meet deadlines as assigned by the team leadership.
Creates, maintains, reviews, and adheres to required departmental processes and procedures as assigned by the Manager or Sr. Manager.
Exhibits drive and initiative to learn whatever is necessary to explore new solutions.
Organizes workload to meet deadlines as assigned by the team leadership.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Electronics Engineering, or a related field.
Minimum 3 years of experience in software engineering/development.
Minimum 3 years of experience developing and architecting on cloud platforms.
Minimum 3 years of experience with Agile development methodologies and practices.
Preferred experience in open source cloud tooling including but not limited to Terraform, Ansible, Serverless framework, AWS CDK.
Minimum 3 years of experience in automation and instrumentation experience using tools like Shell, Perl, Python, Puppet
Experience in container management system: Elastic Container Service, Kubernetes, Docker Swarm, Nomad…
Experience in development of and monitoring infrastructure, preferably tools like ELK, Splunk, AppDynamics, New Relic, DataDog
Experience working in devops culture and toolset: CI/CD, Git, Jenkins and pipeline management, and other related ancillary tools.
Understanding of Software Development Life cycle concepts.
Understanding of design for scalability, performance and reliability
Understands accessibility and security compliance, user authentication and authorization between multiple systems, servers, and environments.
Experience working in a geographically distributed team.
Knowledge of theory and principles of project management.",463,Washington
63,Customer Support Specialist Technician,Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies,"Falls Church, VA",None,"Kapili Government Services, LLC is looking for a qualified Customer Support Specialist Technician to support our contract with DHA Virtual Health.

DESCRIPTION:

Performs administrative and customer support for the Military Health System Virtual Health Program including supporting individual product development, risk identification and management and program reporting and records.
Assist Program Office with day-to-day management of schedule and activities.
Tracking Program Office progress on individual projects and reporting.
Coordinate staff meetings and external meetings.
Provide administrative support for product managers and technical staff to facilitate Program Office operations.
Support may include developing presentations, managing suspenses, creating briefing documents, and development/tabulation of spreadsheets.
Draft Executive correspondence to include but not limited to letters, memorandums, policy memorandums, and operational orders.
Maintain files and records relating to projects and engagements
Plan and schedule a variety of meetings for Program Office members and stakeholders to include teleconferences, conferences, business meeting, or other support activities
Independently consolidate and finalize information for various reports in accordance with established reporting procedures and inform supervisor of important matters and deadlines.
Anticipate need for information, gather and summarize information from files and meetings.
Prepare material/documents for the Program Office to use in responding to inquiries, recognizing which information is, or is not, relevant to the issue at hand.
Establish reporting requirements and arrange with subordinate officials for the collection and submission of data.


REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:

Experienced with Microsoft Office Suite of Products
Experienced in supporting senior level management

DESIRED SKILLS:

DoD Experience; Defense Health Agency (DHA) Experience

DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT:

HS Diploma
BA - Administrative Support or Information Management - Preferred

CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

Tier 1/NACI/ADP/IT III

Kapili Government Services, LLC is a fast-growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 10 paid holidays. Kapili Government Services is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.

We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer of individuals with disabilities and veterans. We are proud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status. If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees.

The Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies (FOCs) is comprised of industry-recognized government service firms designated as Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO)-owned and 8(a) certified businesses. The Family of Companies (FOCs) includes Ke`aki Technologies, Laulima Government Solutions, Kūpono Government Services, and Kapili Services, Po`okela Solutions, Kīkaha Solutions, LLC, and Pololei Solutions, LLC. Alaka`ina Foundation activities under the 501(c)3 principally benefit the youth of Hawaii through charitable efforts which includes providing innovative educational programs that combine leadership, science & technology, and environmental stewardship.

For additional information, please visit www.alakainafoundation.com

 #Monster

#ClearanceJobs",463,Washington
64,Greek Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Greek Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
65,Portuguese (Continental) Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Portuguese (Continental) Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
66,Portuguese (Brazilian) Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Portuguese (Brazilian) Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
67,Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO),CACI,"Reston, VA 20190 (Sunset Hills area)",None,"Job Description
What You’ll Get to Do:
As a CACI/WGI (The Wexford Group International) you will play a key role as an experienced systems security professional to lead a government program’s accreditation efforts and serve as an Information Systems Security Officer (ISSO) for a Microsoft GCC-High Cloud-based O365 tenant environment. As a key member of our team, you will create all necessary certification and accreditation (C&A) documentation and lead efforts throughout the Risk Management Framework (RMF) process. You will also support information system life cycle activities ranging from rapidly establishing systems to support multi-program portals, provide regular maintenance, support and upgrades of systems during program execution, and to program close-out and de-certification activities. You will work with a team of Government, Active Duty Military, and other contractors to Designate the information technology type of each assigned system. Develop system security plans (SSPs) for each system by categorizing, selecting, and implementing appropriate security controls including upload of artifacts substantiating the implementation or POA&Ms development as required. Support system assessment and authorization by developing and iterating POA&Ms in response to Security Assessment Reports. Monitor the cybersecurity posture of each assigned system, responding to incidents as required. As the ISSO, your role is to support the needs of our technical customers while being compliant with the Department of Defense (DoD) system security requirements in accordance with NIST 800-171 standards as part of our enterprise transition to the O365 GCC-High Cloud and in pursuit of Cybersecurity Maturity Model Certification (CMMC).
More About the Role:
In this role you will support the creation of a System Security Plan (SSP) and relevant technical documentation capturing the technical system configurations, standards and procedures. You will work during normal business hours and be in daily coordination with O365 Security and Compliance Engineers, developers and work under the guidance of the Technical Project Lead. You will primarily work remotely with an occasional requirement to travel to the northern Virginia area for collaboration sessions and business meetings.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science or related technical discipline
5+ years of experience specializing in Information Security
7+ years of Information Technology experience
Experience as an ISSO implementing NIST 800-171 controls.
Have CISSP certification or equivalent per DoD Directive 8570.1.
Experience in developing external customer relationships and communications (e.g., DSS, DIA, NGIC, NRO, DARPA, IARPA, AF, Navy)
Experience in FSO, PERSEC, COMSEC and/or program security roles
Currently hold either of the minimum Information Assurance Manager (IAM) Level II credentials: Certified Authentication Professional (CAP) or CompTIA Advanced Security Practitioner (CASP+CE)
2-5 years of directly related Information Assurance (IA) or cybersecurity experience working with DoD systems.
Working knowledge of these references: CNSSI No. 1253 “Committee on National Security Systems, Security Categorization and Control Selection for National Security Systems,” DoDI 8500.01 “Cybersecurity,” DoDI 8510.01 “Risk Management Framework for DoD IT,” FIPS-199 Pub “Standards for Security Categorization of Federal Information and Information Systems,” NIST SP 800-53 Rev 4 “Security and Privacy Controls for Federal Information Systems and Organizations.”
Currently hold either of the minimum Information Assurance Manager (IAM) Level II credentials: Certified Authentication Professional (CAP) or CompTIA Advanced Security Practitioner (CASP+CE)
Active Top Secret security clearance and ability to obtain SCI and polygraph.
This Qualification Would be Nice to Have:
Hold a current Information Assurance Manager (IAM) Level III credential
Certified Information Security Manager (CISM)
Certified Information Systems Security Professional (CISSP, or Associate)
GIAC Security Leadership (GSLC), or Certified Chief Information Security Officer (CCISO)
Microsoft 365 Security Administration
Microsoft 365 Mobility and Security
Identity and Access Administrator Associate
What We Can Offer You:
CACI-WGI (The Wexford Group International) is a wholly-owned subsidiary of CACI with a reputation for uncompromising standards of quality in its people and its performance. Joining the CACI-WGI team is a mark of excellence for those employees who complete our rigorous Recruiting, Assessment, and Selection (RAS) process.
CACI-WGI’s mission places its personnel against the government’s most critical emerging challenges. Work with us and you’ll be working with a team making a difference across the globe.
CACI-WGI offers competitive benefits as well as numerous learning and development opportunities.
Job Location
US-Reston-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN


CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",463,Washington
68,Program Integrator (PI) Level III,"ANALYGENCE, Inc.","Fort Meade, MD",None,"Company Description
ANALYGENCE, INC. (ANALYGENCE) is a Disadvantaged, Veteran-Owned professional services small business established in 2010 on the principle of providing our customers with results driven professionals that understand the dynamic customer environment and can be relied upon to help them achieve their objectives. ANALYGENCE works with customers to develop and execute innovative strategies to improve processes and achieve customer goals. Our people are service-oriented professionals with varying military, government and industry backgrounds, who understand the level of commitment and flexibility it takes to progress customers forward in a dynamic work environment. We cater to the specific needs of each individual customer to help them lay out a path for success.

Job Description
ANALYGENCE is seeking a Program Integrator (PI) Level III shall assist individual program managers, initiative leads, and PEO leadership with monitoring and reporting on the overall health of programs, initiatives, and/or a portfolio. Perform holistic analysis across multiple contracts and government activities to identify cost, schedule and performance concerns for a program or initiative. Perform cross-program analysis to assist in responding to Investment Portfolio (IP) actions and producing execution reports. Draft acquisition and program documents such as TTOs, Statements of Work (SOWs), Program Management Plans (PMPs), Risk Management Plans, program schedules, Technical CICA memorandums, and Acquisition Strategies. Prepare presentations to report analysis findings as well as program/portfolio status.

Qualifications
Basic Qualifications:
An active Top Secret Clearance with Poly required to start.
Bachelor’s Degree with a business or technical focus is required. In lieu of a degree, Project Management Institute PMP certification, Certified Federal Contracts Manager (CFCM) certification, and an additional three (3) years of directly related experience for a total of fifteen (15) years may be substituted. In lieu of certification, an additional three (3) years of directly related experience for a total of eighteen (18) years may be substituted.
Twelve (12) years of demonstrated combined experience in DoD/IC program management, contract management, and/or financial management.
Intermediate proficiency with MS Excel is required to include demonstrated use of pivot tables, slicers, and pivot charts.
Preferred Qualifications:
Familiarity with Plan-It is preferred.
Additional Information
ANALYGENCE, Inc. is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decision without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.",463,Washington
69,Task Order Project Manager,"Amyx, Inc.","Fort Belvoir, VA 22060",None,"Overview:

Amyx, Inc. is seeking to hire a Cybersecurity Task Order Project Manager, to be located at DLA Headquarters, Fort Belvoir, VA.
Responsibilities:

Daily Tasks:
Serves as the project manager for a large, complex task order (or a group of task orders affecting the same migration system). Assist the Program Manager in working with the Government Contracting Officer (KO), the task order-level COR and COTRs, Government management personnel and customer agency representatives. Responsible for the overall management of the specific task order(s) and ensuring that the technical solutions and schedules in the task order are implemented in a timely manner.
The Cybersecurity Task Order Project Manager primary job responsibilities will include:
Performs enterprise wide horizontal integration planning and interfaces to other functional systems.

Track the authorization status of Information Systems (ISs) (Platform IT (PIT), IT Services and IT Products) that includes expiration of all authorization decisions (e.g. Interim Authorization to Test (IATT), Authorization to Operate (ATO), ATO w/Conditions) and the submission of RMF packages throughout the system’s development lifecycle.

Coordinate with or participate in meetings, with other Federal, DoD, DLA, and private/ industry organizations.

Ensure Quality Assurance and continual process improvement in the delivery of IT security services.

Provide guidance and respond to inquiries from PM/SM, ISSM, ISSO, and other Client’s personnel on the DoD/Client’s RMF process, current status of submitted packages, and their authorization status.

Review IT security documentation (e.g., artifacts, Plan of Actions and Milestones (POA&Ms), actual assessment results) provided with an authorization request and provide information to support the RMF reviews.
Supported Technologies:
eMASS
Sharepoint

Office Products

Qualifications:

Desired Skills:
Three (3) years of DLA Cybersecurity experience.

Three (3) years of DLA Information Technology (IT) experience

Experience with DISA SRGs and STIGs.
Required Skills:
Demonstrated leadership experience in projects of similar size and complexity.

Six years general IT experience.

Six years Cybersecurity experience.

Must possess a DOD Secret Clearance

DOD 8570.01 IAM level III (CISSP, CISM, or GSLC)

Must possess a Risk Management Professional credential

Must possess a Project Management Professional (PMP) certification or equivalent

Strong knowledge of RMF.
Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.

Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.



Physical Demands

Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",463,Washington
70,"Business Analyst III, Enrollment Automation (Contractor)","Stride, Inc.","Washington, DC",None,"Apply directly to: Business Analyst III, Enrollment Automation (Contractor)https://recruiting.ultipro.com/KIN1002KTWEL/JobBoard/2a39421b-1f5a-45ac-8e84-3a801088facc/OpportunityDetail?opportunityId=04587368-7cca-455e-b34c-01445892792eMeet StrideSuccess StoriesResponsibility and InclusionOver 20 years ago, Stride was founded to provide personalized learning — powered by technology. We reached students where they were in their own journeys. We knocked down their barriers to great education. And we gave every learner equal opportunity to succeed — however they defined success. Stride innovated the learning experience with online and blended learning that prepared them for their lives ahead.Stride is a community of passionate leaders. Whether teachers, engineers, curriculum writers, or financial managers — whatever your expertise or role, we all work to empower futures through learning. And changing the trajectory of learning itself is one of our greatest missions. Join us in developing more effective ways to learn and helping learners build the skills and confidence they need to make their way forward in life.The Business Analyst, Level 3, helps define the automation and customer experience improvement roadmaps for the Company’s Enrollment Center and Marketing Department and engages with stakeholders to ensure products meet strategic goals. This position requires the incumbent to elicit, analyze, validate, specify, verify, prioritize, and manage the business needs. This will involve a close partnership with other groups across the organization, including Information Technology (IT) Enrollment, and Marketing internal customers and end users throughout the business solution development lifecycle including analysis and refinements after deployment.Essential Functions:    Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential duties.    Helps define user problems, stories, and develop scope statements as well as other requirements artifacts related to the Enrollment and Marketing lifecycles to enable the evolution of the Company’s systems and products.Understands and articulates the business vision, problem definition and opportunity by documenting business requirements, use cases, and functional and non-functional requirements.Utilizes interviewing skills to elicit, analyze, validate, specify, and verify the business needs of the project stakeholders, including internal and external (throughout the Company) stakeholders and end users.Partners with Business users, technology development, and project managers from across the Company to ascertain business requirements and transform those requirements into a functional specification document.Ensures requirements are documented, traceable and testable through to implementation.Collaborates with multidisciplinary management team in prioritizing functional requirements and developing a phased-development approach with the project team.Provides central coordination for all business and infrastructure requirements for automation and customer experience initiatives as a critical member of the Enrollment Automation Team.Leverages interpersonal skills to work in a team environment and communicate effectively across a variety of stakeholder groups.Facilitates the coordination and implementation of ideas and activities between the Enrollment, Marketing, and automation teams to ensure positive cooperation in a dynamic matrix environment.Develops high quality presentations, documentation, and analytical materials for consumption by senior management and field teams.Develops organizational evolving processes/workflows, tool usage and participate in process improvement activities.Provides UAT samples and conducts User Acceptance Testing to verify the fulfillment of all requirements and communicate changes in accordance with the project change control process.Resolve issues and conflicts as they arise.Monitors, updates, and escalates automation related issues.Works independently with multiple management areas and communicates with Business Owners to ensure the process remains as stated in the project scope.Supervisory Responsibilities:    This position has no formal supervisory responsibilities.  Minimum Required Qualifications:      Bachelor’s degreeSix (6) years of experience in business analysis, automation, or a related fieldCertificates and Licenses:  None required.   Other Required Qualifications:     Business and analytical acumen: critically evaluate the information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, translate up from low-level information to a more general understanding, distinguish presented user requests from the underlying true needs, and distinguish solution ideas from requirements. Work and cope within rapidly changing environment and rethink the approach as new challenges are presentedCommunication: solid communications skills, both written and oral to communicate information effectively to customers, marketing, managers, and technical staffLeadership: mentor other business analysts on the team, facilitate and lead requirements elicitation workshops. Provides technical guidance related to the business implications of the application of various systemsInterpersonal: help negotiate priorities and to resolve conflicts among project stakeholders (such as customers, product management, and engineering)Project management: help organize, lead, and implement solutions. Work independently and efficiently, in a cross-functional matrix environment, to successfully manage multiple projects in a timely mannerCollaboration: working in a team-oriented, collaborative environmentDemonstrate strong interest in technology, particularly a familiarity with the issues facing technology from a business perspective and knowledge about automation (artificial intelligence, machine learning, and business modeling)Ability to clear required background checkDesired Qualifications:     Master’s degreeProduct Development & Management Association (PDMA) New Product Development Professional (NPDP) certification or International Institute of Business Analysis (IIBA) Certified Business Analysis Professional (CBAP) certificationExperience with web-based applicationsExperience using Salesforce as a user or Systems AdministratorIntermediate skills utilizing SQLRPA certificationsWork Environment: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.This is a home based position. This position is open to residents of, and may be performed remotely from Washington, D.C., and from any state except Colorado.The above job is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of duties and standards of the position. Incumbents will follow any other instructions, and perform any other related duties, as assigned by their supervisor. All employment is “at-will” as governed by the law of the state where the employee works. It is further understood that the “at-will” nature of employment is one aspect of employment that cannot be changed except in writing and signed by an authorized officer.Stride, Inc. is a Federal Contractor, an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected Veteran status age,, or genetics, or any other characteristic protected by law.Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with DisabilitiesThe contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)Job Types: Full-time, Contract",463,Washington
71,Cybersecurity SME,Arlo Solutions,"Washington, DC 20005 (Logan Circle area)",None,"Project/Job Title: Cybersecurity SME
Work Location: National Capital Region
Job Summary
Arlo Solutions has an immediate need for a Cybersecurity SME to join our team in support of our the United States Air Force Chief Information Security Officer (CISO) contract located at the Pentagon in Arlington, VA. The Cyber SME will provide enterprise-level guidance, leadership, and expertise in developing and implementing a department-level cybersecurity program. Develop policies, procedures, and guidance for implementing and maintaining cybersecurity. Apply expert understanding of Federal, OMB, and DoD regulatory and statutory cybersecurity requirements to include Risk Management Framework (RMF), Cybersecurity Framework (CSF), and Supply Chain Risk Management (SCRM). Mentor peers to develop and implement enterprise-level cybersecurity program and assist the Program Manager as needed. This position requires a strong background in cybersecurity and experience successfully implementing solutions. Candidates must possess an active Top Secret/SCI eligible Clearance and a DoD 8570 IAM III Certification to be considered for this position.
Responsibilities Include:
Execution and delivery of the AF cybersecurity program to the AF CISO and staff
Ability to effectively communicate across diverse audiences and influence cross-functionally
Ability to work with and address the specific needs of various organizations within and outside the AF while maintaining a “big picture” vision of AF CISO goals/mission
Advise based on broad-based technical background in IT operations and cybersecurity
Strong analytical skills with the ability to analyze data sets to determine trends, establish strategies, and make decisions
Ability to multitask as well as be strategic, creative and innovative in a dynamic, fast-paced environment to include government, military, and contractor personnel
Demonstrated experience supporting DoD cybersecurity programs at the staff level, preferably Air Force (HAF, SAF, MAJCOM)
Ability to create strategies and technology roadmaps to manage operational activities supporting the refinement and implementation of Federal and DoD cybersecurity requirements, such as RMF & CSF
Work with AF Civilian and Military personnel to design, implement, and maintain the AF cybersecurity program in accordance with Federal (NIST), DoD, and AF policy and guidance
Expert understanding and demonstrable implementation experience regarding DoD/Federal cybersecurity requirements to include RMF, CSF, and SCRM
Strong understanding of cybersecurity implementation requirements in one or more of the following areas: SCRM, TRANSEC, Weapon Systems, PIT, OIT, IoT, Cloud Security, ICS/SCADA, Control Systems, DIB
Interact and communicate project plans, concerns, and issues with senior leadership and the government
Minimum Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Information Technology, or other related degree fields (Master’s Degree is preferred)
At least 4 years (6 or more preferred) of Cybersecurity experience in a senior technical or management role, Project Management experience a plus
Active CISSP
Active Top Secret/SCI eligible
Experience working at DoD HQ level environment, AF (Pentagon) experience preferred
Expert understanding of NIST 800 series standards and guidelines, related Federal guidance, DoD RMF, and current cybersecurity best practices
Excellent communication/presentation skills briefing senior military and government civilian leadership
AAP/EEO Statement:
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
Other Duties:
Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Arlo Solutions is an information technology consulting services company that specializes in delivering technology solutions. Our reputation reflects the high quality of the talented Arlo Solutions team and the consultants working in partnership with our customers. Our mission is to understand and meet the needs of both our customers and consultants by delivering quality, value-added solutions. Our solutions are designed and managed to not only reduce costs, but to improve business processes, accelerate response time, improve services to end-users, and give our customers a competitive edge, now and into the future.",463,Washington
72,Software Developer III- Java,Powersolv,"Washington, DC",None,"Job Title: Software Developer III
Location: Washington DC

Overview:
The purpose of this position is to provide support for critical business functions through the development, implementation, testing and maintenance of applications systems.
Responsibilities:
The position’s essential duties include the following:
Support critical business functions through the development, implementation, and maintenance of applications and systems;
Contribute software development expertise to multiple projects and ensure that specifications are met;
Design, code, test, debug, maintain, and document software applications;
Follow established software development standards and procedures and contribute towards their improvement;
Develop complex application features and create technical designs;
Participate in peer code and design reviews;
Experienced with a wide range of technologies;
Coordinate with departments and users in the support of business applications.
Represent the IT department in terms of software development expertise in coordination with other departments;

Type of Experience JEE Years of Experience
JEE, EJB 3+, Hibernate 3+, JPA, JMS, JSF, JBoss 4+ 5+ Years
Spring 5+ Years
Oracle 10g+; SQL Server RDBMS concepts 5+ Years
Application Development/Software Engineering/Design Patterns 5+ Years
Web application development 5+ Years
Object oriented design and architecture 5+ Years
Web Services/API Development and use 5+ Years
Technical Documentation 4+ Years

NOTE: In addition, please list any desired experience.
Experience API’s and SOA Patterns
Experience with integration of application software and RDBMS
Knowledge of configuration management, release management principles
Knowledge of SOA
Experience with agile SDLC; Scrum preferred
Experience with high availability architectures
Knowledge of networking and system engineering concepts
Experience with PL/SQL
Experience with scripting languages
Experience with Oracle Access Manager (OAM)
Knowledge of application security concepts

SPECIAL SKILLS:
Analytical and problem solving skills
Developing and/or creating new or more effective ideas, approaches, etc.
Developing and executing short-range plans/decisions
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills
Ability to exercise sound judgment across a broad range of circumstances.",463,Washington
73,Subject Matter Expert Team Lead - Unified Communications,By Light Professional IT Services LLC,"Washington, DC 20001 (Mount Vernon Square area)",None,"Overview:

By Light is seeking an Unified Communications Subject Matter Expert Team Lead to join our team in a proposal to support USCIS with infrastructure modernization. The primary goal of this acquisition is to establish a solid service delivery capability for the USCIS infrastructure support. The scope of work will include operations & maintenance support for systems and platforms to include hosting services, systems administration, strorage services, backup services, database administration, and tier II and tier III support for application infrastructure/hosting and systems administration. Unified Communications services include multimedia enterprise operations support, telephony, and tier II/tier III support support. Additional support includes project management of infrastructure projects. Current methodologies that USCIS currently employes are ITIL, Agile systems, DevSecOps, and PMI PMBok.
UC SMEs are experts in the daily operational needs of the UC systems deployed or utilized by the USCIS enterprise customers. This includes operating, maintenance and integration of all Unified Communication responsible technologies implemented by USCIS. UC systems from the vendors Microsoft, ConnectedSign, Polycom and Cisco are the backbone of our delivered services, while vBrick and Avaya are Service Offerings which render USCIS UC services.
Responsibilities:
Act as expert when it comes to the operations, maintenance, and daily analysis of performance of all the USCIS Core Unified Communications hardware and software systems required for UC operations.
Key individual when responding to and initiating restoral actions on all the UC service support systems.
Be responsive and work on all critical/high-profile UC referred issues and tickets.
Provide key interoperability and functional testing with engineering teams and assist with their expertise in furtherance of unified communications support goals with vendors and other subject matter experts.
Provide guidance for the field technicians for all daily incident handling and restorative issues.
Document all UC systems, have input into the deliverables required of the team, and provide both physical and logical drawings of all UC supporting/responsible systems.
Required Experience/Qualifications:
Equivalent skills of Cisco CCNP Collaboration or higher certification.
Experience in VoIP
Minimum five (5) years of experience in a Unified Communications environment.
Experience with Microsoft, ConnectedSign, Polycom, Cisco, vBrick, and Avaya.
Knowledge of how to operate, configure, manage, and provide troubleshooting/restoration services for the following key functional systems: Cisco Call Manager, Cisco Expressways, Cisco WebEx, Polycom RMX Bridge, Polycom DMA, Polycom Resource Manager, Cisco Telepresence Management Suite, Cisco Meeting Server, Cisco Unified Communications Manager, Avaya video phones, Avaya Communicator, vBrick Media-Streaming systems, and Microsoft Skype.
Knowledge of how to validate delivery performance through the analysis of packets, protocols and QoS functionality for all services using service optimization and NetFlow analysis.",463,Washington
74,Biostatistician II/III,System One,"Gaithersburg, MD",None,"Permanent Biostatistician Opportunity Available.


Fully Remote!

Job Description:
Responsibilities include but not limited to the following:
Assists in the review of statistical sections of clinical protocols using appropriate statistical methodology for the specific trial, including selection of study design, sample size, and analyses.
Reviews database design, CRFs, and edit checks.
Prepares or reviews statistical analysis plans and tables/listings/figures shells.
Prepares or reviews statistical sections for relevant background documents for regulatory agencies.
Writes specifications for or produce data sets, tables, figures, and listings for submissions, publications, and internal needs.
Provides programming support to programming team when it is needed for the validation of clinical study tables and listings.
Write codes for generating graphs for external dissemination, simulation based power calculations, and development of statistical analysis macros.
Is a good team player. Has good business ethics and leadership skills.
Meets deadlines while maintaining high quality standards.
Performs other duties as requested to meet company milestones including support for Senior Manager, Biostatistics.
Minimum requirements:
Master's Degree in Statistics (or equivalent degree) with at least 2-3 years of experience in a pharmaceutical company (pharma), biotech, or clinical research organization (CRO) servicing the pharmaceutical industry or PhD in Statistics with at least 1-2 years of experience in pharma/biotech/CRO.
Knowledge of experimental design for clinical trials, power calculations, simulations, time-to-event analyses, and other methods for assessment of efficacy, safety, and immunogenicity.
Familiarity with current ICH guidance pertinent to clinical development.
Proven knowledge and expertise in biostatistics and its application to vaccine clinical trials. Solid knowledge and experience in vaccine development process, including evaluation of epidemiologic data for definition of key endpoints and assessment of correlates of risk.
Able to thrive in a fast-paced team environment and work independently on projects.
Very good communication and presentation skills. Ability to communicate statistical concepts across functions.
Thorough and up-to-date working knowledge of statistical software packages. Hands-on programming experience. One to two years SAS programming experience (Base SAS, SAS/STAT, SAS/GRAPH, and SAS macro language) and other statistical software (e.g., R or JMP) in pharma/biotech/CRO.
Experience with CDISC is preferred.",463,Washington
75,Relationship Manager III - Wealth Management,PNC Financial Services Group,"Washington, DC 20006 (Downtown area)",None,"Job Profile

Position Overview

At PNC, our people are our greatest differentiator and competitive advantage in the markets we serve. We are all united in delivering the best experience for our customers. As a Relationship Strategist within PNC's Asset Management organization, you will be based in our Washington, DC office.

It will be expected that the Relationship Strategist candidate have experience and expertise working with ultra-high-net-worth clients.

Job Description

Leads or supports client management activities with clients and prospective clients. Responsible for the development and execution of a relationship management plan to acquire and retain clients. Is accountable for ongoing exceptional client experience. Has a book of business that typically consists of larger and/or more complex client relationships.
Coordinates with team to determine action plan through thorough discovery of client needs to deliver an exceptional client experience. Consistently reviews needs assessment with clients to determine changes. Has working knowledge of all business segment capabilities and offerings. Ensures a strong client commitment and advocacy by delivering proactive and responsive service to meet client goals. Holds team accountable for deliverables.
Held accountable for the growth of their book of business through client expansion and new client acquisition. Develops and executes strategies for proactively sourcing new relationships for the bank. Owns communication and contact with existing clients to ensure expansion opportunities are captured. Consistently seeks ways to expand his/her external network for business development.
Manages risk through appropriate client selection and ensures that our service delivery is consistent with the fees being charged. Works with risk partners to escalate client concerns to bring about quick resolution. Has well developed knowledge of partner offerings to make business-appropriate introductions. Is accountable to partners for follow up and client communication after initial introduction.
Maintains timely, accurate and complete sales/client relationship management administration tasks as determined by the business. Ensures the execution of team processes, such as pre-call planning, post-call debriefs and relationship reviews.

PNC Employees take pride in our reputation and to continue building upon that we expect our employees to be:
Customer Focused - Knowledgeable of the values and practices that align customer needs and satisfaction as primary considerations in all business decisions and able to leverage that information in creating customized customer solutions.
Managing Risk - Assessing and effectively managing all of the risks associated with their business objectives and activities to ensure they adhere to and support PNC's Enterprise Risk Management Framework.

Competencies

Customer Experience Management. – Implements the strategies and techniques used to ensure that customers have a positive experience with the organization and its products and services at every touch point.

Customer Service Management – Knowledge of and ability to utilize tools and techniques for maintaining an environment where all understand, and are committed to, providing excellent service to internal and external customers.

Decision Making and Critical Thinking – Understanding of the issues related to the decision-making process; ability to analyze situations fully and accurately, and reach productive decisions.

Effective Communications – Understanding of effective communication concepts, tools and techniques; ability to effectively transmit, receive, and accurately interpret ideas, information, and needs through the application of appropriate communication behaviors.

Influencing – Knowledge of effective influencing tactics and strategies; ability to impact decisions within and outside own organization.

Managing Multiple Priorities – Ability to manage multiple concurrent objectives, projects, groups, or activities, making effective judgments as to prioritizing and time allocation.

Products and Services – Knowledge of major products and services and product and service groups; ability to apply this knowledge appropriately to diverse situations.

Selling. – Applies knowledge of banking products and services to meet customer needs and enable them to achieve their financial goals. Identifies prospecting approaches to identify potential customers and create opportunities to sell financial solutions and ideas to customers.

Understanding Customer Needs – Knowledge of and the ability to recognize and be sensitive to the different perspectives and priorities of different customers.

Value Selling – Knowledge of the principles and practices for selling products, technology and services; ability to provide overall product/service 'value' and differentiating support offerings that address clearly understood customer needs.

Work Experience

Roles at this level typically require a university / college degree, with 5+ years of industry-relevant experience. Specific certifications are often required. In lieu of a degree, a comparable combination of education and experience (including military service) may be considered.

Education

Bachelors

Additional Job Description

Benefits
PNC offers employees a comprehensive range of benefits to help meet your needs now and in the future. Depending on your eligibility, options for full-time employees include medical/prescription drug coverage (with a Health Savings Account feature); dental and vision options; employee and spouse/child life insurance; short- and long-term disability protection; maternity and parental leave; paid holidays, vacation days and occasional absence time; 401(k), pension and stock purchase plans; dependent care reimbursement account; back-up child/elder care; adoption assistance; educational assistance and a robust wellness program with financial incentives. To learn more about these and other programs, including benefits for part-time employees, visit pncbenefits.com > New to PNC .

Disability Accommodations Statement:
The PNC workplace is inclusive and supportive of individual needs. If you have a physical or other impairment that might require an accommodation, including technical assistance with the PNC Careers website or submission process, please call 877-968-7762 and select Option 4: Recruiting or contact us via email at pathfinder@pnc.com.

The Human Resources Service Center hours of operation are Monday - Friday 9:00 AM to 5:00 PM ET.

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO):
PNC provides equal employment opportunity to qualified persons regardless of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, veteran status, or other categories protected by law.

California Residents

Refer to the California Consumer Privacy Act Privacy Notice to gain understanding of how PNC may use or disclose your personal information in our hiring practices.",463,Washington
76,Sr. Program Manager,Diligent Solutions,"Washington, DC 20036 (Downtown area)",None,"Diligent Solutions is seeking a highly motivated technology and customer-oriented Program Manager in Washington, DC to support our Federal client and lead a dynamic team of Tier I and Tier II technical resources supporting network infrastructure, service desk, and application support.

The Program Manager will oversee a team of ~ 40 tier 1/tier 2 customer service and operations-focused resources. The PM will provide leadership, creativity, and efficiency in the execution of day-to-day operations, as well as implementing service enhancements, process improvements, and SLA management. The ideal PM will deliver consistently high value, ""client ready"" work with minimum supervision. They will perform the role of primary interface with the client – communicating deliverables, conducting client meetings, obtaining required client sign off and specifications, and client acceptance. The PM will set objectives and priorities for the staff, assign and review tasks, assess and coach performance of employees, and manage staffing requirements. The PM will mentor staff including project managers and consultants.

Candidates must have and/or be eligible to obtain a Top Secret with SCI clearance.
Candidates must have a Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Manage daily activities of the following:

24x7x365 service desk, performing incident management and appropriate issue escalation to Tier III
Tier II / Tier III data network operations
VTC support
Mobile Device Management (MDM) and provisioning
Asset Management and Procurement Support
Maximize scheduling and real-time utilization of resources.
Uses appropriate methodologies (such as risk mitigation/management, change/control management and contract management) to manage major projects or a group of projects
Act as a team lead on a cross-functional IT project team, exercising project management skills to plan, develop, implement, coordinate, and lead project activities (e.g., develop feasible milestones, coordinate and plan)
Identify needs and provides recommendations on staffing increases or decreases.
Expert level experience using MS Project to plan and execute complex IT projects
Experience with Remedy preferred; Experience with Service Now desired
Review ongoing performance results and enacts contingency plans as needed; escalates and directs activities during systems problems, disasters, etc.; identifies potential problems, troubleshoots, and takes corrective measures with authorization, escalate as needed.
Participates in daily, weekly, monthly and annual planning process as appropriate.
Manage multiple, parallel projects using project planning techniques.
Performs all duties and responsibilities in a timely and effective manner in accordance with established office policies to achieve the overall project objectives
Maintains a favorable working relationship with all other office employees, both government and contractor, to foster aid promote a cooperative and harmonious working climate which will be conducive to maximum employee morale, productivity, and efficiency/effectiveness.
Skilled in providing negotiation, customer service, organization, communication, problem solving, and conflict management.
Business Development and Client Relationship Management:
Generates and actively participates in innovation opportunities that result in profitable revenue growth. Identifies opportunities for additional value-add propositions for the client
Develops strong client relationships and performs the role of primary interface with the client. Interfaces with client’s technical executives to understand their business challenges and recommend innovative integrated business solutions.
Interfaces with the client's technical executives to understand their business challenges. Uses this information and their expertise to recommend innovative integrated business solutions for client.
Manages the performance of internal and external service providers in order to ensure the implementation of deliverables and resulting client satisfaction. Interfaces with sub-contractors.

Required Qualifications:

ITIL Certification
PMP (desired)
Experience supporting data center operations
Experience in IT infrastructure management
Experience in Systems Engineering
Experience in IT Program Management
Experience building relationships with Mission Leaders, Executive Directors, CTO’s, and HQ C Level executives

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status, or any other legally protected basis, in accordance with applicable law.",463,Washington
77,Italian Language Instructor,"Yorktown Systems Group, Inc.","Arlington, VA 22201",None,"Note all applications and resumes submitted are for a ""ready pool"" of qualified Language Instructors for the Department of State (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI). Your application and resume will be reviewed when there is a requirement for a language instructor for your specific language and qualifications at FSI.
Italian Language Instructor for The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI) provides language training and testing to DOS employees and other government agencies in over 70 foreign languages. Enrollments in the School surpass 2000 students annually including up to 1000 distance learning enrollments.
General Requirements, but are not limited to:
Language Instruction
Plan and/or conduct small and/or large group language classes using a wide variety of language teaching methodologies and techniques, stressing speaking, listening comprehension, and reading skills. In most cases, the Government will provide the teaching materials. Using the foreign language as a tool to accomplish United States Government objectives is the ultimate goal of the training that SLS provides.
Use established training materials and work collaboratively and closely with other instructors, under the direct guidance of the COR, ACOR, or GTM, who is usually the Language Training Supervisor (LTS), on training and/or testing matters.
In collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM and others, adapt teaching techniques and approaches to the students' individual learning styles and needs. ·
Provide feedback and analysis of the students' progress and problems to the COR, ACOR, or GTM and to instructional and other staff as appropriate.
Provide students with encouragement and constructive feedback.
Apply classroom management techniques to provide a respectful, student-centered environment conducive to learning.
Conduct informal or formal progress evaluations and/or administer weekly quizzes and assessments to evaluate student progress.
Attend all section and other meetings as appropriate.
Incorporate the use of instructional technology into the instructional program as appropriate and in collaboration with the COR, ACOR, or GTM.
Serve part-time as a mentor to distance learning students with COR, ACOR, or GTM approval. (Part-time DL instruction will supplement in class instruction on occasions where the amount of students cannot accommodate a full-time DL instructor provided in CLIN 7).
Collaborate with staff in the Learning Consultation Service (LCS) in whatever way deemed appropriate by the COR, ACOR, or GTM. The LCS is a unit in SLS with specialists who assist language students with their learning by providing counseling and administering and interpreting diagnostic instruments which assess learning styles and preferences.
With pre-approval by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, plan and/or participate in non-classroom activities in the Washington area. Participation is strictly voluntary. Activities may include visits to foreign embassies, local community organizations, community centers, neighborhoods, shopping areas, and restaurants where heritage speakers live and congregate, and often involve pre-visit training and after-action follow up.
Participate in the planning and delivery of language immersions. Participation is strictly voluntary. Immersions may consist of one or more days of activities that take place outside of the Washington area, either domestically in the United States or overseas, and contain substantial non-classroom-like activities that foster practical, natural use of the language. Contractors will be compensated at their normal hourly rate for hours worked during normal daily working hours for the time zones in which the work is completed and will additionally receive compensation as follows:
Contractors may earn up to a total of twelve (12) hours per weekday and up to eight (8) hours per weekend day.
Domestic Immersions: up to five days actual Meals and Incidental Expenses (M&IE)
Overseas Immersions: up to 14 days actual M&IE * Lodging, travel, and other expenses may be covered by SLS in certain rare circumstances.
According to the Defense Base Act (DBA), Contractors are required to have travel insurance when traveling overseas. The Contractor Company must provide DBA insurance policy information to FSI before planning for any foreign immersion takes place. FSI will reimburse the Contractor Company for the direct expenses of the DBA insurance policy if the foreign immersion travel is approved in the SLS Travel Budget.
Contractors may be requested to purchase language-training materials. The COR/ACOR and GTM must approve such purchases in advance. Reimbursement shall be submitted on the Contractor's invoice. Contractors must submit copies of all receipts and currency exchange rates with their invoice.
Travel or materials acquisitions must be duly authorized in a task order prior to any travel or other reimbursable expenditures.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, follow techniques, methodologies, and approaches used by the office/section.
As required by the COR, ACOR, or GTM, maintain attendance records for students.
Materials and Curriculum Development (If Needed)
Collaborate with the COR, ACOR, or GTM to participate in and support, on a part-time basis, the development of language training materials or SLS-relevant reference materials, including but not limited to text, audio, video, and technology-based media. All materials become the property of the United States Government, and the Contractor may not copy or reproduce them in any way for use outside of an FSI class, share them by any means outside of FSI, or publish them in any way without the express permission of the Government.
Assist with the creation and field-testing of new teaching, study, student advisory, and/or testing materials.
Assist with the recording of audio or video materials to be used in conjunction with established language training curricula or as ancillary resources for student self-directed study.
Assist in in-service staff development and orientation activities, including giving presentations or facilitating a workshop sponsored by FSI.
As needed, assist with the development of SLS-relevant research and development projects, including but not limited to instructional research and development and institutional (management) data handling and analysis.
As needed, assist with reviewing and editing foreign language and/or English in instructional materials.
Adhere to all copyright guidelines and restrictions and follow FSI and SLS procedures regarding copyright.
As needed, assist with drafting required documents in the curriculum development project approval process as well as provide status updates on approved projects on request.
Testing (If Needed)
As needed and on a part-time basis, assist with testing for language proficiency examinations, interacting with the examinee in the instructor's native language or language in which the instructor has near-native proficiency. Support for proficiency tests may be face-to-face or by telephone or other technology-based medium (recorded audio, recorded video, videoconferencing). The instructor may support testing by providing information to an examiner about the examinee's performance on various parts of the test and about the content of the texts used in the test, and assists with the selection and/or preparation of reading test materials.
On a strictly voluntary basis, may have the opportunity to become a certified tester by the FSI Language Testing Unit (LTU). Duties of the tester are defined by documentation in the LTU (provided post-award). FSI/ SLS/LTU provides all training required for attaining FSI Tester certification. The training process takes approximately one year to complete and includes a 40-hour introductory workshop, approximately 25 hours of review classes and mentoring meetings with a Testing Mentor, a written assessment on testing processes, observations of at least three official exams, conducting mock practice exams, and conducting official exams observed by the Testing Mentor or LTU Operations Manager to complete certification. (To become a certified tester the contractor must submit a request to their PM and the PM is to then send the request to the COR/ACOR for approval).
Assist with the creation and testing of new reading kits to be used in face-to-face, telephone or field testing.
Participate in producing audio or video materials for use in conjunction with LTU testing training.
May be requested to conduct end of training tests at one of FSI's field schools overseas.
Adhere to all guidelines and follow all procedures regarding testing material security and safeguarding test score data.
Required Qualifications:
Overall Requirements for all Language Instructor Positions:
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Be eligible to work in the United States and must have a minimum of one year remaining in U.S. employment eligibility.
Follow all policies of the Language Section, the Administrative Unit, SLS, FSI, and DOS.
Follow the guidance provided in the FSI Language and Culture Instructor Guide.
Follow all administrative processes and procedures as detailed in the SLS Guide to FSI Administrative Procedures.
Work in a harmonious and professional manner with colleagues who represent cultures from around the world.
Requirements for Language Instructor I:
Foreign Language Proficiency: must be educated native or near-native speakers of the language preferably Level 4 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
English Proficiency: It is strongly preferred, but not required, that possess sufficient proficiency in English Level 2 or higher on the ILR proficiency scale.
Cultural Background: Candidates must possess the cultural background of the specific country or geographical region required by submitting proof of being raised or educated in said country, by living in a cultural enclave or heritage community in another country, or by demonstrating through work experience or academic preparation a deep understanding of the region. It is desired, but not required, that contractors should have spent their formal educational (secondary school and beyond) years in the cultural environment and have been schooled there through the equivalent of American secondary school.
Education completed in foreign colleges or universities may be used to meet the education requirements if you can show that the foreign education is comparable to that received in an accredited educational institution in the United States. It is your responsibility to provide such evidence when applying. Companies can go to http://www.naces.org/members.htm to identify institutions recognized as specializing in interpretation of foreign education credentials.
Requirements for Language Instructor II (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I to be considered for Language Instructor II):
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
BA/BS, MA/MS, or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree(s) in any field.
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
A minimum English proficiency level of a 2:2 on the ILR proficiency scale.
Requirements for Language Instructor III (Note -Candidate must meet all requirements for Language Instructor I and II to be considered for Language Instructor III):
A minimum of seven (7) years of experience teaching adult learners the foreign language they will be providing to FSI in a classroom setting (2 or more students).
MA/MS or Ph.D., or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field with demonstrated expertise through experience or publications in one or more of the qualifications required for language instruction at FSI (i.e., curriculum development, proficiency assessment, task-based teaching and learning, adult language learning, educational technology in FLE, etc.)
A minimum of one (1) year of experience designing proficiency-based curricula.
A minimum English proficiency level of a 3:3 on the ILR proficiency scale. (TOEFL or CEFR scale equivalents are considered acceptable).
A minimum of three (3) years of experience teaching foreign language with proficiency-based or task-based curricula.
A minimum of one (1) year of experience administering proficiency-based assessments (i.e., DLPT, ACTFL OPI, etc.).
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
BS/BA or MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field preferred. (BS/BA Required for Language Instructor II, MS/MA or foreign equivalent degree in relevant language education field required for Language Instructor III)
Experience teaching foreign language(s) to adult learners in a classroom setting preferred.
Experience developing foreign language instructional materials and/or curricula preferred.
Experience teaching with the communicative approach preferred.
Experience incorporating a variety of educational technology in teaching preferred.
Experience teaching blending learning activities valued.
Experience integrating social media applications for educational purposes valued.
Experience administering proficiency-based assessments valued. (Required for Language Instructor II and III)
Experience teaching with vocabulary-based language learning materials valued.
Experience delivering training targeted to needs of diplomatic community valued.
Clearance: National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), background check
Location: The School of Language Studies (SLS) at the U.S. Department of State’s (DOS) Foreign Service Institute (FSI), Arlington, Virginia
Travel: Some Travel may be required",463,Washington
78,PROGRAM ANALYST (TRANSIT PROTECTION SUSTAINMENT LEAD),US STRATEGIC SYSTEMS PROGRAMS (SSP),"Washington Navy Yard, DC","$122,530 - $172,500 a year","Duties
Summary
You will serve as a Program Analyst (TRANSIT PROTECTION SUSTAINMENT LEAD) in the NUCLEAR WEAPONS SURETY DIV (SP30), NWS AQUISITION & OPERATIONS BR (SP32)of STRATEGIC SYSTEMS PROGRAMS.

The NH-04 pay band encompasses a salary range of $122,530 - $172,500. The salary range shown in the announcement represents the full salary range of the position. However, the salary for this position may be limited to $163,345.

Responsibilities
You will guide the Integrated Nuclear Weapons Security System (INWSS) efforts of contractors and government support activities to assure safety and security of nuclear weapons.
You will act as a program fiscal, technical, and program/project expert and provide direction, advice, and/or support for transit protection programs.
You will review, update and submit all assigned budget packages for assigned systems.
You will identify potential vulnerabilities in the design, deployment, and operation of NWS systems and operations.
Travel Required
Occasional travel - You may be expected to travel for this position.
Supervisory status
No
Promotion Potential
None
Job family (Series)
0343 Management And Program Analysis
Similar jobs
Analysts, Program
Program Analysts
Requirements

Requirements
Conditions of Employment
Must be a US Citizen.
Must be determined suitable for federal employment.
Must participate in the direct deposit pay program.
New employees to the Department of the Navy will be required to successfully pass the E-Verify employment verification check. To learn more about E-Verify, including your rights and responsibilities, visit e-verify.gov
Generally, current federal employees applying for GS jobs must serve at least one year at the next lower grade level. This requirement is called time-in-grade. Time-in-grade requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.
Within the Department of Defense (DoD), the appointment of retired military members within 180 days immediately following retirement date to a civilian position is subject to the provisions of 5 United States Code 3326.
Males born after 12-31-59 must be registered for Selective Service.
You will be required to obtain and maintain an interim and/or final security clearance prior to entrance on duty. Failure to obtain and maintain the required level of clearance may result in the withdrawal of a job offer or removal.
This position is covered under the Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA). You must be certified as a Career Field Program Management Level III. Certification is required within 24 months of appointment.
Successful completion of a pre-employment drug test (including marijuana) is required. A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if you fail to report to the drug test appointment or fail the test. You will be subject to random testing.
This position may require travel from normal duty station to CONUS and OCONUS and may include remote or isolated sites. You must be able to travel on military and commercial aircraft for extended periods of time.
Qualifications
Your resume must demonstrate at least one year of specialized experience at or equivalent to the NH-3 pay band or GS-13 grade level or pay band in the Federal service or equivalent experience in the private or public sector. Specialized experience must demonstrate the following: providing technical and administrative guidance for the safety and security of nuclear weapons in transit.

Additional qualification information can be found from the following Office of Personnel Management web site: https://www.opm.gov/policy-data-oversight/classification-qualifications/general-schedule-qualification-standards/#url=List-by-Occupational-Series

Experience refers to paid and unpaid experience, including volunteer work done through National Service programs (e.g., professional, philanthropic, religious, spiritual, community, student, social). Volunteer work helps build critical competencies, knowledge, and skills and can provide valuable training and experience that translates directly to paid employment.
Education
This job does not have an education qualification requirement.
Additional information
This position is covered by the Department of Defense Priority Placement Program.

Additional vacancies may be filled by this announcement.

A tentative offer of employment will be rescinded if the selectee fails to meet the pre-employment requirements, including failure to report to any of the scheduled appointments.

If you are unable to apply online and request information about the Alternate Application process, please contact the Department of Navy's Employment Information Center.

Federal annuitant information: The selection of an annuitant is subject to the Department of Defense and Department of the Navy policy on the employment of annuitants. Policy information may be found at: http://www.secnav.navy.mil/donhr/Documents/CivilianJobs/FedCivAnnuitants.pdf

ICTAP Applicants: To be considered well-qualified and exercise selection priority as an ICTAP candidate, displaced Federal employees must satisfy all qualification requirements for the position and receive a rating in the highly qualified category (score 85) or higher. ICTAP candidates must provide copies of all of the following documentation at the time of application: 1) agency notice; 2) most recent performance appraisal; and 3) most recent SF-50 or notification of personnel action that includes position, grade level, and duty location. Applicants who do not provide this documentation will not receive consideration as an ICTAP candidate. For more information about ICTAP eligibility please review the following link: https://www.usajobs.gov/Help/working-in-government/unique-hiring-paths/federal-employees/ictap/

Military Spouse Preference applicants will receive priority consideration at the Full Performance Level (FPL) and if determined to be Best Qualified at the FPL, and selected, must be placed at the FPL. A BQ military spouse possesses knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies comparable to others who meet the competitive referral criteria for the specific position.

Recruitment incentives may be authorized to eligible new hires.

A relocation incentive is generally a single payment intended to offset some of the relocation costs experienced by the selectee. A relocation incentive may be authorized.

This position is eligible for part time, full time or ad-hoc telework at the discretion of management.

How You Will Be Evaluated
You will be evaluated for this job based on how well you meet the qualifications above.
In order to qualify for this position, your resume must provide sufficient experience and/or education, knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the duties of the specific position for which you are being considered. Your resume is the key means we have for evaluating your skills, knowledge, and abilities as they relate to this position. Therefore, we encourage you to be clear and specific when describing your experience.

When the application process is complete, we will review your resume to ensure you meet the hiring eligibility and qualification requirements listed in this announcement. You will be rated based on the information provided in your resume and responses to the Occupational Questionnaire, along with your supporting documentation to determine your ability to demonstrate the following competencies:
ACCOUNTABILITY
ORAL COMMUNICATION
PARTNERING
PROBLEM SOLVING
WRITTEN COMMUNICATION

You should list any relevant performance appraisals and incentive awards in your resume as that information may be taken into consideration during the selection process. If selected, you may be required to provide supporting documentation.

If after reviewing your resume and supporting documentation, a determination is made that you inflated your qualifications and/or experience, your score may be adjusted to more accurately reflect your abilities or you may be found ineligible/not qualified.

Please follow all instructions carefully. Errors or omissions may affect your rating or consideration for employment.

All eligibility, qualifications, and time-in-grade requirements must be met by the closing date of this announcement.

Background checks and security clearance
Security clearance
Top Secret
Drug test required
Yes
Required Documents

Required Documents
You are required to provide documentation that supports the eligibility and qualification claims made in your resume and assessment questionnaire. You must submit the applicable documents listed here and those listed with the eligibilities you select in the announcement questionnaire with your application package. Applicants who do not provide supporting documentation that fully support their claims will not be referred to the hiring manager. Cover letter is optional.

A complete resume is required. Your resume must show relevant experience, job title, duties and accomplishments. Your resume must show complete information for each job entry to support minimum qualifications. The following information should be provided in your resume, but it is acceptable to provide elsewhere in your application package: employer's name, starting and end dates (Mo/Yr), hours per week, and pay plan, series and grade level (e.g. GS-0201-09) for relevant federal experience.TIP: A good way to ensure you include all essential information is to use the Resume Builder in USAJOBS to create your resume.

Are you applying for a promotion? If you are a current GS employee applying for a higher grade than the grade that you currently hold you must provide an SF-50 that shows that you have held the next lower grade for at least one year. Some SF-50s effective within the last 52 weeks will not demonstrate you have held the next lower grade for at least one year (e.g. General Adjustment SF-50 from this year). In many cases, we need to see two (2) SF-50s to determine time-in-grade and eligibility for promotion. If you are a DoD employee, you can obtain a copy of your SF- 50(s) from MyBiz.

Are you claiming membership in any professional organizations, or possession of a license, certificate or credentials? Check the Conditions of Employment section above to see if any are required. If you claim membership, license, certification, or credentials, you must submit a copy of said document in your application package.


Are you using education as a substitute for some or all of the experience requirement? Is there a basic education requirement for this position? Check the Education section above to see what is allowed and what is required. Any claims you make in your resume or assessment questionnaire regarding education or degrees MUST be supported by submitting with your application official or unofficial transcripts or a list of courses, grades earned, completion dates, and quarter and semester hours earned issued from your school. While unofficial transcripts are acceptable for initial application, an official transcript will ultimately be required if you are selected for the position. You may submit a copy your degree(s) if specific coursework does not have to be verified.

Are you a veteran claiming 5-point veterans' preference or claiming sole survivorship preference? You must submit a copy of your latest DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty (any copy that shows all dates of service, as well as character of service [Honorable, General, etc.] is acceptable) OR a VA letter that shows dates of service or service connected disability AND character of service. If you have more than one DD-214 for multiple periods of active duty service, submit a copy for each period of service. If you were issued a DD-215 to amend aforementioned information on the DD-214 you must submit that too. If you are not sure of your preference eligibility, visit the Department of Labor's website: Veterans' Preference Advisor

Are you a disabled veteran or claiming 10-point veterans' preference?
If you are eligible to claim 10 point veterans preference you must submit a DD-214 Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty as described above for 5-point preference.

You must also provide the applicable supporting documentation of your disability (e.g. disability letter from the VA) as described on Standard Form-15 (SF-15). http://www.opm.gov/forms/pdf_fill/SF15.pdf.

Are you an active duty service member? Active Duty Service Members are required to submit a statement of service printed on command letterhead and signed by the command. The statement of service must provide the branch of service, rate/rank, all dates of service, the expected date of discharge and anticipated character of service (Honorable, General, etc.).

Documents submitted as part of the application package, to include supplemental documents, may be shared beyond the Human Resources Office. Some supplemental documents contain personal information such as SSN and DOB and some documents such as military orders and marriage certificates may contain personal information for someone other than you. You may sanitize these documents to remove said personal information before you submit your application. You must provide an un-sanitized version of the documents if you are selected.
Benefits

Benefits
A career with the U.S. Government provides employees with a comprehensive benefits package. As a federal employee, you and your family will have access to a range of benefits that are designed to make your federal career very rewarding. Opens in a new windowLearn more about federal benefits.
Review our benefits
Eligibility for benefits depends on the type of position you hold and whether your position is full-time, part-time, or intermittent. Contact the hiring agency for more information on the specific benefits offered.
Help
This job is open to
Career transition (CTAP, ICTAP, RPL)
Federal employees who meet the definition of a ""surplus"" or ""displaced"" employee.
Federal employees - Competitive service
Current or former competitive service federal employees.
Land & base management
Certain current or former term or temporary federal employees of a land or base management agency.
Military spouses
Special authorities
Individuals eligible under a special authority not listed above, but defined in the federal hiring regulations.
Veterans
Clarification from the agency
Current permanent employees and DoD Military Spouse Preference (MSP) eligible, current or former time-limited employees that occupied a position located at a Defense Industrial Base Facility (DIBF) or Major Range and Test Facilities Base (MRTFB) and VEOA eligibles.",463,Washington
79,Acquisitions Analyst,Atlas Technologies Inc,"Alexandria, VA 22315",None,"Atlas Technologies, Inc is leading the way in the USCG newest networking technologies and systems. We are looking for passionate and flexible IT professionals who will provide hands-on technical project management and documentation for aspects that cover the range of project lifecycles, from design and specifications, to integration and implementation. If you have a strong management and technical documentation background with knowledge of federal contracts, come join our team.
You Will:
Participate in planning and preparation of Acquisition Plans and Acquisition Strategies of new and existing contracts
Provide authoritative interpretation of regulations, policies, and directives related to federal procurement
Prepare, and coordinate high level approval of detailed procurement requests including Performance Work Statements (PWS), Statement of Work (SOW), contract work descriptions, independent government cost estimates (IGCE), proposal instructions, and evaluation criteria in coordination Product Line Managers and Contracting Officers/Specialists
Conduct extensive market research and analysis, preparing written evaluations with detailed comparisons of options, proposing full review/analysis of alternatives
Identify resources, including staff, funding, equipment, and facilities, for accomplishment of contracted efforts
Maintain and update procurement data for tracking and reporting purposes to either internal or external stakeholders
Support continuous procurement improvement, by exercising project management and analytical thinking skills and bringing improvement ideas to leadership
Perform all COR duties as outlined in the COR Designation Letter including management of contracts to ensure satisfactory progress, compliance with the terms and conditions of the contract, and to identify problems that threaten contractor performance
Monitor the cost, schedule and performance parameters of all assigned contracts
Prepare contract modifications, changes, exercising options, contract terminations. Providing contract/procurement solutions to program managers, technicians, and/or others on contract or procurement policies, problems, or issues
Provide advice on acquisition issues and educate team members on the full range of procurement options and contract types
Provide subject matter expertise and guidance to team members to oversee and enforce compliance with the terms of contracts
Review requisitions to determine that proper specifications or purchase descriptions are included in solicitation documents. Assist with developing training on the proper development of Project management documents
Provide federal IT vendor community guidance to the Product Line Managers and other team members
Work with team members to ensure resource availability, workload and performance
Define and communicate project milestones and deliverables, service and operational level agreements, and resource allocations to management team and end users
Capture and document customer requirements via meetings, face to face interviews, email, phone conferences and/or questionnaires
Facilitate meetings with other team members and customers

You Have
U.S. Citizenship
A Department of Defense (DoD) Secret Level Security Clearance or higher
Proficiency in the Microsoft Office Suite, especially MS Word, MS Power Point, MS Excel and a basic understanding of MS Projects
Demonstrated experience managing US Coast Guard, DHS, and/or federal projects
The ability to multi-task and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
The ability to develop and maintain positive relations with diverse populations
The ability to provide professional conflict resolution if escalated conflicts arise
The ability to maintain files and confidential data
Willingness and motivation to take on additional responsibilities
Strong customer relations, documentation and oral communication skills
Self-Motivation, strong work ethic and commitment to quality
A passion for learning about, and working in the IT industry

BS/BA Degree, minimum 5-10 years equivalent work experience
Preferred level III COR certification; FAC-COR and FAC-P/PM competencies

What is Atlas, you ask?
Atlas is a fast-growing information technology services company servicing a range of DoD customers. Our core values directly contribute to our success and growth. Atlas enjoys success by combining nimble management, a top-notch technical team, and unequaled customer service. We are extremely passionate about our platform, as well as our relationships among our team and with our customers.

Life at Atlas
Our focus can be summed up succinctly – To create a positive impact for our clients, community, and country, we integrate reliable, intuitive IT solutions for the warfighter.

Atlas offers you:
Growth potential and ability to lead change
Company leadership that believes in learning, teaching, passion, and flexibility
Challenging, motivating and fun work environment
Company culture that is guided by our core values
Agile product management methodologies with minimal process overhead",463,Washington
80,Information Security Manager II,VariQ Corporation,"Arlington, VA",None,"Overview:

Variq is seeking is supporting a U.S. Government customer to provide support for onsite incident response to civilian Government agencies and critical asset owners who experience cyber-attacks, providing immediate investigation and resolution. Contract personnel perform investigations to characterize of the severity of breaches, develop mitigation plans, and assist with the restoration of services. We are seeking a Information Systems Security Manager to support this critical customer mission.
Additional Information:
Location: Arlington VA
Salary: Dependent on experience
Security Clearance: Must have an active Secret clearance
Must be able to obtain a TS/SCI clearance
Must be able to obtain DHS Suitability
Availability: Within 2 weeks
Responsibilities:
Assisting technical/management leadership on major tasks or technology assignments
Establishing goals and plans that meet project objectives
Assisting in direction and control activities, having overall responsibility for security management, methods, and staffing to ensure that technical requirements are met
Participating in client negotiations and interfacing with senior management
Supporting decision making and domain knowledge that may have a critical impact on overall project implementation
Providing support to plan, coordinate, and implement a cybersecurity lab’s information security
Providing support for facilitating and helping the lab identify its current security infrastructure and define future programs, design and implementation of security related to lab systems
Assisting the efforts of security staff to design, develop, engineer and implement solutions to security requirements
Implementing and development of the DHS IT security standards
Gathering and organizing technical information about the lab’s mission goals and needs, existing security products, and ongoing programs
Performing risk analyses which also includes risk assessment
Planning and leading major technology assignments
Evaluating performance results and recommends major changes affecting short-term project growth and success
Functioning as a cyber technical expert across multiple project assignments
Qualifications:

Required Skills:
U.S. Citizenship
Must have an active Secret clearance
Must be able to obtain a TS/SCI clearance
Must be able to obtain DHS Suitability
2+ years of directly relevant experience in information security management
Experience working on multiple complex assignments which are broad in nature, requiring originality and innovation in determining how to accomplish tasks
Ability to apply a comprehensive knowledge across key tasks and high impact assignments
Knowledge of Computer Network Defense (CND) policies, procedures & regulations
Knowledge of defense-in-depth principles and network security architecture
Knowledge of boundary protection and enclaving
Knowledge of authentication and access management techniques
Experience with three or more of the following:
Understanding of business security practices and procedures
Working with current state of the art security tools
Implementing security controls for hardware and software
Encryption techniques and tools
Application of security practices in a cyber lab environment
Must be able to work collaboratively across physical locations
Desired Skills:
Experience leading and mentoring technical teams
Experience with Xacta and Continuum
Experience with AWS Guard Duty
Experience with Nessus
Required Education:
BS Information Management, Cybersecurity, Computer Science or related degree. Two years of related work experience may be substituted for each year of degree level education.
Desired Certifications:
DoD 8140.01 IAT Level III, CISSP, CISM, CASP, AWS Security, AWS Cloud Foundations
OTHER DUTIES
This job description is not designed to cover a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities are subject to change at any time. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform any other job-related duties requested by any person authorized to give instructions or assignments.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this position. Reasonable accommodation may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform these functions.
While performing the duties of this position, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands or fingers, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, sit, and reach with hands and arms. Specific vision abilities required by this position include close vision, distance vision, and the ability to adjust focus. The noise level in the work environment is usually low to moderate.
NOTE
All duties and responsibilities are essential functions and requirements and are subject to possible modification to reasonably accommodate individuals with disabilities. To perform this job successfully, the employee will possess the skills, aptitudes, and abilities to perform each duty proficiently. The requirements listed in this document are the minimum levels of knowledge, skills, or abilities. This document does not create an employment contract, implied or otherwise, other than an “at will” relationship.
VariQ is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, protected veteran status, or any other protected class. We consider diversity and inclusiveness to be core to our culture, and central to our commitment to fostering an empowering and supportive workplace.",463,Washington
81,"Manager, Enterprise Payments",Volkswagen Group Canada,"Herndon, VA",None,"Manager, Enterprise Payments - MOB000003
Primary Location: United States-Virginia-Herndon
Description

Role Summary:
The Enterprise Payment Manager will own two areas: i) Payment Strategy for the NAR region. These function includes the overall payment strategy for VCI/VCCI incl. corresponding vendors; ii) active Product Management of all payment products, esp. FS Pay.
The role sits within the Product and Innovation team at VCI/VCCI.
This role will have significant visibility to the senior management teams of VCI, Audi, Volkswagen, and Ducati so it will be critical for this leader to have exceptional communication and influence skills.

Role Responsibilities:
Strategy (40%) – This role is responsible for payment strategy development. That includes acting as the Business responsible to give directions i.) what kind of payments VCI/VCCI is offering, ii.) how solutions are integrated/harmonized and iii.) which provider support these functions. Responsibilities are
The payments strategy and related product roadmap for VCI/VCCI
Executing the approved Payment strategy
Leading research activities to obtain relevant data and define business needs
Defining product KPIs and success metrics
Evaluating potential partnerships, alliances, and acquisitions to advance our strategic agenda
Product Delivery (40%) – This role will be accountable for delivering the payment processing platform (FS Pay) for Volkswagen, Audi and other partners in the US/Canada. The role owns the payment platform product, along with the functional expansion into other areas of the VWGoA business such as ACH payments or other forms customer can choose to pay.
Leadership (20%) – This person will initially be an individual contributor, but in order to successfully do their job they will have to lead upwards of 15 people cross-functionally that sit within multiple areas of VCI/VCCI, Audi of America, VW of America, Audi AG, VW AG, and VW FS AG. While leadership is not their primary responsibility it will be a critical component of the responsibilities and will be a required skill as their team grows in the future.
Qualifications

Experience:
10+ years of experience in (digital) product management
6+ years of experience in payments
4+ years of experience leading large cross functional teams
Education:
Required – Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Psychology, Computer Science, or related area
Desired – Master’s degree in Entrepreneurship or Business
General Skills:
Expertise in Team Building and Talent Development
Must be able to establish a high level of credibility with all levels of internal and external stakeholders
Ability to communicate with all levels of employees from technical to non-technical clients; strong written, verbal, analytical and presentation skills Customer driven approach to develop, test and implement new products
Analytical and conceptual thinking – using logic and reason, creative and strategic
Leadership Presentations
Computer savvy – skilled in the use of software
Proven track record act in an Agile environment
Integration – joining people, processes or systems
Influencing and negotiation skills
Problem solving
Resource management
Specialized Skills:
Required –
Deep knowledge of the digital payments industry spanning merchants, issuing banks, acquiring banks, payment networks, gateways, and payment processors
Working knowledge of software development and underlying architecture components and considerations
Experience in managing large cross functional projects and leading people/teams in a matrixed environment
Work Flexibility:
Travel 20% of the time (domestic)
We are proud to be an EEO employer M/F/D/V. We maintain a drug-free workplace and perform pre-employment substance abuse testing.",463,Washington
